Authors
Alex Ioshpe
Number of Reviews
86

Title
Review for Vampires (1998)
The last of vampire-films offers plenty of blood and gore, but beyond that -
nothing.
Jack Crow (James Woods) is a professional vampire slayer that is secretly
working for the Vatican. His and his men's mission is to clean the earth
from vampires. They have lost count of how many vampires they have
slaughtered, but one has always escaped them. Valek (Thomas Ian Griffith ) -
the Dark Messias and ruler of the undead that is older than time itself. For
all eternity the vampires have searched for their salvation - the Black
Cross.  With the cross in their possesion, the vampires will be able to walk
in the sunlight. After that it is either the humans or the vampires who will
dominate the earth...
I have never liked John Carpenter and his style. After seeing this film, my
opinions have not changed. John Carpenter remains John Carpenter. However,
because of the film's self-irony, black humour and fascinating
cinematography, I would say that it is his greatest achievement in a long,
long time.
Neither the synopses or Carpenter's direction are original. But there are
some things that are interesting. The director's negative view on the
Catholic Church, for instance. At the end of the film it becomes clear that
Cardinal Alba (Maximilian Schell ) has simply used Crow and his team to find
Valek, so that he would gain eternal life. Otherwise the Catholic priests
are shown cool - drinking, smoking and breaking the rool of celibacy.
Carpenter has created an interesting atmosphere. Set in New Mexican dessert,
he switches between bright golden sunrises and bloody sundowns, symbolically
illustrating the good and the evil through light and darkness. More than
anything in this film, this simple illustration shows the battle between
good and evil. The cinematography by Gary B. Kibbe   is probably the film's
greatest achievement. Music (composed by John Carpenter himself) is at times
effective, the special effects and makeup are likewise worth a notice.
When it comes to the cast (in an intellectual film like this casting is the
last problem; everyone can scream and swing the axe!), but here James Woods
is suprisingly convincing. He is macho and cool as the dedicated hunter, who
lost his family to the "breed of evil". Woods is constantly overacting,
which really saves the film from falling into the trap of serious self
importance. Daniel Baldwin is also entertaining as Crow's loyal partner. The
other cast members are struggling.
Because the film doesn't take itself too seriously, it stays afloat. Still
it is like most vampire-films - a mediocre experience.
Review by Alex Ioshpe 
Copyright 1998 by Alex Ioshpe

Title
Review for End of Days (1999)
"Easely one of the worst films of the year.."
With the millenium just around the corner, Hollywood is playing with our
insecurities concerning the biggest event of this century. This time it is
Arnold Schwartzenegger against the powers of evil. The result is somewhat
predictable. I didn't have high hopes about Arnold's "much anticipated"
return to the big screen. Schwarzenegger fans will probably be pleased,
action lovers won't be bored, and the Catholic League will be angry.
Everyone else will see 'End of Days' for what it is: a deliciously bad
motion picture. Think of it as Hollywood's own Y2K bug.
Did you know that if you turn the three diabolical numbers 666 you'll get
999, as in 1999? Yes, you better believe it..Satan is here on earth, working
on his latest project -- the end of days. This time it is Gabriel Burne who
gets the privilege to play Lucifer and, although not Al Pacino, he is fun to
behold. He coolly strolls through Manhattan in the borrowed body of an
investment banker, wreaking, as they say, havoc. The way it works is he
smirks and something explodes. Before the stroke of the new millennium he's
got to find and impregnate a certain woman in order to climb out from under
a heavenly curse as spelled out in the Book of Revelations. Only
Schwarzenegger's cop attached to an anti-terrorist unit can stop him.
Films like this has one serious weakness -- logic. No matter how you twist
the "plot", you'll find it incredibly stupid (even for a Schwartzenegger
movie!). The incredible fact is that such directors never learn. After
thousands of headless productions, this theme has become one big cliché.
Here the Devil looks more like a sex addicted maniac that has just got out
of a mental institution. He is walking around N.Y., blowing everything up
and killing everyone that gets in a 5 meter radius. All he wants is the
girl, that is somehow special. But Schwartzenegger is more clever than he
looks, he has hidden her in a church, where Satan dare not enter. So the
Evil One is forced to seduce the good cop in order to get the valuable
information: "You can have your wife and daughter back..I can give you
happiness that you can only dream of..Just give me the address.." Indeed
with a script like that, you could make a wonderful parody, but
unfortunately the director is taking this subject very seriously, attempting
to create a provoking an dramatic thriller. And for you who have awaited
Arnold Swartzenegger's comeback, will not be very satisfied. We've not seen
him in a while. That's because he didn't have a worthy opponent. He has
battled nuclear terrorists on Earth and power mad conspirators on Mars. He
has taken on alien predators in the darkest reaches of the jungle and
morphing cyberkillers that seemingly nothing can stop. So, after all those
fights, what's left for Arnold Schwarzenegger? How about Satan? In my
opinion, he has never quite overcome his first role as the deadly robot in
Cameron's "Terminator". And that is Schwartzenegger's strength -- muscles
and no emotions. Here he tries to achieve an artistic level, moving towards
the Oscar. This is called "an adult turn" if successful and "a flop" if
unsuccessful. Make a wild guess! His character has lost his wife and
daughter and has serious drinking problems. This requires at least some
acting skills. Regrettably, the only thing convincing about old Arnold is
his muscles.
The rest of the cast are struggling with their so called characters. The
movie is otherwise technically impressive, with a solid cinematography and
fine lighting. But the movie doesn't serve neither as a serious thriller
(because of its stupidity) nor as comic entertainment (because of its
serious tone). The only real comic relief in this film is when Swartzenegger
tries to cry. The action sequences are all recycled and the effects are
everything but spectacular. So I really have a hard time recommending this
film to somebody. Unless you are a die-hard Schwartzenegger fan, stay away.
As for Schwarzenegger, he'll be back.
"END OF DAYS" & ALL RELATED MARKS & MEDIA ARE TM & Š 1999 UNIVERSAL STUDIOS.
THIS SITE IS IN NO WAY AFFILIATED WITH ANY ENTITY INVOLVED IN THE PRODUCTION
OF THE MOVIE. ALL OPINIONS CONTAINED HEREIN ARE THOSE OF THE AUTHOR ALONE.
ALL PICTURES AND OTHER MATERIAL WERE OBTAINED THROUGH APPROVED CHANNELS OR
FROM THE PUBLIC DOMAIN AND ARE NOT INTENDED TO INFRINGE ANY COPYRIGHTS.
VISIT THE OFFICIAL SITE: http://www.end-of-days.com

Title
Review for Urban Legends: Final Cut (2000)
DIRECTED BY: John Ottman
WRITTEN BY: Paul Harris Boardman and Paul Harris Boardman
CAST: Jennifer Morrison, Matthew Davis, Hart Bochner, Loretta Devine
MPAA: Rated R for violence/gore, language and some sexuality
"Have you ever heard the one about a movie so bad that it made a guy run out of the theatre screaming?" 
Obviously the producers at Columbia Tristar did not think that we suffered enough from the first installment, and so to finish us utterly, they have now released "Urban Legends: Final Cut". 
This is another "Scream"-like feature, consisting merely from the recycled materials of rip-offs from the most pointless movies of all time. Amy (Jennifer Morrison) is a film student who is attending a film school filled with uninspired film students who do not have a clue about what to do. But just as she reaches the halfway mark of her final semester at prestigious University's film program -- where each year's best thesis production takes the coveted Hitchcock Prize, a virtual one-way ticket to Hollywood success -- she has a chance encounter with campus security guard Reese (Loretta Devine), whose tale of a series of murders based on urban legends at another university inspires Amy to try her hand at a fictional thriller organized along similar lines. Soon enough, fake -- and real -- blood starts to flow, and Amy is being chased around by scary killer, while her cast and crew get slain, one by one. Is the culprit the original Urban Legends murderer, just some random psycho,!
 a member of the faculty, one of her competitors for the Hitchcock, or is there something even more stupid going on? 
This is another one of those tiring, pointless teen slasher flicks: neither scary, funny, or interesting. It simply lacks the ability and the story to entertain. The body counts and screams continue to grow, as the weak level of intelligence sinks rapidly. In fact watching films like that after having watched "Scary Movie" is impossible keeping a serious face. Several times I tried to prevent myself from laughing, without succeeding. And then I realized that practically the whole theatre was laughing. 
It's the same thing that has been told and told and told over and over again as if it was the revelation of the century. How many times must we tolerate the same clichés that have haunted the slasher genre since its birth? It has been so many films about masked killers that most of us have developed an allergy for them. They are the most stupid, meaningless, predictable and soulless films in existence. However, director John Ottman manages to make "Urban Legends: Final Cut" into one of the worst achievements of this godforsaken genre. What was done with a sense of redemption for past failures and irony in "Scream", Ottman takes seriously. For that reason alone, it is worth a look, just to realize how bad a movie can be. It's tough to find comparisons for such an achievement, and we have to dig in ancient history to find a movie that would match its intellect. Even movies like "Lost in Space" and "Mission to Mars" seem spectacular in its shadow. We have not seen such waste of t!
ime and resources  since "Showgirls" (1995).
No matter how hard I tried to find positive elements in this so called production, I came up with nothing, except the way the killer was dressed. Here I feel that I have to compliment the costume designers Trysha Bakker and Marie-Sylvie Deveu, that have wisely replaced the well known Scream-mask with a very elegant fencing mask. Jennifer Morrison ("Stir of Echoes") is all right, and the other actors' best achievement is keeping a straight face when pronouncing the words from the script.
In fact the only thing that is terrifying about this film (with the exception of its screenplay) is its portray of film schools. If these graduates will be the directors of the future, then Hollywood's golden days are over. Rumors are already spreading through the internet that Columbia Tristar is already developing a third installment. Let's just hope and pray that it's just an urban legend. 

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
"Houston. We have a serious problem."
After making "Mission: Impossible", Brian De Palma has a lot to live up to.
By making an epic science fiction and inviting great cast and talented crew,
he hopes to reach the modern audience. And the possibilities are certainly
there, but the result is a great disaster.
Starting in a near future, with a prologue copied from "Apollo 13", De Palma
slowly builds up his "story". The human race has already set foot on Mars. A
research expedition has vanished without trace on the red planet and another
one has been sent to find out what happened. This is basically the whole
plot. So it's hard to imagine that it can be stretched to 2 hours. But De
Palma manages to do that. It is not a very good achievement. As we follow
this expedition to Mars and watch them slowly float in space, the hardest
thing to do is stay awake. The film's major problem is that it tries to seem
more clever than it is. David Mamet's dialogue, while trying to seem
natural, is distant and simply fake. De Palma and Mamet wanted to combine
action with a thought provoking plot. The result is more like an
unsuccessful mutation of Kubrick's "2001: A Space Odyssey", "Apollo 13" and
"Godzilla". To make time pass , the creators have inserted several
"refreshing" scientific details, that would not convince a half-crazed frog.
It consists of multiple copies and direct ripp-offs from several great
science fiction films and stories. When it finally presents an almost
original idea, it falls flat because of its uncovered stupidity. I can't
even call this film predictable, since no one with a healthy imagination can
come up with something like this. Sometimes it gets so cheesy, that you'll
start laughing when you're supposed to cry and cry when you're supposed to
laugh. You'll see enormous sandstorms, hear mysterious sounds and, last but
not least, on this "constantly surprising" tour you'll see -- an alien. It's
really hard to find comparisons to such an experience, and I know that I've
never said that before (I thought I never would), but "Lost in Space" is
actually better. That's an achievement in itself!
Director Brian De Palma has stroke gold with "Untouchables" that became an
instant American classic. It is for this film that he will be remembered,
while all his other failures will be forgotten. He'll live to fight another
day! I send the actors my condolences, since they truly do try to transform
into their undeveloped  and dull characters. And both the cinematography,
production design and art direction are very decent. It is because of the
achievement of 254 people, that I rate this film 2/10. Unfortunately their
hard work was in vain. If you have problems with insomnia, I recommend you
this film. If you're not asleep within the first half hour, consult your
doctor.

Title
Review for Girl, Interrupted (1999)
DIRECTED BY: James Mangold
WRITTEN BY: Susanna Kaysen (book) and James Mangold
CAST: Winona Ryder, Angelina Joilie, Clea DuVall, Brittany Murphy
MPAA: Rated R for strong language and content relating to drugs, sexuality and suicide.
Runtime: USA:127
"When you don't want to feel anything, death sounds like a blessing". 
- Susanna, "GIRL, INTERRUPTED"
Susanna (Wiona Ryder ) is a girl, like any girl; living in a town,
like any town. She is eighteen and is like most teenagers - confused,
angry, scared. But there is something about her that makes you
wonder. She has a gift. She is the philosopher of her time, with her
own view at life and society. Her dream is writing and her wish is
sharing her doubts, fears and feelings with someone. But no one
listens. No body cares. She is not like everyone else. And therefore
she is crazy. Before long, she is transmitted to a mental institution,
where she can get excellent care. Here she meets people that are, like
herself, different. And though the personnel tries to help, they see
them only as patients and not for who they are as persons. There is
Giorgina (), the 'pathological liar', Polly, who wants to be a child
forever and Lisa (Angelina Joilie) - the rebellious lioness. Trapped
and helpless, Susanna begins to wonder about her situation. What's
really wrong with her? Is she really crazy? Is it the sixties? Or
maybe she is just a girl, interrupted.
Original? No, but nevertheless it makes a powerful emotional
impact. The story is not structured in chronological order. It jumps
back and forth in time and space, and we learn about Susanna's past
from her memories. Most of the time the film resembles Milos Forman's
"One Flew Over The Cocoo's Nest". It is a meditation on life, society
and human mind. It is a story about the courage and power of being
different. It is a fable about what it means to be brilliant. The
first half of the film is inspiring and is intelligent enough to stand
on its own feet, without being embarrassed. Another complementary
element in James Mangold's picture is characters. Every character is a
mystery, and most of the time the patients are trying to unlock the
doors to each others minds. The problems start emerging in the second
half of the film, where it is time for the director to tie loose ends
and elegantly end his fable. And this is a disappointing effort. All
its mysteries are revealed in the most obvious and primitive way. No
dark secrets remain. Nothing is left to our imagination and
thought. And what felt like a fresh breath of originality, disappears
completely. Acting is the only thing that remains constant during
these 127 minutes. Wiona Ryder is impressive. There are no flaws in
her delicately controlled performance. But the real acting skills are
provided by Angelina Joilie. She puts on a performance that make you
remember Jack Nicholson in "One Flew Over the Cucoo's Nest". But
unlike Ryder, who goes as far as the somewhat dry script unfolds,
Joilie stretches it and goes beyond, making the words her own. There
is some original improvisations in her wonderfully energetic
performance, that really pay off. The rest of the cast is nice, but
their screen time is limited and there is not much they can do with
their small parts. The technical aspect of the film is mediocre, with
Jack N. Green's dry cinematography and Kevin Tent's traditional
editing. This is probably the oldest looking film of the year. In the
end the film feels called interesting. The frightening themes about
control and mental breakdown are almost avoided and it seems like the
creators didn't come up with any interesting updates since Forman has
created his legendary picture. It is a cliché, and yet there is
something that prevents you from taking your eyes from the
screen. There is some kind of a bizarre connection. And even when you
know what's going to emerge from the corner, when you know exactly
what will happen, you feel surprised, amazed and moved. I can't really
explain that, but my guess is that it touches emotions and thoughts
that are so basic, so deep and important, that it simply demands
attention. Will it be remembered? No. It resembles the countless 'true
stories' that you can watch at home on your TV set. But for those who
enjoy a good cry, this is the perfect choice.

Title
Review for High Fidelity (2000)
DIRECTED BY: Stephen Frears
WRITTEN BY: D.V. DeVincentis, based upon a novel by Nick Hornby
CAST: John Cusack, Todd Louiso, Tim Robbins, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Iben Hjejle
After a rather disappointing "Mary Railly", Stephen Frears is now
officially back in business with a comeback worthy of praise. This is
one of the best surprises of this season -- a sweet, small budget
comedy with a big heart. In fact it's not even a comedy. It's a drama
or even more precise -- a clever satire on human relationships and
needs. Based on a 1995 critically acclaimed novel by British author
Nick Hornby, ``High Fidelity'' is a wry and likable story about a
man's quest for fulfillment and happiness.
Rob Gordon was a DJ. It seems that he could make everything spin --
except his own life. Now he owns Championship Vinyl, a little musical
store, somewhere in New York. When he suddenly gets dumped by his
girlfriend, a gorgeous blond attorney, life suddenly looses every
purpose. Decimated, humiliated and on the verge of a mental (and
emotional) breakdown, he starts meditating over his life and the way
it could have been -- about what's right and what's important. He
starts "categorizing" life, dividing it into "top 5 lists". And the
most important is the "top 5 list" over the most painful breakups of
his life, starting with 5th grade, when he found his young girlfriend
with another boy. Though you might think that people change, grow more
mature with age, it just doesn't seem that way and all Rob's
relationships were different versions of that first. Where did he go
wrong? Was it he that screwed up? Or maybe life just stinks? While he
is lost in his own self-pity, he must think of the "top 5 list" over
his needs for the future, find the right elements and mix his life
together.
With clever parallels to the cult of celebrity, music and with
incredibly direct narration, it addresses the average audience member,
in other words -- people like you and me. Although a lot of this honor
should be addressed to the screenwriter ______ and Frears, the
director, the acting is equally important as the written word. And
here John Cusack should absolutely be mentioned. He is simply
superb. It is as much his movie as it is Frears'. The film would not
be the same without him. Cusack -- whose character is sadder, wiser
and 35 -- brings intelligence and warmth to post- mod irony. Most of
his dialogue is delivered directly to the camera -- not an easy task
-- but Cusack pulls it off. His interpretation feels so emotionally
right, so incredibly realistic and precise that Frears' message simply
can't be ignored or overseen. The other members of the cast do an
equally remarkable job. Both ______ and Jack Black are fabulous. Even
Catherine Zeta Jones appears in a role where she actually acts, not
just looks beautiful. However, the most unexpected pleasant surprises
is provided by Todd Louiso who delivers a spectacular comic
performance as Rob's co-worker and friend Dick. This is such an
impressive achievement that it's almost worth a Oscar-nomination. He
is simply a joy to behold. Otherwise, everyone are in their place, and
at the right time -- all part of Frears' colorful blend.
Pretty much like Edward Norton's "Keeping the Faith" , this film
doesn't follow any formula or belong to any genre -- it's dramatic,
tragic, sarcastic, comic and even cynical, but never bitter or
angry. It's a little bit of everything, pretty much like life
itself. Nothing seems unreal or staged. It reflects reality as a
mirror. As you watch it, you go through the same emotional problems as
the main character. You feel and think and reflect. This effect has
become a rarity nowadays.
Although it's primarily about the perils of love, ``High Fidelity'' is
secondarily about pop music. Rob owns Championship Vinyl and his
employees, timid Dick (Todd Louiso) and overbearing Barry (Jack
Black), are fellow music snobs. Music is the language in their lives,
the measure by which they define themselves and mark the significant
events of their lives. And so does the movie. It is as much a musical
film as anything else, as Rob's journey is wonderfully portrayed
through carefully inserted musical fragments.
In the end, you have gained something while watching it. It's not the
film of the century or even of the year. It's not an special effects
extravaganza. It doesn't require big explosions or digital creatures
to succeed. It's a small movie about the big things. And even though
it does not contain heavy philosophy, you feel as if you have
experienced something of significance, and you will experience that
nice warm feeling for quite some time.

Title
Review for Celebrity (1998)

DIRECTED BY: Woody Allen
WRITTEN BY: Woody Allen
CAST: Kenneth Branagh, Judy Davis, Winona Ryder, Charlize Theron, Leonardo DiCaprio, Melanie Griffith
For most of us the life of a celebrity and its glamour is synonymous
with romances, love and happiness. Woody Allen takes us behind the set
to a world of movie stars, famous writers, supermodels and
TV-celebrities.
Whether he has succeeded in presenting a film about the concept of
celebrity is debatable though because this film throws itself in
probably a dozen directions, not really leaving familiar Allen
territory. Lee, a disillusioned journalist decides to abandon his
shallow marriage with a neurotic school teacher Robin (Judy Davies),
in pursuit for excitement and light, which is missing in his gray,
monotonous life. This sudden decision leaves Robin crushed and
confused, on the verge of a complete breakdown. Strange coincidences
guide them both on an unknown path and their lives will never be the
same.
Woody Allen is certainly a celebrity if attention from the tabloids is
any judge and well qualified to write a film about wanting to be
famous and being famous. He seamlessly builds a world of pretentious
chatter and unctuous flattery, of TV priests, celebrity plastic
surgeons and their entourages, where backstage at a tabloid talk show
the hit men have agents and the skinheads have eaten all the
bagels. There are only two concerns: ordinary people desperately want
to gain fame and the famous ones are desperately trying to keep
it. Nothing of what is shown in this film is shocking or
revolutionary. Lee has mistaken fame for happiness and commercial
success for fulfillment. He bitterly discovers that the lives of the
famous and adored are soulless and shallow, with relationships as
random and uncertain as their business deals. The world behind the
stage is structured of endless flaws, limitations and illusions. Of
course most of the "reevaluations" concerning the true lives of
celebrities we already know. But everything is presented with such
grace and realism that it is impossible to refuse. The drama is moving
and realistic. The wit is often sharp and very funny with solid stabs
being made at Catholic idolatry, the media, supercilious film
directors and spoilt brat stars. There's a fine moment of two some,
hilarious, some touching.
The film is actually two parallel stories where one is Lee's quest for
happiness in the celebrities' world, and the other is Robin's life and
its radical change. "Celebrity" is about much more than the couple's
failed love life, although that string of dismal disappointments does
give shape to the larger narrative. Beginning with his divorce from
wife Robin (Judy Davis), "Celebrity" charts Simon's disaster course
through his fling with a starlet (Melanie Griffith), his flirtation
with a supermodel (Charlize Theron), his hotel foursome with a hot
young stud (Leonardo DiCaprio), his relationship with a live-in lover
(Famke Janssen), to his affair with an age-inappropriate waitress and
theater hopeful (Winona Ryder). More than anything else, this is (at
least to me) a story about the twists and turns of life and the power
of coincidences that somehow control our destiny.
This is certainly not the best of Allen's work, but absolutely not a
bad effort. Though the theme in his films is always different, there
are certain "trademarks" that brand all his work: a clever story that
is mostly driven by a neurotic character with deep emotional problems
and of course a cast that is more spectacular than most. "Celebrity"
is no exception. It is very well written, with many multidimensional
characters that inhabit its world. But the most important element is
that there is no catharsis, no climax. The film is simply candid
fragments of different lives. It is visually compelling with brilliant
black & white photography by Sven Nykvist, that uses the shadowy
ambiguity to create a granular and viscous monochrome of astonishing
clarity. As in most of Allen's films you'll find great actors, such as
Wiona Ryder, Charlize Theron, Melanie Grifith and Leonardo Di Caprio
appear in tiny, episodic parts. Though I always found that
unnecessary, I have come to terms with the fact that a cast like that
simply can't disappoint no matter what. And no one does. Ryder and Di
Caprio have some great moments; and Davies is truly spectacular,
almost repeating her role in Allen's "Husbands and Wives", portraying
the classic Woody Allen female break down but then haltingly blossoms
when famous TV producer Tony (Joe Mantegna) falls unreservedly in love
with her. But can she cope even with this? The main character that
basically carries the film on his shoulder is played by Kenneth
Brannagh that looks great in any role. Here it seems as if Woody
Allen's spirit has taken complete control of his body, since he acts
completely as Allen himself, with a kind of neurotic sweetness that
mark every moment of his screen time. Although Brannagh is an
incredibly talented actor and his performance is very entertaining, I
find it bizarre that Allen would hire a serious actor that could do
his own interpretation of this character and instead force him to copy
his work. I truly believe that Brannagh could actually do more with
his c h wish to see his spirit on screen.
In a way, Allen comes to a rather stereotypical conclusion that fame
is a beast and not worthy of worship, but he inserts so much more in
his film that it will take more than one review to find reasons to
recommend this picture.

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
DIRECTED BY: John Woo
WRITTEN BY: Ronald D. Moore
CAST: Tom Cruise, Thandie Newton, Ving Rhames, Dougray Scott, Anthony Hopkins, Rade Serbedzija
MPAA: Rated PG-13 for intense sequences of violent action and some sensuality.
Runtime: USA:123
"The search for a hero begins with something that every hero requires, a villain." 
- Vladimir Nekhorovich, "Mission: Impossible 2" 
This is summer, and it is time for summer movies. Time for super sized
popcorns. Time to have fun. And no summer is a summer without great
action films with terrible villains and noble heroes. That's why
Hollywood produces hundreds of clichés every year to satisfy the
infinite demands of the hungry audience. To create a refreshing and
original action film in the midst of clones, is a mission:
impossible. And it is a mission that director John Woo chooses to
accept.
In a secret laboratory scientists, searching for a miraculous cure,
have created a monstrous virus, Chimera, that is capable of infecting
the entire planet. Realizing the incredible danger of their discovery,
the project leader, Vladimir Nekhorvich (Rade Sherbedgia) sends a
cryptic message to his contact - special agent Ethan Hunt (Tom Cruise)
of IMS Secret Service, asking for protection. If Chimera would fall
into the wrong hands, the consequences would be catastrophic. Hunt's
mission is to retrieve a sample of Chimera. This mission is made
impossible due to the fact that he is not the only person after
samples of this lethal disease. Among others is a former IMF agent
(Dougray Scott) who has already managed to steal the cure called
'Bellerophon' and now need 'Chimera' in order to pressure the
governments and acquire complete economic control over the civilized
world. In order to infiltrate and locate the terrorist group he relies
on the help of an international thief Nyah (Thandie Newton) of whom he
quickly develops a love interest. Time is not only running out for
Agent Hunt to find and destroy 'Chimera' before the terrorists get
their hands on it, but he must also find 'Bellerophon' so as to save
his love interest who has already become infected by the disease from
a terrible and rapid death.
This is a great action film created by the master of the genre. It's
not that the script is complex and intelligent or performances
great. It is filled with most ordinary type of action sequences: gun
fights, car chases, combat scenes. But John Woo manages to transform
these ancient clichés into sheer eye candy. The action scenes that
looked dull in 'The World Is Not Enough', explode into colorful
fireworks before your eyes in this energy packed thrill ride. In fact
every element that didn't work in 'WINE' is flourishing here. This is
James Bond resurrected. This is action revitalized. Every necessary
element is carefully inserted at the right time in the right
moment. There is enough mystery and suspense for any audience member,
and as the beautiful locations are frequently changing from elegant
Madrid to beautiful Sydney, the intensity is growing. Woo directs with
such energy and elegance that no matter how silly the plot, you're
fascinated, intrigued and stunned. Cruise is a believable hero and the
best of substitutes for James Bond. He has always been a brave actor,
willing to take chances in choosing risky parts. In the latest years,
his attempts have paid off. With his several serious roles, one in
Kubrick's 'Eyes Wide Shut' and another in 'Magnolia' (which earned him
an Oscar nomination), Cruise has established himself with the critics
as a serious actor, capable of virtually anything. Now, with 'M:I2',
he can become the hero of the box-office. He not only stars, but also
produces Woo's latest venture into the world of filmmaking. This is
Cruise-control at its best. A truly delightfully energetic
performance, that makes Bond look like a schoolboy. Dougray Scott is
Hunt's perfect nemesis. From the beginning of the film it is
established that he is one of the best agents that IMF has to
offer. He has even replaced Hunt on several missions, before he turned
to the 'dark side'. His frightening ease and cool ruthlessness, make
him lethal, capable of anything. Thandie Newton ('Beloved') is
likewise a nice choic e are not required, her purpose is simply
looking beautiful, which she does. Rade Sherbedgia and Anthony Hopkins
appear in small refreshing cameo roles. But it is Cruise who really
contribute more to the film than anyone else. It is a much more
explosive performance, than in De Palma's first installment. And the
film itself has changed along side with the main character. It has got
bigger muscles. Woo has transformed De Palma's quieter thriller into a
high energy, adrenaline-pumping adventure. The film is drained in
Woo's trademarks; deceiving appearances, mysterious events, and
incredibly elegant action sequences (the famous pigeon scene is a true
wonder). He has no respect for the laws of physics and in his world
the characters virtually fly in slow motion across the screen. Hans
Zimmer's techno score, Jeffrey L. Kimball's graceful cinematography
and Steven Kemper's fast paced editing are all achievements of the
highest artistic level that compensate for the almost complete lack of
interesting dialogue. But John Woo covers the plot up with so much
beauty, elegance and energy that the plot holes and logical
embarrassments explode before our eyes. The fans of the original might
complain, but for me this is a much more successful interpretation,
because it doesn't try to seem more clever than it is. It doesn't try
to be anything else but pure and delicate action film. And though it
is not the best that this summer has to offer ('Gladiator' was an
overall grander achievement), this is action on a grand
scale. Consider it mission accomplished.

Title
Review for Scream 3 (2000)
Rule number 1: Forget everything about what you think you know. Forget
everything about the past. Because you will discover things that will
make you question your sanity. Rule number 2: Anyone, even the main
character can die! Rule number 3: The killer is bigger, smarter,
meaner and more powerful than you can ever imagine. Prepare yourself
for the most frightening scary movie you have ever seen - your life!
Not many survived 'Scream 2'. Those who have, are now returning to
chance their fate once again in 'Scream 3'. Among them: Gale (the
cynical journalist), Dewie (the good-hearted cop) and of course Sydney
- the innocent victim that bravely vanquishes all her enemies. The
bloody unpleasantness of the past is almost forgotten and everyone is
moving on with their lives. Well, that is everyone - except Sydney,
who lives a solitary life somewhere in the mountains. Meanwhile, in
Hollywood, the producers are wrapping up their latest film (based on a
'true' story by Gale) - 'Stab 3'. Everything is swell, until the cast
members start dying one by one. And so the remaining cast and
survivors must stand together against an invisible enemy that can
mimic all voices...
Tiered of Ws Craven's slashers? Calm yourself, because this is the
final chapter. Just think of it as a final scream. 'Scream 3' gives
Craven the opportunity to play with trilogies. He is almost
successful. The first installment was an entertaining combination. It
was self ironic and at the same time incredibly intense and at times
even frightening. The second one was a total flop that is not worth
mentioning. His latest addition feels like 'Scream 1' with a knife in
its back. It starts fresh and frightening, with amusing irony and
humor, but both the story and suspense die in slow motion, until the
last breath of originality fades away completely. Craven begins well,
and the first half of the film is wonderful. There are surprises,
mysteries and discoveries in every scene. There are some incredibly
amusing guest appearances, such as Jay and Silent Bob (from 'Dogma')
and Geena Davies (Princess Laya from 'Star Wars'). There is a certain
sense of unpredictability. Who will die first? Why? Who is the
mysterious killer(s)? And what is the mysterious darkness in Sydney's
mystical past? Craven is filling the screen with his trademarks, his
light, energetic style, that makes his films incredibly interesting,
almost legendary. Unfortunately it all has to end, and it happens all
too quickly. Already after 50 minutes the film starts to falter. And
by the finale you will discover that Craven has created the exactly
same thing that he tried to parodize. It is unfortunate, because the
opportunities are there. But Craven is too occupied with his famous
original scenes of suspense, that he completely forgets about story
development. So, after the killer is presented in all his mystery, the
characters are inserted into the story and three people have died, the
film turns off the irony and resorts to being simply an entertaining
slasher. The film is as frightening as the first, maybe even more. It
has a much more surrealistic feel to it, as the audience is
experiencing Sydney's paranoiac hallucinations of her past. You can't
trust them. 
'Scream 3' is probably the most professional of 'Scream'-films. It
plays on a much higher technical and visual level than its
'ancestors', which makes it hard to resist Craven's playful
thriller. And though it's not a perfect film that anyone will remember
after a week, it is a worthy, graceful (and hopefully final) addition
to the 'Scream Trilogy'. It is not quite an adrenaline rush, but it
certainly is an elegant, mystic and engaging thriller that will
provide enough thrills, laughs and screams for one evening.

Title
Review for High Fidelity (2000)

DIRECTED BY: Stephen Frears
WRITTEN BY: D.V. DeVincentis, based upon a novel by Nick Hornby
CAST: John Cusack, Todd Louiso, Tim Robbins, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Iben Hjejle
After a rather disappointing "Mary Railly", Stephen Frears is now officially back in business with a comeback worthy of praise. This is one of the best surprises of this season -- a sweet, small budget comedy with a big heart. In fact it's not even a comedy. It's a drama or even more precise -- a clever satire on human relationships and needs. Based on a 1995 critically acclaimed novel by British author Nick Hornby, ``High Fidelity'' is a wry and likable story about a man's quest for fulfillment and happiness. 
Rob Gordon was a DJ. It seems that he could make everything spin -- except his own life. Now he owns Championship Vinyl, a little musical store, somewhere in New York. When he suddenly gets dumped by his girlfriend, a gorgeous blond attorney, life suddenly looses every purpose. Decimated, humiliated and on the verge of a mental (and emotional) breakdown, he starts meditating over his life and the way it could have been -- about what's right and what's important. He starts "categorizing" life, dividing it into "top 5 lists". And the most important is the "top 5 list" over the most painful breakups of his life, starting with 5th grade, when he found his young girlfriend with another boy. Though you might think that people change, grow more mature with age, it just doesn't seem that way and all Rob's relationships were different versions of that first. Where did he go wrong? Was it he that screwed up? Or maybe life just stinks? While he is lost in his own self-pity, he must think!
 of the "top 5 list" over his needs for the future, find the right elements and mix his life together. 
With clever parallels to the cult of celebrity, music and with incredibly direct narration, it addresses the average audience member, in other words -- people like you and me. Although a lot of this honor should be addressed to the screenwriter ______ and Frears, the director, the acting is equally important as the written word. And here John Cusack should absolutely be mentioned. He is simply superb. It is as much his movie as it is Frears'. The film would not be the same without him. Cusack -- whose character is sadder, wiser and 35 -- brings intelligence and warmth to post- mod irony. Most of his dialogue is delivered directly to the camera -- not an easy task -- but Cusack pulls it off. His interpretation feels so emotionally right, so incredibly realistic and precise that Frears' message simply can't be ignored or overseen. The other members of the cast do an equally remarkable job. Both ______ and Jack Black are fabulous. Even Catherine Zeta Jones appears in a role where!
 she actually acts, not just looks beautiful. However, the most unexpected pleasant surprises is provided by Todd Louiso who delivers a spectacular comic performance as Rob's co-worker and friend Dick. This is such an impressive achievement that it's almost worth a Oscar-nomination. He is simply a joy to behold. Otherwise, everyone are in their place, and at the right time -- all part of Frears' colorful blend. 
Pretty much like Edward Norton's "Keeping the Faith" , this film doesn't follow any formula or belong to any genre -- it's dramatic, tragic, sarcastic, comic and even cynical, but never bitter or angry. It's a little bit of everything, pretty much like life itself. Nothing seems unreal or staged. It reflects reality as a mirror. As you watch it, you go through the same emotional problems as the main character. You feel and think and reflect. This effect has become a rarity nowadays. 
Although it's primarily about the perils of love, ``High Fidelity'' is secondarily about pop music. Rob owns Championship Vinyl and his employees, timid Dick (Todd Louiso) and overbearing Barry (Jack Black), are fellow music snobs. Music is the language in their lives, the measure by which they define themselves and mark the significant events of their lives. And so does the movie. It is as much a musical film as anything else, as Rob's journey is wonderfully portrayed through carefully inserted musical fragments. 
In the end, you have gained something while watching it. It's not the film of the century or even of the year. It's not an special effects extravaganza. It doesn't require big explosions or digital creatures to succeed. It's a small movie about the big things. And even though it does not contain heavy philosophy, you feel as if you have experienced something of significance, and you will experience that nice warm feeling for quite some time. 

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
An elderly man stepping into an endless sea of white crosses. He finds one
particular cross amidst thousands and falls on his knees before it. Suddenly
we're transported to Omaha beach, it is June 6th 1944. Landing crafts are
breaking the dark waves. Men are silently praying, some are throwing up,
partly of fear, partly of seasickness.  A shaking hand is reaching out for
the water cannister.
"30 seconds...God be with you...". A soldier kissing a silver cross in the
sun light and then all hall breaks loose. The unprepared soldiers are met
with overwhelming gunfire. Now the camera, masterfully handled by Director
of Cinematography Janusz Kaminski , is running, twisting on the beach.
Chaotic flashes of light, the ground going up and coming down, confused
soldiers, half crazed by fear, are helplessly trying to stay alive. Some of
these scenes will forever burn into your mind. A soldier picking up his
severed arm, wondering off in shock. A German bullet fired from the bluff
above gazes a GI helmet, making a harmless clang, but before the soldier can
registrate his luck, another bullet catches him in the forehead, tearing out
the back of his scull. Another soldier, a young boy, is lieng on the ground
with his belly wide open, holding his silver cross. Burning men thrown many
feet in the air by mines and grenades, land with missing body parts. Whether
you live or die is a matter of luck, not survival tactics or experience.
Severed heads, limbs, terror, screams and panic are everywhere - this is the
real apocalypse now. No one dies heroically, pretty or mercifully. There are
no John Wayns or Rambos. These soldiers are ordinary men in extraordinary
sercomstances and they behaved extraordinary. When
ends with success and the gun fire stops, Kaminski's previously furious
camera, elegantly flyes over the beach. The sea water is red with blood and
the shore is covered with uncountless bodies. And while the majestic and
powerful score kicks in, you can whipe off your cold sweat and start
breathing normally after the most intense, graphical, terrifying as well as
artistic combat sequence ever created. This is the beginning of  Steven
Spielberg's  nightmare vision of the "last good war" - "Saving Private Ryan"
.. Slowly the plot begins to take shape.
Capt.John Miller ( Tom Hanks ) and his troop: a sensitive army medic
 Giovanni Ribisi ), a language specialist that has never been in combat
 Jeremy Davies ), a jew that takes the subject of war very personally ( Adam
Goldberg ), an understanding and loyal sarge ( Tom Sizemore ), a Godfearing
southern sharpshooter ( Barry Pepper ), a Brooklyn loud-mouth ( Edward
Burns ) and an Italian-American ( Van Diesel ) have survived the carnage of
the D-day assault and have been ordered new mission: to find and retrieve
Pvt.James Ryan ( Matt Damon ), whose three brothers have been killed in
action. Ryan is a paratrooper that has been dropped somewhere behind enemy
line, in the german territory. Miller's men openly question why the life of
an unknown soldier should be more valuable then their own. As they move
deeper into hostile territory, difficult decisions must be made. Should they
save a little French girl from a war torn village at the expense of their
mission? Should they execute a German POW for killing their fellow soldier
or should they let him go at the risk that he will rejoin his forces and
continue fighting?
Actually the whole film is one big moral dilemma.
You can say that the plot is pure Hollywood - risking the lives of seven men
to save one. But it is extremely effective as it displays the meaningless of
war itself.
The cast could not be better, consisting of a few well known actors and
fresh, new talents. Spielberg has masterfully recreated the bondage between
the soldiers in the squad. We get a peek into their confused minds and
tortured soals; we get to know them. This makes it extremely hard
(emotionally) to see them die before our eyes for nothing and no one.
The visuals are breathtaking and award worthy. Incredibly original
cinematography by Janusz Kaminski ("Schindler's List") bases itself mostly
on handhold cameras that plases you right in the middle of the carnage of
battle. This creates a much stronger effect than if you film from the air as
in "The Longest Day" and several other films. Tom Sanders' historical art
direction is equally spectacular - ancient churches and historical buildings
ruined by explosions. Sanders has been very careful with details. The
dramatic score by John Williams is not disappointing, however it sometimes
pushes to hard. Williams' work in "Amistad" I enjoyed much better. The sound
is as nothing I've ever heard before - you feel bullets around you, you have
to turn around and check if the person beside you is still alive. The visual
effects are likewise spectacular and absolutely convincing. But in
comparison to last year's Oscar winner "Titanic", the real strength of
"Saving Private Ryan" lies not in its visual beauty and marvelous effects,
but in its deep and emotional plot and wonderful performance of the cast
(especially by Tom Hanks and Giovanni Ribisi).
When the film ended I sat, cold sweltering and deeply moved by what I have
just seen, or better described - experienced. "Saving Private Ryan" is
probably the best and most powerful war film that has ever been made. Its
achievement lies in its openness, its uncovered, graphical display of
insanity and heroism of ordinary people that made the difference and
eventually won the war. It's a monument to those who fought and died and to
those who survived. It's purpose is not only to show us how the war was
like, but also to realize that behind every cross there is a man, a life,
dreams, hopes and family. "Saving Private Ryan" is a tale about humanity and
self-sacrifis among the horrors of war.

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
MPAA: Rated R for language, a scene of sexuality and some violence.
Runtime: USA 103 / France 103 / Germany 103 / Japan 104
Country: USA
Language: English
Color: Color (Technicolor)
Sound Mix: DTS / Dolby Digital / SDDS
Certification: USA R / UK 15 / Finland K-12 / France U / Germany 12 /
Ireland 15 / Australia MA / Norway 15 / Portugal M/12 / Sweden 11 /
Netherlands 12 / Belgium KT
Paul Vitti (Robert De Niro) is one of the most known and feared mafia
leaders
in the U.S. A man that has handled "the family business" his entire life.
But then
a strange thing happens. Paul can't sleep, he keeps thinking about his wife,
while being with his regularly girlfriend. But what's most important - he
lost his ability to kill.
  Ben Sobol (Billy Chrystal) is one of the most known and respected
psychiatrists in the U.S. - a man really living the American dream,
surrounded by perfection. But no one realizes is that underneath he is
rather ordinary kind of man, with a son, a fiancé (Lisa Kudrow) and the same
problems as everyone else.
By some peculiar circumstances these two men, so different in personality
and way of life, meet. Sobol is then offered a doubting privilege of being
Vitti's "underground shrink". This is the beginning of a strange
relationship, which will not only bring the two men closer to each other,
but also change their personalities, completing them by their opposites.
This is Harold Ramis'amusing comedy. Instead of trying to squeeze laughter
out of us by bad jokes and other desperate measures (think "Mafia" !),
"Analyze This" is actually funny and entertaining, because of the humorous
situations, fine acting and witty dialogue.
Instead of repeating the horrible comedy clichés, Ramis is actually using
them to get a shine of self-parody to his film. This interesting tactic is
effective and amusing, allowing satire, referring to De Niro's screen past,
and yet keeping the focus on the strange friendship between two men who
speak entirely on different levels and in languages.
The fact that Robert De Niro is playing a mafia chieftain in this kind of
film is interesting indeed. The actor has almost become a trademark for
"godfathers" and mafia leaders. While playing his part with a sense of
self-parody, he manages to not overact, so that his character does not seem
silly or unreal. He really is a magnificent actor, that manages to float
into every role, be that emotional drama or light comedy; and although this
is not an award worthy  performance, this is one of his most amusing roles,
for which he deserves some credit. Lisa Kudrow, Vitty's "people", and other
supporting characters in the story are almost unnoticeable, as the director
concentrates his energy on the two main characters.
And jet, although this is a comedy, and both the events, characters and
their interrelations with each other are glamorized and simplified, this is
also an interesting and nuanced meditation of what it means to be an Italian
functioning in an America where Italian is an synonym for pizza and "The
Godfather", as well as giving us an interesting peek into mobster mentality.
Those particular elements are not especially explored simply because t his
isn't a deeply involving human drama. The characters are thin as bible
paper, many parallel stories and relationships are started, but not
completed, leaving them unfinished; and the film itself isn't an elegantly
crafted cinematic experience, but I guarantee you a good time and a good
laugh.
"Analyze This" is a funny, clever and well crafted piece of moviemaking,
which although won't make history, will entertain and amuse many before it's
forgotten, and that's exactly its purpose.

Title
Review for Hollow Man (2000)
DIRECTED BY: Martin Scorsese
WRITTEN BY: Andrew W. Marlowe, vaguelly based upon a novel by H.G. Wells
CAST: Elisabeth Shue, Kevin Bacon, Josh Brolin, Kim Dickens, Greg Grunberg
MPAA: Rated R for strong violence, language and some sexuality/nudity.
Runtime: USA:112
This is an adaptation of H. G. Wells' acclaimed novel 'The Invisible
Man' . The actors are Kevin Beacon and Elizabeth Shue. The director is
Paul Verhoven. That, plus a quick demonstration of the amazing special
effects in the trailer, should be enough to lure us into the
theatre. The problem is to keep us there. I can't imagine anyone who
would like to see this movie a second time.
Working on a top secret military project, Sebastian Caine (Kevin
Beacon) -- an eccentric genius, that calls himself "God", has
discovered the secret to invisibility. The first two faces are
completed. Now, it is time for "the next logical step" -- human. Caine
volunteers for this risky experiment. But when he is made invisible,
something goes wrong. While his ex-girlfriend Linda (Elisabeth Shue)
desperately tries to find something to return him to normal, he learns
that invisibility is more of a prison than a superpower. But that's
not the bad thing -- an unexpected side-effect of the drug sends him
careening into paranoid megalomania. He is naturally given a couple of
modest superpowers, just enough for him to survive immolation from a
flame thrower and an explosion of about a quart of
nitroglycerine. Soon every sense of decency is forgotten. The little
intelligence that was left disappears as Verhoven looses control and
the film turns into an Alien-rip-off, where Caine is walking like a
half finished Terminator, spooking, scaring and killing everybody.
Though it's based on a novel called 'The Invisible Man', the title has
been ironically changed to 'Hollow Man' that sums up the film very
nicely. This is a very silly production. Laughable,
actually. Apparently Verhoven's imagination doesn't stretch too
far. For him the only worthwhile reason to become invisible is so you
can case the girls' locker room undetected. It is this primitive
schoolboy mentality that eventually kills the movie. Being invisible,
gives you the opportunity to be who you are, to do what you want
without being influenced by society. In many ways it gives you an
illusion of having a life without consequences. The nature of man and
his place in society is what the novel is truly about. All that, the
depth and true horror of the book is gone and only special effects
make you remain in your seat. Caine does use his power voyeuristically
in Hollow Man. But since this is a modernization, in other words a
dehumanization, he doesn't stop there. He becomes a rapist. And then,
of course, a murderer.
You'll start wondering why such actors as Beacon and Shue found
themselves in such film in the first place. Shue's talent is barely
seen, Josh Brolin is underused and the rest of the cast suffer mostly
for the lack of talent. Kevin Beacon is the only one that performs
gracefully. His face is not seen for the most part of the film, and
the only way he exists is as a disembodied voice. There are times when
his presence actually saves the film from being completely
embarrassing.
In the end the effects are the only reason to see this film in the
first place. Being probably the best technical achievement since
"Jurassic Park", they are absolutely amazing. We observe the layers of
skin, muscle, tissue, and bone being peeled away as a body is slowly
rendered invisible. We see a beating heart, inflating lungs, and veins
pulsing with newly-pumped blood. There are a couple of inventive shots
with smoke, fire, air and water, but are a few scenes like that worth
attending a movie for? What is truly disturbing is that with a great
book, talented actors and a grand budget, this could have been so much
more. Pretty much like Jan De Bont ("Twister", "Haunting"), Paul
Verhoven has never made anything extraordinary. He was responsible for
several good films ("Basic Instinct" and "Starship Troopers)" and some
incredibly bad films ("Showgirls", "Total Recall"), but he has never
made anything that was great. In a way "Hollow Man" fits perfectly in
this collection. It's not better or worse than Verhoven's average
film. He proves once again that he is incapable of handling more
complex issues. And so, instead of depth and chills, Verhoven inserts
some of his trademarks: stupid dialogue, and lot's of dull action with
blood and naked bodies. He even throws in some of the worst of film
clichés - the slowly advancing fireball, the villain who comes
back from the dead, etc, etc. - and tops the whole thing off with
one of the most ridiculous endings of the year (you'll be screaming
"NOOOOO!" and attempt to run towards the exit in slow motion). And all
we can ask is why? The answer is simple. Though Hollywood is a movie
producing machine, the business of moviemaking has to be about
something more than money. It has to be about telling stories, not
marketing them. It has to be about transporting us to a different
place, to dazzle us with magic and cleverness. To make us care, to
make us think and feel. Verhoven has obviously missed that point and
this film is a proof of that. It's all flesh and bones, but no soul.
a void where its imagination should be. 

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
Rating: 10/10 - Alternative rating: A
He has it all - the American dream. A 15th storey glass-fronted condo,
expensive furniture, highly paid job with career advancement possibilities
and a wardrobe full of designer clothing. And jet he is not happy. He feels
nothing. The minutes are ticking by, and form hours, days, months, years.
Nothing happens. Surrounded by emptiness, he doesn't feel alive. A chance
encounter with the mysterious Tyler Durden opens his eyes to the possibility
that he can live a life without material goods. The two begin to fight each
other, once a week, for emotional release through physical pain and
suffering. There is no better way to feel alive, than to taste death. Life
has suddenly got a meaning. Soon others find out about this new way of
therapy and the Fight Club is born. After a little while, every major city
gets its own fight club, but that's only the first step in Tyler's complex
plan. But then the events start moving out of control and the two words -
fight club, mean now urban terrorism..
This is more or less the plot in David Fincher's dark and disturbing film.
Off course there's much more to it. "Fight Club" plays on several levels,
generates many provoking thoughts and is completely open for interpretation.
The plot itself (based on the novel by Chuck Palancniuk) should be enough to
make an impression, but Fincher's gritty and innovative style and the Dust
Brothers' acidic chemical cocktail of dark, mood-enchancing tunes, turns
this film into a macabre, visual masterpiece.
The film's main person and nameless narrator is played by Edward Norton. As
always Nortondelivers an exceptional performance, flowing into the role of a
cynical, but mild-minded young man. This character is probably like 90% of
this world's population. Tyler Durden is the black hole of his soul; he is
everything our narrator isn't, and at the same time everything he wanted to
be. This interesting contrast is shown in everything - from clothes and
visual appearance to thoughts and feelings. Tyler's complex character is
portrayed by the ever popular Brad Pitt. After 25 movies, this is his
strongest performance. And believe me, he is really impressive. Helena Boham
Carter is the only female lead in this film, who plays a woman that attends
support group meetings purely for the entertainment value. She gets
unwillingly involved in the macabre and strange events coming one after
another. In addition to this talented trio, the supporting cast, consisting
of almost unknown actors, is equally wonderful, including Meat Loaf and
Jared Leto .
Even before the release of "Fight Club" everyone were talking about
Fincher's graphical portrayal of violence. There is no point to deny that
"Fight Club" is violent movie. The brutal scenes of blood and bones smashed
will certainly burn into your mind. But the purpose of this horrific
bloodbath is not to entertain or amuse, but to make a powerful statement.
Every member of Fight Club is a victim of a dehumanizing and cynical
society. There is one point in the film when Tyler asks: "How much can you
know about yourself if you've never been in a fight?". Pain gives these men
a sense of individuality by exploring their most primitive, barbaric
instincts. Violence is here a depiction of the bestial nature of man.
Fincher really overcomes himself as he is revealing each new turn in a
spiral that descends into darkness and madness. "Fight Club" is not a
"politically correct" film. It doesn't show the world through rose-colored
classes, it shocks and provokes because of its open depiction of the
horrifying reality. Issues like fascism and the whole Nazi ideology is here
shown as a metaphor for the rise of national socialism. What's making this
film even more interesting is the element of satire and macabre humor. This
is a very difficult combination, and it works. The director's surreal style
allows scenes, that under normal surcomstances would not fit in a serious
and dramatic film like this one. In one scene, our narrator's appartement is
displayed like a page in a furniture catalog, complete with text blurbs
superimposed on the screen describing the various pieces. Add some brilliant
voice-over comentaries (by Norton), and you'll get a twice as effective
scene, revealing much more about our social image, than the creepy
conversations in "Se7en".
"Fight Club" is a heavy, surreal experience that really gets under the skin,
refusing to be ignored. Both Stanley Kubrick's "A Clockwork Orange",
"Dr.Jekkyl and Mr.Hyde" and "American Psycho" come to mind, while watching
this aggressive fist fight of a movie. This is actually the only film so
far, that can challenge "Eyes Wide Shut" ; and like Kubrick's last
masterpiece, this is a film that offers too much to absorb under one
screening.
So what is this film about? Is it about troubled and self-destructive youth,
the soullessness of the corporate world, or the role of love and friendship
in modern society? The answer you have to find for yourself, but one thing
is certain: "Fight Club" is a lasting and forceful emotional statement about
modern society.
Written by Alex Ioshpe 

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
Cast:  Kevin Spacey, Anette Bening, Thora Birch, Wes Bentley, Mena Suvari,
Chris Cooper (I)
'American Beauty' is one of those films that leave a huge emotional impact
that remains for days after you have seen it. Seldom have I seen such
marvelous characters, each somehow representing an important puzzle piece of
our modern society. And it is not often you get to experience a film where
virtually every actor is giving an award worthy performance. The story
itself is a constantly surprising, complex and ingeniously spinned web of
events, ideas, characters, thoughts and feelings.
The hero in the story is Lester (Kevin Spacey). He is working in a
respectable firm, lives in a great neighborhood, has a beautiful wife and a
sweet daughter. He is living the American dream -- or so it seems. The truth
is that Lester is hated by his daughter, ignored by his wife and is
"expendable" at work. His wife, Carolyn (Anette Bening) is so perfect that
her garden shears are coordinated with her footwear. She is a successful
real state agent, happy and content -- or so it seems. Actually Carolyn is a
neurotic woman, unsuccessful in work and family. She has simply forgotten
what it is to feel alive. His daughter, Jane (Thora Birch) is a lonely and
unhappy girl that lives in a certain apathy, longing to leave home. Her
friend, Angela (Mena Suvari) is the blond beauty that is the school's main
attraction. A girl that is dreaming o becoming a model. Her motto is "There
is nothing worse than being ordinary". The truth is that she has never dated
a single boy and her love affairs have been fiction and lies that she used
to seem attractive and unordinary. Those are the main characters, but there
are others that add color and meaning to the story. There is an ex-Marine
officer (Chris Cooper) that collects nazi stuff and has some radical
thoughts about gays. He is a tuff, angry, almost sadistic man that tests
tests his son, Ricky (Wes Bentley ) for drugs, taking a urine sample every
six months and beating the shit out of him for no obvious reasons. In the
end it becomes clear that he is gay himself. Ricky is the good and polite
son at home, but spends his time to change jobs and selling drugs and
basically any whatever his "clients" wish for.
What starts as parallel stories soon float into each other, creating a web
of misunderstandings that are nothing less than bizarre. Lester is
unwillingly dragged along by his wife to see his daughter perform as a
cheerleader. And it is here he sees his angel, his key to instant bliss and
happiness, the only thing that makes him feel alive. The only trouble is
that she is Angela. There are so many events that it is impossible and
unnecessary to sum them up, they have to be experienced. The film ends with
a finale that is so intense and powerful that it is simply unforgettable.
"American Beauty" is not only a Lolita-kind of story. It is a tale about a
man waking up after 30 years of apathy and numbness, thinking about what
happened to your life.  It is a man that wants to bring some of his dreams,
hopes and fantasies to life - a simple wish to live again, to feel alive.
Off course there is more to it. It is basically a story about or society --
under the facade of obvious happiness and success, hides a different
reality. It is about the fact that image and success mean everything, and
are worth sacrificing your own identity and happiness. What we are trying to
hide is our humanity -- our true feelings, our actual thoughts and dreams --
the very things that make us human.
This theme is rather familiar and parallels to films as "Fight Club" and
"Eyes Wide Shut" can be drawn. Like "Fight Club", "American Beauty"
gracefully balances between tragic drama and amusing comedy, never becoming
boring or sentimental -- a kind of feeling like laughing through tears. Both
films are brilliantly written and spectacularly acted and both present our
society in a rather bad light. So it almost seems that they are equal, but
not quite. David Fincher's description of society is sharper, darker, deeper
and far more controversial, because of its unique style and daring story.
Sam Mendes doesn't go that far and he doesn't break any barriers or open new
doors. "Fight lub" didn't only capture the three dimentionality  and essence
of the problem, but provided also the consequences of our actions and
showing us the path towards which we are heading. Mendes doesn't do that. He
is simply scratching the surface and never goes as deep as Fincher. That is
why "American Beauty" will be popular at the Academy Awards, and "Fight
Club" will not.
Acting (as I've mentioned at least a hundred times) is wonderful. This may
be Kevin Spacy's finest, most colorful and mature performance. A natural and
intelligent approach that simply strengthens the film. Likewise is Anette
Bening. A rather unexpected depth and understanding that she portrays in
such an easy manner, that it is simply a joy to watch. The other cast
members are weaker, but still amazing. Especially Wes Bentley as the
romantic, dreamy young man that sees outstanding beauty in everything. I am
confident that a bright future in Hollywood awaits this promising, young
actor. The technical side of the film is likewise perfect. A brilliant
cinematography, magnificent editing and a stimulating musical score wrap the
whole thing up into an unforgettable and fascinating film that deserves both
attention and appreciation.


Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
John Murdoch (Sewell) awakens alone in a strange hotel to find that he is
wanted for a series of brutal murders. The problem is that he can't remember
whether he committed the murders or not. In fact, most of his memories have
completely vanished, and for one brief moment, he is convinced that he has
gone stark raving mad. Pursued by Detective Bumstead (Hurt), Murdoch seeks
to unravel the twisted riddle of his identity. As he edges closer to solving
the mystery, he stumbles upon a fiendish underworld controlled by a group of
ominous beings collectively known as The Strangers . These shadow-like,
soulless creatures are on a quest to emulate humanity. They control Dark
City, freezing  time every night to rearrange the skyline and warp every
resident's mind to find out what  makes us "tick". These gothic figures
possess the ability to alter people's perceptions, by changing their
memories -- a process known as Tuning. Through an evolutionary anomaly,
Murdoch is also imbued with this power and thus, he alone is able to resist
The Stangers' control over his mind.. And for that, he must be destroyed.
With the help of the inscrutable Doctor Schreber (Sutherland), Murdoch is
able to stay a step ahead of his adversaries while he slowly pieces together
the labyrinthine puzzle of his past -- his bittersweet childhood, his love
for his estranged wife Emma (Connelly) and the key to a hideous series of
murders which he is suspected of committing.
Eternal night, strange skyscrapers that morph from the ground, while the
unknowing citizens get their memories changed every 24 hours. This is a
surreal, bizarre and effectively paranoid sci-fi thriller that will please
the neo-noir fans. Unlike most of the films of its genre, "Dark City" does
not have any action sequences or endless gunfights. It is more like a dark a
nd moody meditation. What makes us human? What is individuality? Is it
simply a collection of memories that make us what we are? Will a man that
has got memories of a killer continue the horrifying practice? Or is it
something deeper, something you can not change, take or label? Is that what
we call soul?
In a film like this, atmosphere is the key. Alex Proyas understands that.
Directing with as little light as possible and using only the shades of
gray, black and dark green, he manages to create a cold and unfriendly
world, which is a bizarre mixture of countless time periods and ages - a
world of eternal night, lit up only by the colorful memories. This world is
more like a zoo - a laboratory where it is we who are being researched by a
superior and far more advanced race.
Visually the film is remarkable, presenting a graceful cinematography,
gothic architecture, '50s costumes, interesting art direction and a dose of
impressive special effects. The acting is also a key factor and it is
nothing more than acceptable, although it is impossible to call any of the
performances spectacular. Regrettably the characters in "Dark City" are not
very developed and there are some disturbing holes in the plot, that some
will find disturbing. After a spectacular and completely unexpected
revelation that lifts the film to new hight, the finale that follows is
rather disappointing, simplified and almost alienated from the rest of the
picture.
This film has received a rather cold welcome from the critics and was
underrated and overseen for no reason. Several failures during these 100
minutes, prevent me from giving this film a top mark. However, this is truly
a thrilling and inspiring production, that will probably stand as an example
of a good science fiction film in the years that come.
Written by Alex Ioshpe (C) 1998 (ioshpe@online.no)

Title
Review for Patriot, The (2000)
DIRECTED BY: Roland Emerich
WRITTEN BY: Robert Rodat
CAST: Mel Gibson, Heath Ledger, Joely Richardson, Jason Isaacs, Chris Cooper
1776. South Carolina. Benjamin Martin (Mel Gibson) is  the legendary "Hero of Fort Wilderness". He has portrayed his patriotism and courage in many a battle. Now he is retired from his dark past and spends his days with his children. But times are uncertain. In the north, lightning from the storm clouds of war against the Crown have already touched off brush fires. The Colonies are calling are searching for volunteers to join the regular army. A longing for freedom is in the air. The country mobilizes against the British in an attempt to gain independence. Ben's oldest son Gabriel (Heath Ledger), dreams of becoming a soldier and fight for freedom. His father's objections do not prevent him from leaving home and exchange his peaceful life for an uncertain and carnival everyday life on the battlefield. But the good spirits and the glorious patriotism slowly fade away when the fierce British armies occupy the States, proving the resistance to be helpless. Led by the incredibly ev!
il Col. Tavington (Jason Isaacs), the soldiers burn Ben's house and kill one of his sons, despite of the fact that Ben has been helping wounded Englishmen. In Ben this awakens a gruesome rage and hunger for revenge. He takes up arms along side his idealistic son, and leads the Militia into a battle of freedom. Soon many hear about the successful crusade, which awakens a spark of hope in the American souls... 
Robert Rodat's ("Saving Private Ryan") script drags for all too long, making even the magnificent battles and Kirk M. Petruchelli's beautiful set design look tiring. Besides the fact that his story is not historically accurate, it is not structured in an even manner. There are some logical irrationalities along the way. There is no natural float or balance in the story line. The events progress either too fast or far too slowly. None of the characters represent anything besides their excessive patriotism. The love story feels as it has been inserted into the script along the way. There is no sensuality, emotions, meaning or realism in this relationship, which comes as unexpected as thunder from a clear sky.
With Mel Gibson's name on the marquee, comparisons with Braveheart are unavoidable. In fact, the role of Benjamin Martin appears to be an attempt to create "Braveheart 2" and find another William Wallace-like part for the high profile actor. Unfortunately, the script doesn't provide enough tension, fury and intelligence to be even compared to the likes of 'Braveheart'. Emirich's most successful picture "Independence Day" succeeds in being exactly what it is supposed to be -- a light popcorn-entertainment. 'The Patriot' does not, because Emerich aims higher than his capabilities. His film does not depict the important historic events with a sense of realism. Instead it glorifies them with magical images, terrible villains and noble heroes that risk their lives for a greater cause. In other words, Emerich turned the fight for freedom into MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE. You almost expect 007 or Godzilla to appear from the shadows.
As a historical film with a lot of modern action, 'The Patriot' challenges "Gladiator", but looses the duel immediately. Neither the plot, script or acting can measure up. And even its visual abilities, that are grand, with Caleb Deschanel's rich cinematography, and very decent costume design by Deborah Lynn Scott, can't quite measure up to Ridley Scott's epic. 'The Patriot's main fault is that it is too patriotic. It's too preachy with its simple symbolism and stereotypical melodrama. Every frame is drained in sticky patriotism, which makes it at times tough to bare. Picture this: Mel Gibson dodges bullets and runs right through the battlefield as soldiers die around him. As he nobly kills his virtually unstoppable and evil nemesis, his eyes turn to the sunset where his brave men are running with American flags towards the frightened Englishmen. All of this is of course accompanied by John Williams' loud and patriotic fanfare that rises above the screams of victory. And thus,!
 no matter how hard Gibson tries to recapture his golden moments of 'Braveheart' and no matter how honest Ledger delivers his lines, nothing can save this film from being a pompous cliché. It's big, it's beautiful, it's expensive, it's well acted, but it's not very convincing. Starting seriously and impressively, Emerich soon tiers and resorts to what he does best -- brainless, but occasionally entertaining popcorn films. 'The Patriot' has its moments. The beautiful shots of the sea and war galleons in the sunset and a couple of emotionally charging moments, such as when Ben teaches his sons to kill, but mostly it remains a pompous, unreal and seldom exciting celebration of the way to the America that we know today. Of course I could be disappointed, but what can we expect from the director of 'Godzilla'? 

Title
Review for Bone Collector, The (1999)

DIRECTED BY: Phillip Noyce
WRITTEN BY: Jeremy Iacone, based on the book by Jeffery Deaver
CAST: Denzel Washington, Angelina Joilie, Queen Latifah, Ed O'Neill
MPAA: Rated R for strong violent content including grisly images, and for language.
Runtime: USA:118
After David Fincher's "Se7en" (1997), there have been several attempts to create a film similar in story and impact, but without any success. "Fallen" (1998), "Resurrection" (1998) and "Kiss the Girls" (1998) are some.  The latest is 'The Bone Collector' (1999!), which is like most of its predecessors a failure. The directors of these films have all tried to copy every aspect of Fincher's work: a dark detective story, lots of violence, a gritty atmosphere and impressive cast. But though they all shot during night, had the most inventive murderers and murders (that successfully got them the necessary R-rating) they were unable to produce the most important, that what you can not copy -- talent. 
The plot is a collection of stereotypes beginning with the brilliant policeman, philosopher and writer Lincoln Rhyme (Denzel Washington) who, under the investigation broke his spine and lies now at home, where he is taken care of the good nurse (Queen Latifah) and friend (Gary Swanson ). He and the rest of the inhabitants of New York city are oblivious of the psycho-killer that realms the streets, picking up his victims in a cab and murdering them using the most ancient methods. One of these innocent victim's body is found by Amelia Donaghy (Angelina Joilie), who has handled the episode with such professionalism that it catches Rhyme's attention. The police, led by 'Bundy''s Ed O'Neill (I) is helpless and it is up to Rhyme and his young apprentice to catch the killer.. 
The story is filled with mysterious leads, bizarre puzzles and devastating events, but who cares? It just isn't interesting. It doesn't have any drive to it. There is nothing that this movie can boast of. It approaches familiar themes and enters explored territories, but it doesn't have neither the intensity and dark philosophy of "Se7en" or the sophistication of "Silence of the Lambs". I think it's time for the directors to realize that there has to be a point, at least some intelligence in the story, besides the murders, chases and darkness. Apparently that element was forgotten. None of the performances are worthy of notice, the cinematography is a poor copy of Darius Khondji    (Seven), the editing is average, the music a cliche. In fact the whole film feels like a clone, an unsuccessful mutation of all the psycho-thrillers that we've seen before. Joilie and Washington are unable to look as a potential couple, unable to generate tension, yet alone drive the story forward. !
The other actors act as they are just waiting for their paychecks. The sets are dark, but unreal. And the whole film looks staged, pointless and even phony at times. Even the awaited ending is a disappointment. This is the classic example of an artistic failure, but it certainly doesn't mean that it's completely unwatchable. It is a film for a rainy day and two free hours when you do not know what to do. And then you just may insert this cassette into your VCR, press PLAY and let Washington and Joilie guide you on a pointless, but occasionally enjoyable ride through the dark streets of New York. 

Title
Review for Pitch Black (2000)
DIRECTED BY: David N. Twohy
WRITTEN BY: Jim and Ken Wheat
CAST: Radha Mitchell, Vin Diesel, Cole Hauser, Keith David (I)
MPAA: Rated R for sci-fi violence and gore, and for language
Runtime: USA:112 (unrated version)
Weirdly cool, coolly weird, beautifully stupid, Pitch Black opens with
a bang. A slam, actually, as a damaged spaceship under the direction
of a brisk pilot named Fry (Radha Mitchell - the Ripley of this story)
makes a crash landing onto an unknown planet. On it is a killer (Vin
Diesel), a bounty hunter, a stockbroker, a brat boy and a couple of
Muslim pilgrims -- all on the same ship. And they were all going
somewhere (where exactly the screenwriters do not know). The rest of
the crew is killed; the passengers are all shook up and emerge ahead
of schedule from their transport comas, blinking and bleeding in a
seemingly lifeless planet with three suns, which seems completely
abandoned. But once in 22 years darkness falls and strange creatures
emerge from the ground. Now they all have to trust a killer who can
see in the dark. What happens next you can guess.
The film is shaped in the image of Ridley Scott's "Alien", but has a
couple of inventions of its own. These are of course not associated
with story or character development, but instead concern the visual
aspect. "The Arrivial"-director David Twohy creates a chillingly
effective atmosphere with light, shade and color combinations,
bringing to ''Pitch Black'' the disorienting thrill of a world turned
upside down. The film works best at the very beginning, when every
character and scene is a mystery, and we, along side with the
characters, experience a creepy notion of paranoia -- a fear of the
unknown and a sense of something (or someone) lurking beneath. But
then Twohy decides to turn off the originality and everything becomes
pitch black. It is sad that films like this are regarded as science
fiction, where the special effects are the heart of the movie, around
witch the rest is built. With a script being on the same intellectual
level as "Lost in Space" , it's hard to make a decent movie. Even the
story itself doesn't stand any criticism (and I am not talking about
the lucky landing or the perfect timing either). The planet doesn't
give any impression of being alien. Somehow resembling the planet
Tatooine from George Lucas' "Star Wars", it has the perfect
environment for human beings -- temperature, surface and air. Is this
convenient or what? There are other disturbing problems. Since it's
dark only once in 22 years wouldn't it be more likely that the
creatures would fear darkness and not sunlight? And considering that
the planet is completely dead on the surface, do these creatures eat
at all? Or are they completely dependant on human visitors?
Considering these (and many more!) irrationalities, it's impossible to
watch this film as a science fiction. However, this movie is an
excellent choice for horror and action lovers. The acting is decent,
the effects are cool, the action is well coordinated - what more do
can you want from a popcorn-film? Vin Diesel ("Saving Private Ryan")
is very spooky as the feared murderer, being some sort of Hannibal
Lecter-meets-Rambo kind of guy, with his eyes glaring in the darkness
like a hyena. Midchell is likewise very effective with a couple of
strong scenes and emotional outbursts. The rampaging aliens,
meanwhile, look something like flying hammerhead sharks and behave
like a flock of vampire bats and they squawk ''reeee-reee-reee!'' as
they pounce and devour. True, we haven't seen that before. But does it
really matter? The concept is known and that's enough. And though I
did enjoy some of what was presented in "Pitch Black", I have seen it
all before.

Title
Review for Kundun (1997)
MPAA: Rated PG-13 for violent images.
"I think that  I am a reflection of the moon in the water. When you see me, and I am trying to be a good man, you see yourself". 
- The 14th Dalai Lama, "Kundun" 
The sons of Genghis Khan gave the Dalai Lama his name. It means "Ocean
of Wisdom". In a wartorn Asia, Tibetans have practiced non-violence
for over a thousand years. The Dalai Lama is their ruler. He is the
human manifestation of the Buddha of Compassion.
In 1933 the 13th Dalai Lama died. Four years later, a holy man,
disguised as a servant, found himself in a far corner of Tibet. He was
searching for the 14th Dalai Lama. His search was almost at an end.
Undoubtedly one of the greatest achievements of the year, 'Kundun' is
a rare cinematic experience, that intoxicates you with its majestic
poetry, beauty and spiritual symbolism. It is also the most
unexpected, coming from a director whose style and history makes him
the last possible choice ( with the exception of directors such as
nJames Cameron and Roland Emerich) for a picture such as this. The
director is Martin Scorsese. Yes, the same Martin Scorsese that gave
you 'Raging Bull', 'Taxi Driver' , 'Goodfellas' and 'Casino' . Believe
me, there is nothing in his latest picture that suggests that you're
watching 'A Martin Scorsese Film', with the exception of the
incredible talent that he has with storytelling.
``Kundun'' is structured as the life of the 14th Dalai Lama, but he is
simply a vessel for a larger life or spirit, continuing through
centuries. That is the film's strength, and its curse. It provides a
deep spirituality, but denies the Dalai Lama humanity; he is permitted
certain little human touches, but is essentially an icon, not a
man. His human needs are therefore completely overseen by his advisors
and teachers. The sudden transition from being a child to becoming the
spiritual ruler of Tibet, does have a terrible price. The tragedy is
of course the complete alienation from the world that this little boy
knew, from his parents and friends. The loss of childhood and humanity
comes simultaneously with the demand of the impossible from a child:
wisdom, rightisnous, commitment and purity of soul. The Chinese have
invaded Tibet. Kundun, frightened and confused, asks his advisors in
disappear: ``What can I do? I'm only a boy.'' His advisers say, ``You
have chosen to be born again. You must know what to do.'' Unlike
Scorsese's portrait of Jesus in ``The Last Temptation of Christ,''
this is not a man striving for perfection, but perfection in the shape
of a man. The film is made of episodes, not a plot. It is like
illustrations bound into the book of a life. Most of the actors are
real Tibetan Buddhists, and their serenity in many scenes casts a
spell.
There is a world somewhere that doesn't base itself on war, where
technology does not exist. Where people live in total harmony with
nature that surrounds them. Majestic mountains, that shine like
gigantic diamonds in the sunlight, cast silver sparkles into the
waters that are as clear as the mountain-air. A castle of colors and
light can be seen in the horizon. Indeed the production designer Dante
Feretti ('Dracula', "Interview With The Vampire") has created a world
of mystique and color that is more magical than any fairytale. His set
and costume design proves invaluable, providing the unformed clay that
the cinematographer Roger Deakins ('Fargo') moulds with light and
shade, adding life and emotion to Feretti's mystical structures. It's
exceptionally beautiful, almost hypnotizing -- a swirl of sound and
illumination. Philip Glass' score, composed using native Tibetan
instrumentation, enhances the rarefied atmosphere. Glass's familiar
compositional techniques are wedded on Kundun to a sensitive use of
ethnic instruments and the voices of the Gyuto Monks, adding an aura
of spiritual power missing from most Hollywood fare. The incredible
blend of technical and visual achievements form a collection of
magical images of pure artistic wizardry that will hold you under
Scorsese's spell for these 2 hours .
Scorsese's picture is not a film that debates about the dogmas of
Buddhism, nor does it concentrate on the battle between religion and
politics. But it does clearly depict how the control of the
totalitarian system kills all hope, magic and individuality. It does
also portray the contrast between the ancient world and the
'progressive' society, clearly symbolized by the silent battle between
heavenly colors of light and the void of darkness. Is it possible to
survive without conflicts and war, and uphold the ancient traditions
in our rapidly changing world? Most of all it is a spiritual
journey. Scorsese opens the door to a world beyond our reach and
comprehension. A way of life so different from ours that it gives us
the opportunity to meditate over our western life style and
society. It is simply one of the most magical, rare films that have
entered the silver screen for some time.

Title
Review for Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2 (2000)
DIRECTED BY: Joe Berlinger
WRITTEN BY: Joe Berlingerand Andrew Birkin
CAST: Jeffrey Donovan, Erica Leerhsen, Tristine Skyler, Stephen Barker Turner, Kim Director
MPAA: Rated R for violence, language, sexuality and drug use.
Runtime: USA:90
"The Blair Witch Project" was perhaps one of a kind, a unique film
that played completely on its own merit, managing to scare even the
most experienced horror fans out of their senses. Its success made a
sequel inevitable, but this is not the sequel, I suspect, anyone much
wanted.
After the release of "The Blair Witch Project", tourists have
practically invaded the small town of Burkettsville, in order to get a
glimpse of the Blair Witch. Locals have turned this mass hysteria into
a great business opportunity, selling twig-sculptures, stones and dirt
like those in the movie, and the exasperated local sheriff patrols the
woods with a bullhorn, shouting, "Get out of these woods and go home!
There is no goddamned Blair Witch!". Jeff () is one of those people,
who has used the sudden popularity of the small town to his
advantage. After he got released from the mental institution, he
created a mobile business that attracts thousands of customers through
the Internet. As the movie starts he is leading one of these groups
into the woods, on the "Blair Witch Hunt". Among the five strangers is
Stephen and his girlfriend, the pregnant Tristen, who are writing a
book on the hysteria caused by the film called "The Blair Witch:
History or Hysteria?", and Kim, who dresses in black and has some
psychic powers. The last member of the crew is Erica, a young
beautiful witch-wannabe, who constantly quotes from the Wiccan lore,
saying "The first rule of Wicca is, do no harm, because whatever you
do will come back to you threefold." This strange group plunges into
the woods, where they begin to argue about their different approaches
to the experience. On the very first night that they decide to spend
under the stars amidst the ruins of Parr's abandoned house, strange
things start happening. When they wake up their equipment is gone and
only the tapes remain. After a while they discover strange markings on
their bodies. They are somehow lost in time, as it loops
uncontrollably back and forth. They are all haunted by hallucinations
and horrible nightmares and soon they can not see the difference
between dreams and reality. The only thing that they are sure of is
that they have brought something or someone with them from the woods..
Documentary director Joe Berlinger ("Paradice Lost") helms "Blair
Witch 2", leaving the creators of the first film (Dan Myrick and Ed
Sanches) in the background. The opening scenes--the documentary
showing the townspeople affected by the first film-- is a more
promising approach, because instead of trying to cover similar ground,
it goes outside the first film and makes its own stand. But soon the
movie gets confused and sidetracked by its own story, that is never
resolved and ends with a very anticlimaxic epilogue. In a way, this is
a typical Hollywood sequel. More money has been spent and more people
have worked on a project that was doomed to fail. The horror and
suspense of the original simply could not be repeated. Of course in
these situations, quantity is more important than quality and profit
is more important than the artistical values. From its opening scenes
when the camera gracefully panes over the bloody-red forest, with
Carter Burwell's ("Being John Malkovich" and "Fargo") musical score in
the background, you realize that with the exception of its title, this
film has absolutely nothing to do with "The Blair Witch
Project". "Blair Witch.." was filmed by handheld videocameras and
nfeatured acting that was mostly based on improvisation. In the sequel
the technical aspect of the film is close to perfection, creating a
completely different atmosphere. With its graceful cinematography,
production design and flashy editing, the film has a very polished
look, which is impossible to associate with the first installment. And
though Berlinger directs his film with an energy and pace that makes
the adrenaline rush through the body a couple of times, he has
obviously misunderstood the nature of his predecessor. The key is
simplicity. "Blair Witch Project" had a story which was incredibly
simple. That allowed the audience to fill the gaps with our own
imagination. The film was practically an empty screen, on which we
projected our most frightening nightmares. The effect was incredibly
powerful, lasting and entir e everyone, but in a different way. "Book
of Shadows" feels incredibly controlled and restrict. Here, very
little is left to our imagination and the story is so complex and
"clever" that the screenwriters are the first to get lost in it. There
is is no book of shadows and no conclusion that we can be satisfied
with. This is simply a less artistic film that doesn't have the talent
and originality of its predecessor. It resorts to fancy cinematography
and special effects to create the right effect and doesn't always
succeed. But most importantly: it stands on its own ground and has
almost no connection with the first movie, which doesn't allow it to
destroy the original. In the end, I can't call it a bad effort. It's
less artistic, not so scary and less original, but certainly not
bad. It's simply different. In fact, if you haven't seen "The Blair
Witch Project", you might like this film for what it is -- a cross
between "The Blair Witch Project" and the "Scream"-films. The only
element that remains constant and similar between the two films is the
solid acting (Jeffrey Donovan and Tristine Skyler should be mentioned)
and incredible sense of surrealism. But it's a common knowledge and
experience that, with a few exceptions, every movie sequel is worse
than the original and some are even not worth making. To me the story
of "The Blair Witch Project" seemed completed, but there are obviously
no limits to commercial success that "The Book of Shadows" is
certainly assured. And it's already time to look forward to "Blair
Witch 3".

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
Probably the most popular and praised film of all time, turned out to be a
primitive and predictable costume drama with a dose of social criticism.
Everyone knows about the greatest and most famous shipping disaster of all
time. And the actual catastrophe is masterfully crafted by director James
Cameron, combining visual -and sound effects, he re-creates the frightening
atmosphere of the sinking ship in the middle of nowhere. I liked very much
the emotional and brutal contrast between the first and the third classes.
While their cabin is slowly filling up with water, a mother is telling her
children a fairytail -- "..and they lived happily ever after..". And then
the ship goes down and the few survivors are left alone under the stars and
the chilling air.
However, the actual disaster is happening almost at the end of the movie,
while the first two hours are just beautiful sets and bad dialogues.
In the present day, the RMS Titanic is explored by Brock Lovett (Bill
Paxton), a treasure seeker looking for the Coeur de la Mer diamond, lost
during the sinking.
Somewhere inside the ship, Lovett's crew discover a sketchbook of an artist
long dead. Here, in the shape of a nude young lady, is a window into the
distant age of 1912. Lovett is extremely surprised when he get's a phone
call from Rose Dawson, claiming that she is a model. She is immediately
helicoptered onto the vessel, and she gets the first glimpse of the fated
ship in 80 years. As the memories come flooding back, she once again becomes
Rose DeWitt Buketer (Kate Winslet), the fiancée of wealthy Cal Hockley
(Billy Zane) and daughter of Ruth DeWitt Bukater (Frances Fisher). On board
there are rich and poor, everyone trust in the ship's designer (Jonathan
Hyde) and her master, Captain E.J. Smith (Bernard Hill).
On board the ship, Rose, unhappy and restless meets Jack (Leonardo
DiCaprio) - a young American artist, poor, brave and attractive. A love
story slowly emerges and the two lovers must not only experience the
difference between the social classes, but also face the greatest power on
earth - death.
Cameron could as well have called his picture "The Never ending Love" or
"Love at First Sight", as he concentrates all his energy on the young
couple, and not on the disaster itself.
The plot is anything but original and the dialogues sometimes resemble a
television soap-opera. The director doesn't even try to overcome his empty
script.
Because of its primitive and predictable plot, Titanic is totally depending
on the visuals that truly are breathtaking. Russel Carpenter's rich,
majestic and incredibly detailed cinematography is certainly award-worthy.
Everything from art direction to visual and sound effects are a top notch.
But it doesn't help much when the costumes are more convincing than the
actors who wear them. The actors are not to blame, because their characters
are more like caricatures, in other words - fake. Jack is a man with many
talents: he is a talented artist, handsome, brave, honest, strong,
funny...you name it. He doesn't have any dark side, he doesn't make any
mistakes, that for a second would make him human. Jack is perfect, but he
is - poor. On the other hand we have Cal. He is a bastard that treats Rose
as an odalisque and not as his wife-to-be. He lacks everything Jack
possesses, but he is -- rich. This childish contrast between the social
classes is one of those things that makes Titanic nothing more than a
mediocre picture.
Cameron knows precisely what we want to see. His film therefore contains
certain minimums to draw an audience - attractive actors, a "tragic love
story", beautiful visuals (including expensive special effects), a dose of
social criticism, a fascinating historical event (we love true stories) and
last, but not least - an incredible media support, which proclaimed an
average picture the "greatest film of all time".
On the outside Titanic looks perfect, but behind that sparkling curtain of
incredible visuals - is emptiness - nothing to think about. The main
weakness of this film, which ironically became its success, is simplicity.
Cameron enables our basic and if you wish - primitive emotions: love, hate,
fear and helplessness.
Everyone understands the power of love and the threat to our beautiful
couple is likewise imaginable - a sinking ship.
Titanic is a typical Hollywood production, totally and completely dependent
on visual perfection to hide its primitive plot. It's a good picture, but
absolutely not a masterpiece. It's among hundreds and thousands good films
released every year, not better or worse than the average American film.

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
WINNER OF 3 GOLDEN APOLLO AWARD
INCLUDING BEST ART DIRECTION AND BEST CINEMATOGRAPHY
"Villainy wears many masks, none of which are more dangerous than virtue."
Ichabod Crane, SLEEPY HOLLOW
Imagine: Sherelock Holmes encounters a mystery, where murder and other
unexplained events are caused by no human, but truly a supernatural force.
"Sleepy Hollow" begins in New York. The year is 1799. The new millenium is
right around the corner and the progress of science and technology has no
limits. The virtuous constable Ichobod Crane (Johnny Depp ), reflects that
mentality and stands as a symbol for the upcoming era, a man ahead of his
time in his belief in scientific evidence and forensics, at the dawn of a
new century of enlightenment -- a sophisticated and moral man, who has
chosen the police work of noble and even poetic reasons. Ichobod likes to
think of himself as a progressive citizen, a pioneer of his work and a
scientist of the modern world. His scientific inventions and humanistic
attitude has become a problem for his superiors. He is therefore sent to
investigate an ancient and unsolved mystery. A row of bizarre murders in an
isolated village, called Sleepy Hollow, where victims have been found in the
woods..decapitated. As Ichobod nobly accepts this task, he finds himself in
a completely different world, a parallel universe, where logic doesn't exist
and science can't help. The frightened villagers reveal the shocking truth
of a demon, a headless horseman that haunts the woods. Determined to
discover the "true identity of the assassin", and paying no attention to the
warnings, he continues to investigate, using his scientific inventions.
While heads continue to fly, Crane experiences frightening childhood visions
of his own, remembering things he wanted to forget. His science and
technology, on which he depended on, show no results, and all he believed
in, slowly fades away. He is on the brink of a complete mental breakdown,
when he falls in love with a mysterious beauty (Christina Ricci ), who
wishes to help him in his quest. Ichobod continues to blindly trust in logic
and reason, until he goes into the dark woods and sees the demon for
himself..
Andrew Kevin Walker ("Se7en" ) and Kevin Yagher have both done a great job,
transforming Washington Irving's primitive ghost story ("The Legend of
Sleepy Hollow") into a likable film. But it is director Tim Burton that has
made it into a memorable experience. He has created a staggering and
beautiful magical world, which is nothing less than a visual feast. This is
simply the most beautiful and visually enchanting film since Francis Ford
Copolla's Dracula. This being the case, it is not hard to guess that the
visual power of this film overshadows the acting, which by the way is
surprisingly convincing. Johnny Depp is fabulous as the confused scientist.
A delightful and fresh performance, combining high humor with some serious
psychological themes. Christina Ricci is solid but a little less impressive
than she has been of late, but she gracefully floats in her role as a clean,
kind hearted white witch who captures Ichabod's heart -- an untamed, free
spirit of the wild. Ichobod and Katrina are completely different souls,
completing each other with their opposites. Their love story is one of the
key elements in the film, but it is the personal evolution of Ichobod Crane
that is its heart. And as the story progresses, we learn more about him and
his past. He is a man blinded by science and naively believing in
technology, reason, logic and simple explanations. Although he would like to
think otherwise, his vision is rather limited and primitive. As he enters
this strange parallel universe, he doesn't know what to do, how to react or
how to explain the events happening around him. This, his aristocratic
origin, dry wit and emotional inexperience serves both as terrifying horror,
philosophical thoughts and comic relief. Caught between dream and reality,
he takes a step into another world and another life...
Like "Don Quixote", "Sleepy Hollow" is a bittersweet parable about the
perils of the imagination as it's affected by reading or hearing stories.
Like Copolla's Dracula, this is a surreal filmatic experience -- a fairytale
vision. Sleepy Hollow is a place lost in time, somewhere between dream and
reality. There's no one that can copy Burton in his work. His exceptional
visual imagination allows him to create wonders on virtually every shot.
There's something undeniably touching about such unreasonable passion and
devotion, and I suppose some of the same sort of piety can be found in
Sleepy Hollow. All his movies have the fervent fanaticism of a cult taste
projected into the mainstream with affection as well as confidence. He
creates a dark and moody atmosphere of contrasts and symbolism. Seeking
balance, Burton paints a landscape of extreme contrasts, purely good and
evil; the man of science, that keeps his feet on the ground, and the woman
of nature, a wild spirit that flows with the wind, are set against the
landscape, which is a reflection of mood and atmosphere -- and what a
magical landscape it is! The only problem is that the film gets rather
unfocused after the all-too-traditional climax, where evil is unmasked and
good prevail. But then again, this is a fairytale.
Sleepy Hollow presents a magical art direction, enchanting cinematography,
moody musical score and some fabulous visual effects--a ravishing visual
experience, and an entertaining and interesting detective story, with the
right dose of horror, romance and humor. This film is a thrilling ride back
to the turn of the 19th century.

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
DIRECTED BY: Edward Norton
WRITTEN BY: Stuart Blumberg
CAST: Edward Norton, Ben Stiller, Jenna Elfman, Milos Forman, Eli Wallach, Anne Bancroft
MPAA: Rated PG-13 for some sexuality and language
Runtime: USA:128
"Faith is a hunch that there is something bigger" 
OK, listen to this. The priest and a rabbi go to a barHeard this
one? Well, here comes a story that you've never heard before. In his
directorial debut, actor/director/producer Edward Norton combines all
those "So, there's a Rabbi and a Priest" jokes together in a
magnificent spiritual comedy that is probably the first great comedy
of this century.
The film opens with the lights of New York on a warm summer
night. Father Brian, drunk and depressed is confiding to the
kind-hearted bartender. At this point we know that something has
happened and Brian tells the story of complications and events, both
amusing and sad. He begins his story many years ago - at the beginning
of the lifelong friendship between him, Jake Shram (Ben Stiller) and
Anna (Jenna Elfman). It was the best time of his life. But all good
things have to end and Anna moved to L.A. by the end of the eight
grade. Many years have passed and their friendship stayed the same,
though Brian has become a Catholic priest and Jake a rabbi. All around
Manhattan, these hipsters of the cloth are known, according to Finn's
narration, as the "God Squad," serving up "Old World gods with a New
Age spin." Everything's holy-rolling along until the unanticipated
return of Anna (Jenna Elfman), she is now a successful business
woman. The two clerics experience a feeling of deja-vu and gradually
fall in love with Anna all over again. But this time there are
complications. Brian is caught in the strict laws of the Catholic
Church, while Jake is pursued by the 'Kosher Nostra', where every
Jewish mother is introducing him to her every unmarried daughter. And
even Anna starts to doubt herself and her life. She is now a
high-powered, West Coast corporate executive -- a goal she has been
pursuing all her life. And when she finally got everything she
searched for, she is feeling a mysterious loss. Maybe she was pursuing
the wrong things? Maybe she missed the most important element in her
life? And so what is right? Religion or love? What is happiness? And
what's more important?
Even though this film lacks explosions, gunfights and even aliens, I
can't imagine anyone (except maybe 'Battlefield Earth'-fanatics) who
wouldn't like this film. There is no concrete story. The film is
completely driven by characters as they wrestle with their own demons
and questions of faith. The characters that inhabit Norton's film are
deeply human and therefore -- deeply flawed. They've all come to
certain conclusions about themselves, and each other, that this daffy
flick challenges in an amusing way. Most of the time the film feels
like a Woody Allen movie, without hysterics. It is the same comic
style and incredible New York locations. In fact the town itself is
one of the main characters in this film. Its multicultural environment
serves as a background, reflecting the main characters' emotions,
feelings and mood - shifting from lifeless gray to magically sparkling
lights. Norton doesn't manufacture comedy through jokes, nor is the
drama progressed by plot contrivances; this is a character-driven
story that evolves from the carefully drawn people that inhabit
it. And though it wrestles around with some heavy issues, romantic,
religious and ethnic themes, it is very successful. It's funny,
without constantly resorting to physical humor (like 'Whole Nine
Yards'). It's clever, without pushing and lecturing the audience (like
'28 Days'). It's light, without feeling unrealistic. It's romantic,
without floating in the sky (like 'The Wedding Singer'). In fact
Norton has created a magical blend - beautifully controlled and
elegantly presented. He approaches every aspect - each scene,
character and theme - with honesty and authenticity. You laugh because
it's candid, you catch a lump in your throat because it connects, and
you're moved because the emotions are undeniably real. Nothing ever
feels constructed, every single moment rings true, and you find
yourself identifying with everyone and nearly everything that occurs,
or at least with the emotions behind them. Norton keeps everything
pure, and the end result like life. It is a rare comedy, more
sophisticated than most, it is filled with surprising depth and
substantial charm, that you can rarely observe in motion pictures now
adays.
'Keeping the Faith' features great casting, which is likewise unusual
for romantic comedies. Norton looks great in a role that is completely
different from what he has done before. He has dyed his hair blond to
add Brian a more traditional "holy-look", and the way he portrays him
truly provoke emotions. Ben Stiller proves himself as a solid actor
and a performer capable of delivering complex roles. He finds a
balance between the comic and dramatic, while never becoming
unreal. As for Elfman, she is doing exactly what she is supposed to
do: look ravishing. Though there are times when her uncontrolled
energy transforms into a more complex emotions, but those times are
rare. There are some very interesting and amusing cameo performances,
provided by Anne Bankroft, Jakes strong mother, Eli Wallach as Jakes
religious supervisor and Milos Forman as Brian's mentor and friend.
The film is an incredible achievement. It projects warmth and emotions
that few comedies have before. At the same time, Norton manages to
canalize his story into something intelligent. There are many things
that this film chews on. It is about temptation and religious
conviction (a conversation between Anna and Brian, about sex, is a
splendid example of this). It is about the difference between faith
and religion, about what's important and about keeping the faith in
our modern, constantly changing world. But mostly it is a film about
real friendship and pure love. Jake's and Brian's devotion for each
other surpass everything - religion, politics and even religious
convictions. That is the movies heart and soul, and that's what makes
the film an incredibly pleasant experience. It' not masterpiece, don't
get me wrong. But not everyone can make 'Being John Malcovich' or
'American Beauty' as their first film. Even David Fincher ('Fight
Club') started with 'Alien 3', which though wasn't a great film,
somewhat introduced the audience to the new director. I think that
'Keeping the Faith' does exactly that, and I believe that 'we ain't
seen nothing yet'.
And though ending rather traditionally, 'Keeping the Faith' is really
a great film. I really felt that I've gained something after walking
out of the theatre. I felt..well, good. And I think that it was the
point. After leaving the theatre, I've promised myself that I will
stand first in line for Norton's hopeful comeback.
- "There is a reason that pandas don't mate in captivity!" 
- Jake Schram in 'Keeping the Faith' 

Title
Review for eXistenZ (1999)
David Cronenberg presents us with another strange tale crawling out of his
impressively twisted head. It is one of many science fiction films, released
during the last year of this millenium, that tackles issues that will play
an important role in our future.
The story unfolds in a near future, where the line between reality and
virtual reality blurs. The world of the future is an unfriendly place, where
the scared inhabitants are "hiding" in virtual reality fantasy games to
escape the uncertainty of the real world. Allegra Geller (Jennifer Jason
Leigh), the leading game designer in the world, is testing her new virtual
reality game, eXistenZ with a focus group. As they begin, she is attacked by
a fanatic assassin employing a bizarre organic gun. She flees with a young
marketing trainee, Ted Pikul (Jude Law), who is suddenly assigned as her
bodyguard. Unfortunately, her pod, an organic gaming device that contains
the only copy of the eXistenZ game program, is damaged. To inspect it, she
talks Ted into accepting a gameport in his own body so he can play the game
with her. The events leading up to this, and the resulting game lead the
pair on a strange adventure in a world where individuality doesn't exist, as
the "players" are forced to perform as characters in an unknown plot. Here
the reality and their actions are impossible to determine from either their
own or the game's perspective.
I don't intend to reveal more of the film's premise, which is structured as
a computer game, with "tasks" that the characters must complete to win the
game.
Released after "The Matrix" and "Dark City", "eXistenZ" has some
similarities and parallels that connect it to these films. However,
"eXistenZ" is moving in a different direction, with a premise of its own. A
combination of dazzling special effects, brilliantly coordinated action
sequences and an intelligent and sophisticated plot, made "The Matrix" a
rare and entertaining science fiction experience, with some dark and
frightening ideas hidden under its sparkling facade. "eXistenZ" has a
completely different atmosphere, resembling "Dark City" , which is darker,
more serious and less entertaining. "eXistenZ" has the opportunities and
potential, but the enormous possibilities are never quite explored.
After the engaging beginning, it starts to falter.  While I was watching the
film, many left the theatre during the first hour. And indeed, "eXistenZ"
seemed as a complete failure: the actors seemed unreal, the plot and
dialogue silly, unfinished relationships and unexplained events followed one
after another. But the last fifteen minutes lifted the film on a complete
different level, explaining all past events, the silly dialogue and the
unreal performances within a few scenes. And jet the film fails on several
issues. Probably the best written character in the story is a game designer,
who would rather spend the rest of her life in a virtual world, than face
real life. This is a great possibility to create a magnificent character,
and Jennifer Jason Leigh stretches Cronenberg's script to the limits, but
fails because the advantages of virtual reality in comparison to the real
world are never shown. eXistenZ is not a world of which you might dream
about in your fantasies. It is not a world worth sacrificing your life for.
It's a cold, dark place where the "players" are forced to interrelate with
unreal characters, eat mutated creatures and even murder against their own
will. It doesn't look like a place worth even thinking about.
David Cronenberg has been the creator of "The Fly", "Videodrome" and "The
Dead Zone" , so it's not so hard to guess that "eXistenZ" is a violent and
gory film. Besides the regular murders of innocent people, the audiences can
enjoy an autopsy of a two-headed mutated amfibium. Scenes like that have
become a trademark for Cronenberg and it seems that he can't make a film
without flowing blood and foul creatures. The way I see it, this is the
film's crucial failure. It is impossible for Cronenbergto create a beautiful
world where time, space and problems of our everyday life do not exist; a
place of blooming blossoms, green forests and clear waters; a place really
worth sacrificing your life for. Because of its lack of three
dimensionality, the film looses most of its possibilities, but stays afloat
because of some interesting scenes, amusing performances (especially by
Willem Dafoe ) and one interesting and important thought, depicted in many
different ways throughout the movie. During the film, the audience is as
confused as the characters: detached from their everyday existence and no
longer able to see the difference between the real world and the alternative
reality that they have created.
"The Matrix", despite of its many dark and disturbing thoughts, ends with a
light at the end of the tunnel. "eXistenZ" does not. It is a one time
experience, ending in blood, gore and madness - a rather frightening
forecast for tomorrow.

Title
Review for Any Given Sunday (1999)
CAST: Al Pacino, Cameron Diaz, Dennis Quide, James Woods, Jamie Coxx, Charlton Heston
Life is a fierce competition. You are always racing forward, but no
matter how good you are, there are always men that are younger than
you, tougher than you, stronger than you, racing along side with
you. Everyone of them is ready to push you aside, to kill, in order to
come first. This time the subject is the brutal world of fictitious
American football team the Miami Sharks. Possibly the most
"Oliver-Stoney" Oliver Stone movie to date, Pacino essentially plays a
hard-drinking football coach who must reverse the Sharks' losing
streak, while the predictably underwritten ice maiden comes in the
form of Diaz' ball-breaking club owner. But he starts questioning his
own priorities. Is winning really the most important, or is it
something else?
Comparing American Football to American life is an interesting idea
and Oliver Stone is the natural choice. Here everything is in the
open. The players stand against each other, ready to release all their
energy into one single move. Ready to sacrifice themselves for a
single moment of victory. It just takes a couple of seconds, and in
that time, you either survive or go down. If you make your way
forward, and come out alive, crawling on the bodies of your teammates,
there is no end to your glory, until a better player comes along, and
then you will be pushed to the ground, and be forgotten. They are the
gladiators of our time. This is their arena and America is
watching. But on any given Sunday, no matter how good you are, you'll
either win or loose...
This is certainly Oliver Stone's (Platoon, Born the Fourth of July,
Natural Born Killers) strangest film in some time. He has always been
known as a bold director, unafraid to make his statement, no matter
how risky or controversial it is. Nothing is subtle. Everything is in
the open. He has proven to be a "man of the truth". And "Any Given
Sunday" is drained in his most famous trademarks: the twisted
cinematography, flashy editing, multidimensional sound. Yet, there is
something about this film that somehow makes it worse than Stone's
previous. It's not that I didn't enjoy it. I certainly did, but I do
not quite know why. Maybe because I share Stone's fascination with
American Football or maybe because of the film's incredible visual
panache and solid acting. But if you ask me "what is this film about",
I couldn't tell you. In all his past films , Stone was very careful to
pose the questions in the right way and then energetically move
towards a goal, making his way through unfamiliar territories. But
here it seems as if he couldn't make up his mind. At first it seems as
it is about the American society and the clever parallels to American
Football. Then Stone starts criticizing the NFL, but in the end his
love for the game takes complete control over the story, transforming
it into a fancy filmed football game. It is a confused, but powerfully
executed film that has its golden moments. Though the script isn't
particularly well written, its holes are compensated by an amazing
cast, that is capable of transforming any cliche into originality. Al
Pacino, who looks incredible in any role, is magnificent here. It is
much more Pacino's character than the scripts, since he goes further,
deeper into the mind and heart of a coach that looses touch, faith in
himself and life. Dennis Quide is very impressive as an on-field
leader privately haunted by insecurity and Jamie Coxx is very nice,
proving to be a serious and capable actor. Otherwise the film can
boast of names such as Cameron Diaz, James Woods, LL Cool J, Charlt o
Some of it is incredible. And, in a way, Stone does the same with
American Football as Spielberg did with WW2 in "Saving Private
Ryan". The sense of "being there", not observe from above with the
popcorn in one hand and a coke in another, but actually being on the
field, look at it from the player's eyes, feel the adrenaline rushing
through your body. Unfortunately these amazing sequences, no matter
how great they are, are deluding us from the movie's actual
objective. Stone gets lost amidst mirrors and smoke, and all the
energy that is released during these two hours, is chanalized into
nothing. In the end, no matter how noble the intentions, the film
wrestles with its own shadow.

Title
Review for Cell, The (2000)
DIRECTED BY: Tarsem Singh
WRITTEN BY: Mark Protosevich
CAST: Jennifer Lopez, Vince Vaughn, Vincent D'Onofrio, Marianne Jean-Baptiste, Jake Weber
MPAA: Rated R for bizarre violence and sexual images, nudity and language
Runningtime: USA:107
What if you could see your dreams come alive? What if you could walk amidst your thoughts, emotions, memories and desires as if they formed a world of their own? A world where laws of physics do not apply, where everything is possible.
"The Cell" is created by a team of newcomers, who have not yet been influenced by the stereotypical film industry, and feels therefore as a much needed breath of fresh air. It's imaginative, bizarre and probably one of the most beautiful films Hollywood has created since Francis Coppola's "Dracula".
Your dreams, thoughts and feelings take physical form and you can interact with them as with your present surroundings. In a not too distant future this is a reality, and psychiatrist use this to gain a more complete understanding of their patients. Catharine Deane, a very clever child psychiatrist is working on a boy that has lost touch with reality. At the same time, within the confines of an abandoned rural farmhouse, Stargher, a psychologically disturbed killer has built The Cell, a glass-encased chamber where he drowns his innocent female victims before continuing a sadistic post-mortem ritual with their bodies. The horror and despair that the kidnappings have created, makes the FBI agent Peter Novak react. In not too long, they make the arrest, but too late. The killer falls into a deep coma, while his final missing victim only has a few hours left to live. Now it is up to Catharine to enter the mind of a killer in the search for the answers to uncover the location of th!
e missing girl. 
Written by first-time writer Mark Protosevich, "The Cell" takes the story from "Silence of the Lambs" as a frame for first-time director Tarshem Singh's ingenious imagination. Singh has a beautifully sculptured pace. No time is wasted on scientifical explanations, that ruins most of the films, and he elegantly leaps to the emotional and psychological core of the story. The film really takes off when Catharine enters the killers mind. The result is shocking and spectacular. 
Like David Fincher (Fight Club, Se7en), Singh had been a director of musical videos, before he was discovered by the clever producers. His first motion picture does bare the mark of these elements. His visual style is more rich and colorful than anything that Coppola and Tim Burton have created so far. In musical videos the key is visual imagination, a rare talent of portraying your emotions and thoughts through images. And Singh has this talent. He is a composer of images. He makes music come to life and paintings start breathing. Repulsively graphic, bloody, twisted, surreal, weird, magical, frightening and almost poetic with its dreamy symbolism. There are no words that can describe the grotesque world that is created, but I can promise you that you'll have an incredible experience. Singh's attention to detail and symbolism is nothing less than astonishing. Desert dunes, catacombs, Middle Eastern-flavored chambers, images of dismemberment, decay, torture and religious salva!
tion, snow, cherry blossoms, monsters, horrors, water, light, air -- an extraordinary palette of weirdness and expressive arcane. Even the shadows cast by tree leaves seem meticulously art-designed.
In a way this is the most psychological of psychological thrillers to date. A film that portrays a deeper understanding of the complex human mind than the rest of the movies of its kind, presenting it as a unique world of its own. There are no actual characters in this film, except the psychologist and the killer himself, whose personalities are reflected through their virtual minds and connected to their actions. When it comes to acting, that is almost nonexistent. The actors are more like puppets on a stage, not quite knowing what they are doing, and since there is no real story, they are completely in the director's mercy. Singh is the only one that knows what's going on, and the actors' job is simply look pretty in the frame, which Lopez certainly does. She can act, and she can provoke sympathy (which is more than I can say about most of the models and singers that turn to acting). So it doesn't have a concrete plot, no real characters to speak of, no deep-going acting, an!
d yet "The Cell" is incredibly interesting and complex nonetheless. It crawls into your mind, under your skin and make all the little hair on your neck stand up. It is a rare experience, both emotional and psychological. 
Like all brilliant works of art, it's brilliance lies in its simplicity. You take with you what you bring to it. This film is entirely individual and every one will understand it differently. The experience of watching it can be compared with admiring a painting or listening to music. It's abstract and engrossing. To me this is pure brilliance brilliance and a haunting experience, and I hope that it will refresh a genre that needs all the help it can get

Title
Review for Thirteenth Floor, The (1999)
Virtual reality is a topic that has almost defined its own genre. Since
'Dark City' (1998), films about alternative universes and parallel worlds
have been coming one after another. The most popular and original of them
all has been The Matrix. All the films released after it, have been less
successful. David Cronenberg's eXistenZ, released only a couple of months
after The Matrix, was accepted and even appreciated (by some), but the hype
was gone. And when 'The Thirteenth Floor' aired this fall, it was completely
overseen and ignored. I admit that this issue has become something between
tiring and annoying, feeling like eating the same meal over and over again.
It was therefore I was less than excited, when I went out to see to 'The
Thirteenth Floor'. However, I was positively surprised by Josef Rusnak's
latest picture. Matrix was an entertaining thrill ride through dreams and
reality, combining the best of Hollywood's action and effects with an
intelligent story. eXistenZ was a violent, gory and unsettling journey
through reality and virtual reality, ending in blood and madness. 'The
Thirteenth Floor'  is somewhere in between. Instead of going after the
crowds - the action audience (like The Matrix), or aiming at the horror fans
(like eXistenZ ), 'The Thirteenth Floor' presents a more intelligent plot,
witch will provide a less entertaining and more serious experience, that the
true science fiction lovers will find rewarding.
In a near future...On the thirteenth floor of a classified building, a
genius scientist, Hannon Fuller, has created a simulated world, his personal
dreamworld, where every inhabitant is a complex, selflearning program that
only believes it is real. Right after the first testing of this world,
Fuller () is found murdered. Douglas Hall (), his closest friend and
business partner, immediately becomes the prime suspect and must enter
through the thirteenth floor in search of the truth. A beautiful woman
(Gretchen Mol) who suddenly appears on the scene may hold the key to the
mystery, which might unravel the horrifying truth about his own existence.
The first "download into simulation" is impressive. It is the creator's
first visit to his world, his creation. In order to enter this virtual
universe, you have to take over someone's identity, become another person.
This is called conciseness transfer, and this is part of the tragedy in the
film: People "wake up" in unknown places and strange things start happen.
They start to doubt in their own sanity. These innocent people pay for the
mistakes of their "users" and creators with their sanity and their lives. It
is a frightening reality; the fact that all the people in the simulation
(the program links) are living out their lives, oblivious, not knowing that
they are puppets in someone's fantasy.
With an appealing ("Blade Runner" - type) of detective story, this film
presents the beauty and possibilities of virtual reality and the lurking
danger that is always present. Our modern world is metal and glass -- cold,
unfriendly, impersonal. The thirties are different -- colorful, beautiful,
elegant, virile. This contrast demonstrates a wish for change. Virtual
reality is here portrayed as a magical, enchanting power that seduces you
into its endless possibilities. To some it is just a journey to their
personal paradise, to some a personal playground -- a life without any
consequences. For others - a way to start over and "correct" their mistakes,
by living in an illusion of their past. Virtual reality is a wizard that
transforms your hopes, dreams and fantasies to life. At least that's how it
is all beginning. But when you're waking up from your dream, the real world
seems worthless and unreal and all you can think off is returning to your
personal paradise. This, almost narcotic effect, soon turns into confusion
and ultimately madness. Some important and interesting philosophical
questions are raised -- what is real? what is thought? who are we? If these
were answered, this film would be the greatest science fiction ever made.
They are off course not answered, but posed in an intelligent manner. The
visual aspect of the film is one of the key elements, since it portrays the
contrast between these computer-simulated universes. Kirk M. Petrucelli has
done a marvelous job with the recreation of the thirties with its glamour,
grace and color; and setting this world in opposition to our own -- an
almost caricatured recreation of the nineties. There are some honest and
decent performances by an almost unknown cast and Harald Klose's moody
musical score that is at in right place at the right time.
A rather unusual thing about'The Thirteenth Floor'  is the almost complete
lack of special effects. There are no CGI animated creatures, no bullets in
slow motion. This is a more philosophical approach, reminding about the
European way of filmmaking. This is off course a major disappointment to the
audience that is used to endless gunfights and mutated amphibians, but the
more serious science fiction buffs and 'Dark City'-fans will be pleased.
This film is interesting and inspiring. It has everything eXistenZ doesn't,
but it lacks the immediacy and intensity of The Matrix. And then there is a
happy end which, like in 'Dark City', completely alienates it from the rest
of the story and context. The plot itself is not as original as the
filmmakers want us to think, since they have virtually sucked out all
information from the best science fiction classics, including Blade Runner
and 'Dark City' . With this in mind,'The Thirteenth Floor' doesn't make an
Oscar candidate or a film that will be remembered a year from now, yet this
is a beautiful, elegant and intelligent take on virtual reality.

Title
Review for What Lies Beneath (2000)
DIRECTED BY: Robert Zemeckis
WRITTEN BY: Steven Spielberg (story), Sarah Kernochan and Clark Gregg
CAST: Harrison Ford, Michelle Pfieffer, Diana Scarwid, James Remar, Joe Morton
MPAA: Rated R for violence/gore, language and some sexuality
>From the director of "Forrest Gump" and from the creators of "Saving Private Ryan" and "American Beauty" comes..."What Lies Beneath". DreamWorks SKG rules the box office once again, only this time riding on cheap shocks, beautiful visuals and ancient clichés. 
Being some sort of alternative for "The Sixth Sense", "What Lies Beneath" is a classical "lady-in-distress" story supported by great performances and special effects. Harrison Ford and Michelle Pfeiffer play Norman and Caitlin Spencer, a middle-aged couple experiencing the empty nest syndrome when their daughter leaves for college. Having just moved into the home of Norman's deceased father, Norman throws himself into work, while Caitlin tries to decide what she is going to do with the rest of her life. But Caitlin begins hearing noises in the house. Whispers. Quiet voices. Her front door opens mysteriously, time after time. A picture frame keeps dropping onto the floor and breaking. And then, she starts seeing dead people. The house is haunted! And the ghost is trying to tell Caitlin something -- something about her past... 
Beneath this shallow premise is nothing much. Most of the time is spent on Pfeiffer who moves in slow motion from one room to another, hearing noises. The dialogue is carried out either in whispering or high pitched screaming, and worst of all -- nothing happens. Director Robert Zemeckis ("Forrest Gump", "Contact") has publicly stated that he tried to make his film in the spirit of Hichock. And it does have all the necessary components: strange noises from the attic, falling pictures, the light goes off, mirrors, doors moving, windows opening. It is slick, elegant and beautifully executed. Water is vital and the most frightening scenes obviously happen in the bathroom. And yet, the most important element is forgotten -- the story. It's too long, too obvious and filled with all the ancient clichés that you wanted to forget. An hour passes by before we see a slight development in the story. Hichock said once that it is better to wait for a pay-off than to actually see one. That'!
s true, except Hichock didn't expect us to wait too long, certainly not 130 minutes for the most obvious and predictable. The film is simply not as clever or complex as it likes to think of itself. 
However, it is fortunate that Zemeckis is steering this movie. Only because of his incredible taste and talent the movie is mostly enjoyable. Zemeckis is constantly keeping us on the edge, structuring his movie as several intense scenes, with looong times of lurking an waiting in between. There are moments when there is no music at all, no sound, and no one is even eating their popcorn, and then suddenly -- bang! Everyone screams, and it is only the dog. Moments like that are effective, but they create merely an illusion of horror. In fact it's not terrifying at all. Films like "The Shining" and "Blair Witch Project" made a lasting impression that haunted the viewers for days. This film won't do that. There is nothing that is frightening about it. There is nothing to discuss, nothing to remember. You'll forget it as soon as you go out of the theatre. 
Acting is another positive element. Casting Pfeiffer and Ford was a stroke of genius. Not only do they portray their individual roles beautifully, but have also a magical chemistry. It's too bad that Ford (cast against type) didn't get much screen time. I realize that no matter what I write, there will be unavoidable comparisons to "The Sixth Sense", but unfortunately this film is not  quite that. The films are on completely different levels. "The Sixth Sense" was scary because it had a frightening story and a certain psychological effect. "What Lies Beneath" on the other hand, is reaching for simple shocks, ending in a way that is more embracing than scary. With such great actors and crew, and with Zemeckis behind the camera, you might wonder what might have happened if they had a better script. 
In the end, I can't say that this is a bad effort. It's an entertaining film that provides shocks, mysteries and conspiracies, screams and laughs. It's beautiful and well acted. Unfortunately, there is not much that lies beneath. And even at its best, when the intensity is peaking and the film theatre is completely quite -- even then, it's nothing more than a good Hichock imitation. 

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
Oliver Stone's latest feature is the last one standing in the long line of
biographies of American presidents.  It's a three-hour long saga about the
life of one of the most hated and misunderstood leaders of the 20th century.
Stone doesn't hold back anything as he digs deep inside politics and legal
maneuvers of the White House. The director holds Nixon responsible for
everything he has done. At the same time he creates a very human character,
a brilliant and tortured man that is caught in the dirty game of politics,
which is here pictured as a wild animal. He is simply trying to tame it.
But the occasional switch to the raging sky and the clouds swiftly fleeing
over the White House as events run ahead of the president's ability to
control them. Stone doesn't in any way apologize for Nixon. He blames not
only Nixon's own character flaws but also the Imperial Presidency itself,
the system that, once set in motion, behaves with a mindlessness of its own.
"Nixon" is a modern Shakespeare story - a saga about a ruler destroyed by
his fatal flaws. There's something almost majestic about the process: As
Nixon goes down in this film, there is no gloating, but a watery sigh, as of
a great ship sinking.
Sir Anthony Hopkins is staggering and plays Nixon with incredible honesty
and understanding, creating a very emotional picture of the
37th American President.  Joan Allen's magnificent and captivating
performance is certainly worth an Oscar statuette. She is strong and loyal
as Mrs. Nixon. The rest of the cast is equally magnificent, including: James
Woods, J. T. Walsh, Paul Sorvino, Ed Harris and Bob Hoskins. Everyone does a
serious and demanding job, no one are disappointing.
Stone never loses focus and his direction is steddy, honest and determined.
He is displaying the historical facts and at the same time concentrating at
the human element. At times he is showing to black and white showing
flashbacks from Nixon's youth and childhood. The flashy editing by Brian
Berdan and Frank Corwin, Robert Richardson's  rich cinematography and John
Williams' musical score create a hectic and bizarre atmosphere.
The film's only fault is that it's a bit tiering and overloaded with too
much political material and legal maneuvers. Still it's an honest and
captivating - a solid piece of movie making.

Title
Review for Amistad (1997)
While everyone were praising "Titanic" , greater and far more important
films slipped by, overseen and underrated. Amistad was one of them. Unfairly
compared to box-busters, Amistad is one of the best films of the year.
Set in 1839, Amistad tells the true story about a group African natives
imprisoned on a Spanish slave ship La Amistad. Led by the lion-hearted
Cinque (Djimon Honsou), they take control of the vessel, killing most of the
crew. Uncertain how to make they way back to Africa, they put their trust on
two surviving Spaniards. But the clever slave traders outsmart them and La
Amistad makes its way northward to United States. Here the Africans are
captured and imprisoned, charged with piracy and murder.
The christian abolitionist Lewis Tappan (Stellan Skarsgard) and ), an
ex-slave Theodore Joadson (Morgan Freeman), are the first men who come to
the Africans' aid. These two men receive assistance from Roger Baldwin
(Mathew McConaghey), an property attorney and former president John Quincey
Adams (Anthony Hopkins). However powerful forces are against them. Current
President Martin Van Buren (Nigel Hawthorn), eager to please the Southern
voters, and the 11-year old Queen Isabella of Spain (Anna Paquin) start
complotting against the abolitionists to ensure that the Africans never go
free.
Steven Spielberg directs with wonderful precision and passion from the
opening to the closing shot, bringing in the horrible reality and a powerful
sense of importance.
The film begins with a masterful close-up on bloodied fingers, lit up by the
bolts of lightening, trying to scratch free a bolt holding the chains to the
deck. The brutal and violent mutiny that follows is more than balanced by
Spielberg's honest and terrifying flashback sequence later in the film,
describing the horrors and inhuman suffering of everyday life on a slave
ship.
Spielberg doesn't hold back anything and directs with incredible visdome and
deep understanding:under a rain of blood, surrounded by pain and screams, a
mother holding a child jumps overboard, choosing a life in death, rather
than a death in life; I doubt that anyone will forget the helpless men and
women chained to rocks and thrown overboard, because the crew has
underestimated the provisions.
However this uncovered and honest flashback is also the most intense and
emotional sequence in the film, as the picture suffers from the lack of
emotional resonance and immediacy. There are some moments in Amistad that
resemble a dry history lesson, although an important one.
With bitter irony Spielberg named the ship La Amistad, meaning friendship.
The Africans understand their trial as we would understand a trial on Mars.
And the film has many humorous scenes shown from the Africans's point of
view, such as their view on the christians (who they call singers) and on
the American legal system.
The cast is solid and effective, involving some of the most famous stars of
Hollywood.Morgan Freeman plays an ex-slave that has devoted his entire life
to the abolition of slavery. Freeman doesn't know how to disappoint, and the
only regret is that there is very little time granted on his character.
Mathew McConaghey's character is a bit like Oscar Schindler in "Schindler's
List".He was looking at slaves as property and was only interested in how to
win the case, and how to gain money from it. Throughout the movie however,
he gets more human, when he realizes what he is fighting for. Anthony
Hopkins delivers one of his best performances. Hi has painted a sensational
portrait of a man that is fighting his age, his reputation and his legacy to
accomplish something good, something he truly believes in -- before he dies.
But the film's best performance comes from the newcomer Djimon Honsou , who
brings a wonderful sense of dignity, quite strength and touching
vulnerability to his role as the unofficial leader for the Africans. During
the whole film he speaks only 5 words in English, and jet, we understand
everything he is saying, because the words come from the heart and not from
the mind.
The visual perfection of the film is as staggering as the direction.
Janusz Kaminski's wonderful cinematography resembles the paintings of Goya -
muted to tones and low on colors and lighting. Rick Carter's marvelous and
detailed production design and Ruth E. Carter's costumes re-create the
historical period. John Williams' deep, emotional and occasionally
terrifying musical score, including African quire and folk songs is probably
the finest composition of the year.
Amistad is a finely crafted drama that explores, better than any film to
date, the injuries, the injustices and the horrors of slavery. Equally
important to our understanding of slavery as "Schindler's List" was to
holocaust.

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
DIRECTED BY: Milos Forman
WRITTEN BY: Scott Alexander and Larry Karaszewski
CAST: Jim Carrey, Danny DeVito, Courtney Love, Paul Giamatti
"[...] All of the most important things in my life have been changed
out and mixed up for dramatic purposes. So I decided to cut out all of
the baloney. Now the movie is much shorter..In fact this is the end of
the movie. Than you very much [...]"
Quick facts on front: this is a review that may contain some
information that will certainly spoil your evening if you were
planning to watch this movie. Second: though this picture is about the
tragic life of a comedian / performer, comparisons to films such as
"Lenny" are useless, because this film is mostly not like anything
else. The director of this motion picture is Milos Forman, a man who
has lived under the totalitarian regime and escaped it with his life
and talent perfectly intact. That is probably why he showed a
particular interest in people that dared to be different, that had the
courage to go against the stream -- against the system. This devotion
for the brave and original can be observed in Forman's films, most of
which slightly fictionalized biographies that deal with men who are
regarded as mavericks by society ("One Flew Over the Cokoo's Nest",
"Amadeus", "People vs. Larry Flint"). Andy Kaufman fits perfectly into
that description. Although we know very little about this man, we know
one thing: he was not like everybody else. So who was Andy Kaufman?
Andy Kaufman was (and still is) a man of mystery. He was not a
comedian, not an actor, not a musician, but he was certainly an
artist. The man that dared to be different. The man that dreamed about
becoming the biggest star in the world and became exactly that. He
provoked the audience, tricked and deceived us. This was his
profession and his gift. He could provoke real emotions. Andy Kaufman
was the most loved and most hated man in the 70s. A man that nobody
really knew or understood. The world and everything in it was
Kaufman's playground until he died of a sudden cancer at the age of
35.
This information is certainly not excessive. It proves that we do not
know much about this man. And the film was going to make it all more
clearer, since it is Forman's tribute to Andy Kaufman and his work. Or
at least it is supposed to be. What it is, is simply a duplication of
Kaufman's most famous performances. It begins in a bizarre and
unexpected way as Jim Carey approaches the screen -- looking and
acting like Andy Kaufman, saying in the famous Latka-voice "Hello. I
am Andy. Welcome to my movie". You have to admit that it is an
original innovation. Regrettably from that moment the film enters a
certain trance as we are forever stuck as audience members in
Kaufman's show, not able to come closer to him as a person. First he
creates the insecure and stiff foreigner (who is better known as Latka
from TV-show "Taxi"), then he does an Elvis Presley imitation, then he
starts wrestling with women, then he invents another character and it
goes on and on and on. In addition to the Taxi and SNL bits, many of
Kaufman's public appearances are resurrected, including an infamous
guest spot on David Letterman's show. This is all very entertaining,
because of Jim Carey performance (which by the way truly elevates the
film to a new level), but it is also deluding and confusing. We long
to finally get behind the masks and illusions -- to the real Andy
Kaufman. Unfortunately Forman seems to be much more interested in
Kaufman's career than his personality, and all we get is a couple of
sentences like: "The world is an illusion" and "We shouldn't take our
selves too seriously". Of the two hours that the film goes on, 1 hour
and 30 minutes are practically an endless Kaufman show. It's not that
it is not interesting or funny. It certainly is, and it may very well
be that there is no body who have seen "the real" Kaufman; that he
never completely revealed himself to anyone. There is in fact a moment
in the film where Kaufman becomes so adept at the art of deception and
illusion that, when he discovers he has terminal cancer, no o n family
views it as the latest in a series of cruel practical jokes and
believes that his doctor is a paid actor. Like the boy who has cried
wolf once too often, Kaufman must struggle to convince those around
him that, for once, he is serious. This is something that happens at
the very end, and is a territory that is never quite explored. Forman
doesn't even try. To me it was the biggest disappointment. However
there are moments when the screen gets simply positively radiant, when
Forman creates pure magic. When the film is moving to the end and
Forman decides to "cut out all of the baloney", then some very
interesting things start happening. In the end "Man on the Moon"
manages to generate emotions, be that laughter or tears, and it never
seems to push for either. You might wonder about how it is possible,
if indeed I am right and most of the film is just jokes and scams. It
is difficult to explain, but I believe that the original material was
created by Andy Kaufman himself, who could touch our hearts and
provoke reactions and emotions, and I think that Jim Carey manages to
do the same. He completes the transition from off-the-wall comedian to
serious actor that he began in The Truman Show. Not only does Carrey
imitate Kaufman almost perfectly (including matching his trademark
"Thank you very much"), but he employs this mimicry in the service of
a compelling performance. The forcefulness with which the film conveys
Kaufman's character is as much a function of Carrey's portrayal as it
is of the script from which he is working. This is a role that Carrey,
a lifelong Kaufman fan, wanted desperately, and, once he got it, he
poured every ounce of his talent into his work. It would be a disgrace
to not nominate Carrey for an Academy Award this year. As for the film
itself, it never seems boring or disappointing in any way, and it
certainly pays enough respect to the artist that Andy Kaufman
was. "Thank you very much"

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
- "..It's better to be a fake somebody", than a real nobody.."
- Tom Ripley, THE TALENTED MR.RIPLEY
After the passionate and sensually seductive "The English Patient", everyone
were waiting in anticipation for director Anthony Minghella's next film. And
here it is. A sophisticated and brilliantly creepy film experience that will
mesmerize and shock you to the last frame. This is as far as psychological
thrillers go. Hichock's "Psycho", Kubrick's "The Shining", Demme's "The
Silence of the Lambs" and Fincher's "The Game" can be compared to this
spine-chilling masterpiece. Minghella offers you the guilty seasonal
pleasure of pure evil in its most luxuriant form.
 The film is based on Patricia Highsmith's 1955 cult novel with the same
title. Set in the mid-50s, the story begins in an exquisite garden party,
where Tom Ripley (Matt Damon ) is playing the piano for the cream of
aristocracy. When finished, he is stopped by a wealthy businessman that
mistakes him for being a friend to his son, Dickie (Jude Law). Tom is then
offered $1000 for going to Italy and bring his irresponsible son back from
his dream world to his father and the real life. Tom, pretending to know
Dickie, agrees. It is here we start suspecting that Tom is more than a good
looking pianist. He is starting to prepare for his trip, collecting all
information about Dickie, including his taste for music. In Italy, Tom is
instantly liked by Dickie and Dickie's cultured fiancé, Marge (Gwynlyth
Paltrow ), pretending to love jazz and having the same interests, while
soaking into luxury. Here, the audience and Dickie is about to discover that
there is a lot hiding under Tom's mask of innocence. He is a man of many
talents, including lies, forgery and such accurate impersonations of
different people, their voices and behavior, that hair will rice on your
heads. His solitary life makes him vulnerable and he is reaching for
attention and love. This is how it begins -- as a story of possession. Tom
wants Dickie. He wants to be the center of Dickie's world and, because he is
a new refreshment in Dickies privileged life, he is. At this time Minghella,
his cast, crew and audience are taking a wonderful vacation. You can almost
feel the fresh ocean breeze and gentle sun. You can relax in the lush
vineyards with Dickie, Marge and Tom, while enjoying the intoxicating blend
of jazz, suntan lotion and gin-and-tonic-on-the-rocks. This is heaven on
earth. Seductive, fresh. You never want to leave. But Dickie bores easily,
and when his old-time pal named Freddie (Philip Seymour Hoffman ) shows up,
Tom is brutally pushed into the background, with all feelings slowly
cropping up. Now he wants Dickie in another way. If he can't his love, he
will have Dickie's life, with all its pleasures..
Minghella is exploring the human nature, mind and soul. Like American Beauty
and Eyes Wide Shut, this is a film about two worlds, two plans of existence.
In one you are who you are and in another you are who you are supposed to
be. One is a world of masks and illusions, another is a reality that we all
hide. Tom Ripley is caught between these two worlds. He is charming,
beautiful and can make anybody like, love and respect him. But behind the
mask of innocence and charm, lurks another truth, that is more frightening
than anyone imagines. In truth he is searching, as everyone else, for
fulfillment, happiness, peace. In other words for a perfect life. His
methods, however, are close to paranoia. It is a frightening story about
class envy. Tom is so unsatisfied with his own life and himself, that he is
willing to sacrifice his soul, his identity, his life to become someone
else. He ends up in a solitary existence (portrayed in a powerful scene
where he alone unpacks his Christmas presents that he has bought for
himself). In numbness and emptiness. His life becomes an eternal fear and
charade, as he covers up his true identity with mask after mask, until he
looses it completely. In several scenes it seems that Tom is a homosexual,
in others he is definitely not. This is never explained and that is the
point. He becomes nothing more than a combination of masks, under which is
nothing, emptiness. Somewhere you can sense an echo of critique of the
modern society, where money, status and image is everything, including
fulfillment. In his bizarre and twisted search for happiness, Tom has
misunderstood money for bliss. There are moments, when he dreams of giving
someone the key to his dark soul, but he realizes that it is too late and
that there are too many demons in his past for him to start a new. His past
can not be washed away. Hurt, angry and confused, he couldn't understand
where he did go wrong.
Matt Damon (Saving Private Ryan and Dogma) plays this spine-chilling
chameleon with uncanny -- and quite spooky -- ease. It is frightening to see
him  float into different persons, copying their voices and personalities.
This talented young actor is a joy to behold and should get a nomination at
this years Academy Awards. In fact, I wouldn't be surprised to see Tom
Ripley become a recurring antihero -- like a Hannibal Lecter (returning next
year in "Hannibal"). Equally magnificent is the surprisingly fascinating
performance of Jude Law ("Gattaca", eXistenZ) as the sharp, fresh young
Casanova, reminding about Sonny from the "Godfather". Gwynlyth Paltrow
("Sliding Doors" and Shakespeare in Love) is impressive as always as the
smart, good-hearted Marge and Cate Blanchet (Elizabeth) is fabulous as the
elegant, sophisticated beauty that falls under Tom's spells, naively
believing his lies. Another interesting performance is provided by Hoffman
("Boogie Nights" and Magnolia). Speaking in a lockjaw tone, he is amusing as
the local "provider" of earthly pleasures. The supporting cast is equally
convincing.
This film is so beautifully shaped, that there are not enough words to
describe its perfection. The elegant cinematography, rich art direction,
precise editing and heavenly music (Gabriel Yared) combine in a colorful
blend that will electrify you from the first to the last frame. And yet, it
is not the visual aspect that makes this a powerful and memorable
experience. It is the intellect and sophistication of the plot and the
magnificence of the acting that create a frightening, thought provoking
epic, that even Hichock would not direct any better.
- "What ever you do..How ever terrible, how ever hurtful..No body thinks
that they are a bad person.."
- Tom Ripley, THE TALENTED MR.RIPLEY

Title
Review for Ravenous (1999)
No humans were harmed, tested or tasted in the making of this film. All
recipes are fictions.
TWENTIETH CENTURY FOX DOES NOT CONDONE CANNIBALISM.
A psychological thriller that will scare you to the depth of your soul!
Director/writer Antonia Bird shows us that the most terrifying horror is not
provided by giant beasts, but instead by monsters lurking in ourselves..
"..They were a party of settlers in covered wagon times and they had to
resent to cannibalism in order to stay alive.." This true story, briefly
mentioned in "The Shining" , has no turned into a 143 minutes long motion
picture. In 1847, the United States was a land of pioneers, of gold-starved
Americans making their way west. It was a period of Manifest Destiny, the
inevitability of the country extending its boundaries, stretching out its
arms and consuming all the land it could. Capt. John Boyd (Guy Pearce) has
become both a "hero" and a victim during this period of relentless
consumption ... in ways he could never have imagined. Boyd's journey to hell
begins when he is awarded for an act of cowardice during a horrific
Mexican-American War battle earns him banishment to a desolate military
outpost, a waystation for western travelers in the barren and icy Sierra
Nevada mountains in California. Upon his arrival he is greeted by a small,
motley group of soldiers, including his commanding officer, Hart (Jeffrey
Jones), a previously intelligent and sophisticated man who has lost his
aristocratic origin in the heat of battle and has pretty much given up on
life; Toffler (Jeremy Davies), the fort's personal emissary to the Lord;
Knox (Stephen Spinella), the veterinarian that plays doctor, who never met a
bottle of whiskey he didn't like; Reich (Neal McDonough), the no-nonsense
soldier of the group; and the seriously "over-medicated" Cleaves (David
Arquette), a cook whose meals are inspired more by peyote than culinary
ambitions. Into this cold, bleak and bizarre world staggers a stranger,
Colqhoun (Robert Carlyle), a half-starved Scot who had been traveling with a
group of settlers until they became snowbound. Seeking refuge in a cave,
they soon ran out of food - and were forced to consume one another. Colqhoun
barely escaped becoming an hors d'oeuvre himself. Our heroes then decide to
journey through the mountains to find the survivors, and Colqhoun tags along
to help out. Soon it becomes clear that Colqhoun's tale has ramifications
beyond cannibalism and the will to survive. It involves an old Indian myth
called Weendigo, which states that a man who eats the flesh of another
steals that person's strength, spirit and very essence. His hunger becomes
an insatiable craving: the more he eats, the more he wants, and the stronger
he becomes. There can never be enough, and death is the only escape..
It's all fairly sickening and you have to have a healthy stomach to see the
whole movie through. As professionally made as the movie is, you have to
wonder who they thought would come piling into the theater to see this.
Teen-age horror fans won't care because none of the soldiers look remotely
like Neve Campell. Older folks might show up when they hear that the movie
is actually a satire about the pioneer spirit, but they'll be disappointed
once all the raw meat starts getting waved in their faces. But jokes aside,
this is a film that is well worth watching. It has wonderful and mature
characters, that few horror film s can boast of and a strangely effective
story that continues to electrify you till the end. The two main characters
are also the most interesting. Boyd is a simple, honest man tiered of war,
killing and fear. His sacred wish is to live a normal, quite life away from
gunpowder and blood. Colqhoun is different. He proves that a man, on the
brink of death, would do anything to stay alive, including sacrificing his
own soul. He believes so much in this Indian myth that he starts to change
physically. It is the power of the human mind and conviction that make
miracles happen. The atmosphere in "Ravenous" is macabre and bizarre, scary
and surreal. Completely isolated from the rest of the world, stands fort
Spencer. Here time stands still, and nothing changes. The inhabitants are
soldiers driven by war and pillage. They are all somehow losers of society
that have been banished -- men that are used to killing and have not done
anything else in their entire life. Men that are nothing, and has nothing to
loose. The result is some sort of cabin fever. Cannibalism is more like a
sick game for them. Since they find no pleasure in living, they find some
excitement in killing and dying. It's like "who's going to die first?" The
unchangeable icy landscape, where birds do not sing and even wind doesn't
move the leaves on the trees, resembles Kubrick's "The Shining". It's hard
to not get mad here! One of the scary aspects of the film is a strange
connection that the viewer establishes with the characters, and starts to
understand them, although they have turned into half crazed killers. Music
is another factor that strengthens the atmosphere. A strange musical score,
composed by Michael Nyman (The Piano) and Damon Albarn, that often seems out
of place, and in complete contrast to the image, somehow reflects the
characters' twisted reactions on the world and their situation.
The director herself stated that it was "OK to laugh" during the picture.
And I must admit that it is often very funny, in a strange way (such as the
wonderful quote: "..It's lonely being a cannibal. You don't get that many
friends..." or when Colqhoun is quoting Ben Franklin, saying "Eat to Live.
Don't Live to Eat.").But mostly it is frightening and shocking as it goes
deeper into the minds of these strange men and we witness their
psychological change. Every actor does a great job. Especially Robert
Carlyle as the sinister and intelligent cannibal, and Guy Pearce as  the
moral and honest soldier, nagged by his undeserved honor. This strange
couple resemble Lestat and Lois in Neil Jordan's 'Interview With The
Vampire' . Actually there are many amusing parallels and connections to
vampire movies, since the topics are so alike.
"Ravenous" starts wonderfully and continues to shock and scare until it gets
to the finale, where it looses focus and gets too primitive and rather
boring. However these little failures don't diminish the impression. This is
a bizarre dark comedy about the human mind and its change in different
situations. It is a scary fable about the monster that lurks in everyone's
soul, a dark side which we're all trying to hide -- but it's there --
always. It is one of the most frightening and successful horror films since
"The Shining".
"..I said no food. I didn't say there was nothing to eat..."
- Colqhoun, RAVENOUS

Title
Review for Bringing Out the Dead (1999)

DIRECTED BY: Martin Scorsese
WRITTEN BY: Paul Schrader, based upon a novel by Joe Connelly
CAST: Nicolas Cage, Ving Rames, Tom Sizemore, John Goodman, Patricia Arquette
MPAA: Rated R for gritty violent content, drug use and language.
Runtime: USA:120
"Saving someone's life is like being in love. It's the best drug in
the world. You feel like God was in you. And why deny it? Why deny
that for a moment God was you"
"The night started out with a bang. All the elements were in place for
a long weekend: heat, humidity, moonlight. I was good at my job. There
were periods when my hands moved with a speed and skill beyond me. But
during the last year I started to loose that control. Things had
turned bad. I haven't saved anyone in months. I have come to believe
in such things as spirits leaving the body and not wanting to be put
back. I grew up in this neighborhood. I worked here most as a
paramedic and it had more ghosts per square foot than any
other. Rose's ghost was getting closer. I just needed a good night's
sleep and a couple of days off. It was six months since I lost
Rose. Homeless. Asthmatic. 18 years old. I used to block bad calls
out, but she wouldn't let go. And now she came to bare witness for all
of them -- all that have been lost. I've always had nightmares, but
now the ghosts didn't wait for me to sleep. They were part of the job-
the eyes of a corpse, the screams of a loved one. After a while I came
to understand that my role was less about saving lives, but about
bearing witness. It was enough that I simply showed up. Except with
Rose..."  Š Paramount Pictures
It is the early 1990's and New York has not yet undergone its
renaissance of recent years. Sirens screaming and lights flashing, a
New York City ambulance speeds through the night. Its drivers are
paramedics working the graveyard shift -- men who come face-to-face
with the dead and the dying on a daily basis. Burnt out from one too
many nights on the job, they are nearly as broken as the bodies they
haul through the streets. What keeps them going is their caustic sense
of comedy, and an acrid view of a world which seems to have its
surreal epicenter in Manhattan. Frank (Nicolas Cage) is among them. He
has been doing this for 5 years and it is both his salvation and his
doom, his dream and his nightmare. When he saves someone's life
everything inside him glows and he feels as light as a feather. It's
another thing when he looses a patient. And it is those cases that
turn his life into an eternal hell. Tormented by horrible nightmares
and haunted by ghosts of the people that he didn't manage to save, he
reaches the very brink of spiritual collapse and redemption. We follow
him and his colleges during 56 hours of their lives and share the
experience of being a paramedic. Among them is the angry Tom (Tom
Sizemore), the holy Marcus (Ving Rames) and the tiered Larry (John
Goodman).
This is the long awaited comeback of the respected and acclaimed
director Martin Scorsese, and I can assure you that it has been worth
waiting for. Scorsese has always been a controversial director that
created some of the best films Hollywood had to offer over the
years. 'Bringing Out the Dead' doesn't have his most obvious
trademarks, since this is not a mafia-fable, there is no particular
violence or gore, and Robert De Niro is not in it. But artistically
this is certainly 'A Martin Scorsese Film'. There is no particular
story or character development. No melodrama. No climatic ending. This
is reality. There is no question about it. It is 56 hours of a
life. Scorsese, along side with Paul Schrader ('Taxi Driver') creates
incredible characters that are so real, so human and vulnerable that
we connect with them immediately. They live in a world, unknown to
us. A world of eternal night, constant death, blood and
suffering. There are periods of depression, a feeling of
worthlessness, when they are not saving anyone. They feel like
messengers of death. Confused, tormented, haunted, angry, they are all
searching for someone to blame. A way to make their pain go away. All
they feel is a constant longing for peace -- for that long forgotten
feeling of closing the eyes and simply float away. They are not
rescuers. They are not saviors. Their job is simple -- they are
brining out the dead. This is a wildly surreal film. There is a
bizarre feeling of a world within a world. Scorsese unravels his dark
vision and paints a devastating picture of madness, paranoia, fear and
death that form a void, a darkness that swallows you and doesn't let
go.  His film is explosive, expressive, fast paced and haunting. At
times Scorsese is resorting to a pitch dark comedy, without loosing
his point. "Hold this. If you let go, I swear, I won't kill you,"
Frank warns a suicidal character with another unexpected, throwaway
punchline characteristic of all film's dialogue.  But mostly Scorsese
does what he does best -- displaying the pure, na k their
frustrations, by channeling them into something else. Frank and his
friends have all gone mad in their own direction. Larry races from
diner to fast food joint, dreaming of the suburbs. Tom's way is anger,
a murderous rage, a poor attempt to enjoy the blood and death
surrounding him, that somehow compensates for the incredible pain that
he is feeling. Marcus survives by putting his trust and hope in faith,
a belief that all the death, misery and suffering happen according to
God's divine and unknown plan. But none of their coping mechanisms
work for Frank. For him life is just a void, an existence in a never
ending darkness from which there is no escape.
Every performance is so controlled, so perfect, so real that you never
question its authenticity. Nicolas Cage, an actor that has been
accused of being a 'paycheck player', choosing money instead of art,
shows his talent in a soulful and committed performance as the
tortured and half-crazed paramedic. He mixes downcast periods of
gloomy introspection with episodes of wild, lunatic abandon. At times
his bloodshot, tormented eyes portray more sorrow and depth than any
words that he is pronouncing. This is certainly Cage's best
performance since 'Leaving Las Vegas'. Tom Sizemore ('Heat', 'Saving
Private Ryan' ) is equally magnificent. He releases so much energy, so
much emotion and power into his performance that he looks more like a
ticking bomb rather than a person. Ving Rames ('Entrapment' ) gives a
brilliant comic performance as the 'holy medic'. There are times when
before resurrecting someone on the streets he (in a high pitched
voice) asks God's forgiveness for "these sinners". Visually and
technically this film is above perfect. Robert Richardson's
cinematography is rich and inventive, employing some crazy shots as
the camera turns the world upside down. Thelma Schoonmaker binds
Richardson's shots together with her explosive editing, fast motion,
flashing lights and neon glow. The music is provided by Elmer
Bernstein's bizarre, eclectic score and some wisely inserted songs by
Van Morrison and The Clash, among others. When all those elements are
combined, they create an almost carnival atmosphere of light and
shade, speed and violence that really gets under the skin. New York
has never looked so dark before. The streets are empty, lit only by
the pale moon, neon glow and flashing red lights of an ambulance. The
only inhabitants are shadows, filth and dust. In other words, Scorsese
has created a wildly surreal, dark and effectively paranoid motion
picture, which is the director's best work since 'Goodfellas'
(1990). Remember: This is NOT a light, entertaining popcorn-film or a
feel-good movie. It is an incred i tale, which is nothing less than a
powerful and emotionally devastating cinematic experience, created by
the maestro of shadows and light.

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
DIRECTED BY: Ridley Scott
WRITTEN BY: David H. Franzoni and John Logan (I)
Runtime: USA:154 / UK:155 / Portugal:152
Country: USA
Language: English
Color: Color (Technicolor)
Sound Mix: DTS / Dolby Digital / SDDS
Certification: USA:R / UK:15 / Germany:16 / Netherlands:16 / Norway:15 /
Singapore:PG / Australia:M / Finland:K-16
Amidst the mighty city of Rome, stands the Coliseum, shining in the sunlight
in all its splendor and magnificence. It is the greatest construction in
human history and a proof of that Rome truly is the center of the earth. In
it -- blood flows and heads roll amidst the laughing and applauds of the
noble crowd. This is the symbol of the Roman Empire -- a symbol of the
pride, mesmerizing beauty and inhuman power, but also of the savage
brutality of the Roman ideology.
It has been four decades since chariots raced and swords flashed across
movie screens in epic dramas of a time long past. Now, director Ridley Scott
brings the glorious battles of the ancient Roman arena back to the big
screen in a sweeping story of courage and revenge. The great Roman General
Maximus (Russell Crowe) has once again led the legions to victory on the
battlefield. The war won, Maximus dreams of home, wanting only to return to
his wife and son; however, the dying Emperor Marcus Aurelius (Richard
Harris) has one more duty for the general-to assume the mantle of his power.
Jealous of Maximusí favor with the emperor, the heir to the throne, Commodus
(Joaquin Phoenix), orders his execution and that of his family. Barely
escaping death, Maximus is forced into slavery and trained as a gladiator in
the arena where his fame grows. Now he has come to Rome, intent on avenging
the murder of his wife and son by killing the new emperor Commodus. Maximus
has learned that the one power stronger than that of the emperor is the will
of the people, and he knows he can only attain his revenge by becoming the
greatest hero in all the empire.
This is Ridley Scott's greatest and most successful achievement since 'Blade
Runner' (1981). 'Gladiator' is what 'Titanic' was supposed to be: a
combination of a dramatic emotional story, grand star cast and breathtaking
visuals. A film with spectacular locations, wonderous cinematography, fast
paced editing and heavenly music. But when 'Titanic' stopped at visual
perfection, creating merely an illusion of a great epic, 'Gladiator'
succeeds because of David Franzoini's complex script, multidimensional
characters and impressive acting. Russel Crowe , recently Oscar nominated
for his role in 'The Insider', is equally spectacular in his recent
achievement as the vengeful Roman general. It is a role that demands more
presence than acting, but Crowe has both. Scott , along side with
screenwriter David Franzoini ('Amistad') have created very strong, mature
and complex characters that are all spirits of their time. Maximus is the
greatest general of Rome and a loyal servant of his good master Marcus
Aurelius, fabulously played by Oscar nominee Richard Harris. Maximus was an
idealist -- a noble warrior that believed in justice, perfect worlds,
rightisnous kings and sacrifices for the greater good. But a tough life has
shown him the dark side of his paradise. He is a simple man with simple
needs. The endless wars, the constant death around him and his hands still
warm from his enemies blood, don't bother him anymore. He has become numb.
The only light in his life is the hope that someday he will see his wife and
son again. When he looses his master, his family and his reputation, he
cheats death and returns to Rome, with one single purpose -- avenge the
death of his family. He soon finds himself a part of a conspiracy to murder
the young Emperor, Commodus. Commodes is the most complex character in the
story and has a striking resemblance to Amon Göth from Steven Spielberg's
'Schindler's List'. A man that is capable of unspeakable crimes, and jet
never becoming a consistent villain in our eyes. He is a man with not so
many great qualities, but with great desires and ambitions. As the film
progresses, we get to know him as a person and dive deeper into his dark
heart. He is filled with emotions that he can not express, reaching for love
and respect he can not gain. Phoenix ('8MM') plays him fabulously as an
amoral, insecure young man driven to near madness by total power and the
inherent loneliness that attends it. The only support he thinks he has is
from his sister, Lucile. Played by Connie Nielsen ('The Devil's Advocate' ),
she is a wise, mysterious beauty. She remains at her brother's side until
she realizes the incredible danger, but then it is too late. In the latter
part of the film, we see her cruelly abused and mistreated by Commodes, with
her past intelligence and freshness lost forever. Proximo is an old
gladiator that gained his freedom with the blood of his opponents and the
will of the crowd. He is a lion. His eyes have not lost the fearsome power
and his voice has not lost its strength. In Maximus he sees himself at a
younger age, and this encounter awakens memories of his glorious past.
Energetically played by Oliver Reed in the last role of his life, where he
shows why he was elected one of the best actors alive. Proximo teaches
Maximus the tricks of the trade and makes it possible for him to go to Rome
and dream of revenge against the new emperor. All these lives and many more
are crossed together, woven into a magnificent web of events. There is a
great and touching friendship between Maximus and Juba, a good-hearted man
that has suffered the same fate as Maximus himself, is emotionally portrayed
by 'Amistad's Djimon Honsou . This friendship remains the only pure and good
in a world of blood and death. There is a very interesting and heartbreaking
relationship between Commodus, his sister and her son; and a touching
connection between Proximo and Maximus. The film is also filled with
intellectually stimulating conspiracies and betrayals -- the darkness under
the sparkling facade -- the Senate.
'Gladiator' is a perfect combination that will certainly appeal to the mass
audience, and although it's not as primitive as 'Titanic', it will still
rock the box office. But this is much more than a commercial success, it's
an artistic and intellectual achievement. It has an extremely powerful
emotional impact. Grotesque battles in all their glory (inspired by 'Saving
Private Ryan' ), a great love lost and friendship gained. Hopes, dreams,
fantasies, ideas and ideologies. Revenge in all its darkness, justice,
sacrifice, betrayal and destiny in all its mystique. This film has it all.
And it is presented in such beauty and elegance that it's impossible to
refuse. Although Maximus existed only in ancient legends, this film has
otherwise a very strong grounding in history. Both Marcus Aurelius - the
philosopher, Lucile - the wise and the Roman senators depicted in this
movie, really existed. As for Commodes it is said: "[He was] one of the few
Roman emperors of whom nothing good can be said..". Off course characters
such as Proximo are all fictions, but extremely effective.
Rome is recreated in all its splendor and power thanks to Benjamín
Fernández's and John King's magical art direction and miraculous digital
special effects. Here, even Romans would feel at home. Every detail is
perfect, whether it is the 100's of statues that surround the Coliseum or a
tree in the forests of Germania. The sets look even more real when you see
the costumes these actors are in. They are supremely crafted with every
detail taken care of. The lighting, the framing, the blue camera filters,
in-depth high speed filming of a war with the Germanic Barbarians and a
Gladiatorial reenactment of the war of Cartage. But what Ridley Scott has
achieved is much more than visual splendor. He has somehow recreated a
multidimensional picture of Rome, with its corruption and wickedness hidden
under the shining mask of grandness. He has created an uneasy and disturbing
atmosphere where everyone are against one another. Where everyone is talking
about the welfare of Rome, while thinking only about personal gain and
happiness. It's a place where friends smiling stab each other in the back --
the whole specter of Roman mentality. This is 'Spartacus' with all its
intelligence, 'Braveheart' with all its pumping adrenaline, 'Saving Private
Ryan' with all its openness and raw emotions, and 'Titanic with all its
visual splendor. Whether it will win the Oscars is yet to be discovered, but
one thing is certain, Ridley Scott has created a true and glorious epic.

Title
Review for Shanghai Noon (2000)
MPAA: Rated PG-13 for action violence, some drug humor, language and sensuality
Runtime: USA:110
RATING: 8/10 
Jackie Chan is back! If this sentence means anything to you, if Kung-Fu, Karate and elegant fights make you happy, see this film. If not, you don't have to read the rest of this review. Maybe I am wrong, but I believe that the fans of Jackie Chan and martial arts will get much more out of this than other members of the audience. On front, let me just say that this is a very entertaining film. It is somewhat 'Wild Wild West' tried to be. Jackie Chan has never been better. And it may very be his first film where the story is equally appealing as the action sequences.
In the unknown regions of ancient China, lies a forbidden city, surrounded by majestic mountains, and hidden from the rest of the world. Mystique and treasures are conceived behind its walls and protected by the royal army of brave and invincible warriors. The Emperor's daughter (Lucy Liu) dreams of another life, where freedom is more important than wealth and traditions. Seduced by the western way of life, she follows an American officer to the land of opportunities, where she falls under the power of Lo Fong (Roger Yuan), a former warrior that escaped the forbidden city for the same dreams. Demanding a gigantic ransom for the princess, he imprisons her in his mine, where Chinese workers are tortured under his tyranny. It is now time for four brave worriers to rescue the princess and return her safely home. One of these worriers is Chon Wang (Jackie Chan). On a train to Carson City, Chon runs into Roy O'Bannon (Owen Wilson) -- the inept leader of a gang of a bumbling but dang!
erous train robbers. He is an outlaw with ethics (imagine that). A romantic that  never steals from women and can barely shoot a gun. When Roy hears about the ransom that has to be paid, he becomes friends with Chon, but their relationship turns soon into a true friendship. We follow them on their quest, filled with dangers, surprises and adventures...
Forbidden exotic cities, snowy mountains, golden prairies, saloons, beautiful princesses, brave heroes, evil villains, duels to the death and "happily ever after" -- this film has it all. Like its plot, the movie combines the classic Cowboy-movies with the beautiful Hong Kong-action. The result is a good portion of good old fashioned entertainment presented with a new and refreshing twist. Most of the time 'Shanghai Noon' is very funny because of this rather original premise: the Ancient East meets the Wild West. You won't find a better contrast than that. China is a land of beauty,magic and mystique. Ancient traditions that command total obedience. Here a man must not think for himself. He must follow orders from a great, almost divine force. America is a land of endless fields, green forests, clear rivers. Unchanged since the beginning of time. Yet untouched by man's vanity. It is the sunrise of a new civilization that slowly emerges from the shadows of the gray taverns. Ben!
eath the ruffness, lies the endless and pure freedom. Alfred Gough's and Miles Millar's script consists of endless and mostly amusing whacks on the cultural differences between the civilizations. We follow our brave warrior on his quest, and his many amusing encounters with the Indians, Outlaws and Wild Cowboys. There are moments in the first hour of the film, when you won't stop laughing. But after making his point, first-time-director Tom Dey doesn't quite know what to do and so the second half of the movie is mostly a wait for the ending. Of course in a film like this, a climax can not exist for one simple reason: from the very beginning you know how the film will end. That is why the screenwriter should save some of the hilarious moments till the end. Instead they are all released in the first half of the movie, which although makes you laugh non stop in the beginning, leave you bored and a bit disappointed in the end. In other words, this film extends its curtecy for all !
too long, repeating itself for no obvious reason.
In the end it is the wisely chosen pair that holds this film together. That element is the constant positive force that makes the movie into a great experience. Together Chan and Wilson make a great and believable team. Jackie Chan is superb in this role. I couldn't think of anyone who could provoke genuine emotions between the graceful Kung-Fu kicks. There is something about him that alienates him from the other actors in his category. He does not posses the muscles of Arnold Schwartznegger, he doesn't resort to explosions or digital effects to look interesting (like Steven Segal), nor does he move with the gracefulness of Jean Claude van Dam. And yet he generates so much warmth and sweetness that it compensates for all the virtues mentioned above. We'r not just amazed by his physical abilities. He makes us care about his character. Wilson has what it takes to be a failed cowboy. What's very important is that he understands the atmosphere, the style of the film, so that he do!
esn't over act or make his character to serious.
A very decent cinematography and costume design are accompanied by an energetic musical score by Randy Edelman. The editing may need some polishing, since the film drags on for all too long, testing everyone's patience. Though Dey presents a story that gives him many possibilities, he uses few of them and resorts soon to an ordinary action / adventure that (though not original) is solid. It is a less artistic, but lighter and more amusing experience than 'Mission: Impossible 2' . A true, cheerful good hearted delight that provides a light, harmless entertainment for audience members of any age. 

Title
Review for Dogma (1999)
Many things have been said about Kevin Smith's latest film and not
everything was good. This movie  has created more controversy than 'Fight
Club'. It has been cursed by the Vatican and dozens of hate letters were
sent to its creator. It truly is provocative, constantly on the edge, but
also wonderfully refreshing. This is one of the kind -- a magnificent black
comedy which is savagely funny and imaginatively philosophic. It is witty,
accurate, fast paced and possibly one of the best satires in the history of
the genre.
Starting with an apology that goes on for almost ten minutes, explaining to
the audience that all characters and events are fictions and are not ment to
be taken seriously, the story slowly takes shape.
Loki (Matt Damon) is an angel that got drunk and flicked off the Lord (among
others Alanis Morissette). Bartleby (Ben Affleck) is the co-conspirator who
indirectly got both himself, and Loki, permanently kicked out of Heaven for
Loki's infraction. Cardinal Glick (George Carlin) is the Catholic determined
to reinvigorate the Catholic church by eliminating sacred objects such as
Christ on the Crucifix, and replacing them with things such as Christ
winking, smiling and giving the "thumbs up" to fervent church-goers. In an
attempt to get people to give the "new and improved" Roman Catholic Church a
try, the Cardinal declares that anyone passing through the Church's doors
will be forgiven of all of their sins. This creates a loophole in church
dogma that will allow them to end their eternal exile in Wisconsin and
reenter the pearly gates of Heaven, sin-free. The problem is, if this
happens, God will be proven fallible, and all of existence will be erased.
With God having been put out of commission while on a holiday, the fate of
the world and all else rests with efforts of a ragtag bunch: Metatron (Alan
Rickman ), the angel who serves as the voice of God; Rufus (Chris Rock), the
bitter, heretofore unknown 13th Apostle; a heavenly Muse Serendipity (Salma
Hayek); a pair of familiar Prophets by the name Jay and Silent Bob (Jason
Mewes and Smith himself); and the reluctant key figure in thwarting the
renegade duo, Bethany (Linda Fiorentino), who has lost her faith in God,
when a heralding angel appears in her bedroom and declares her the last
descendant of Jesus and the potential savior of humanity. Of course there
are plenty of bad guys and nasty obstacles to get in the way of our heroes
and their attempt to save the past, present and future.
"Dogma" is never becomes boring or predictable. It is savagely funny with
its many humorous lines, such as the dialoge between the messanger of God
and Bethany:
Metatron: Moses was a drunk. Look what he accomplished. And no one's even
asking you to part an ocean. All you have to do is go to New Jersey
Metatron: Lonely. But funny. He's got a great sense of humor.
Or when the Muse is talking about her writing block:
Serendipity: Can you believe it? Me -- a muse, for God's sake! I sit down in
front of the typewriter, and what do I get? Nothing. Blank page. I can't
even write a grocery list.
Bethany: What about what you did with Jay and Silent Bob? You inspired them.
Serendipity: That's the cosmic joke. I can give out a zillion and nine ideas
a second, but I can't keep any for myself. Her [God's] quirky sense of
humor..
Between the humor and witty comparisons, lies a lot of intelligent and
thought provoking material. Smith is elegantly shifting from amusing comedy,
to intelligent drama, from sharp parody to creepy thriller. He plays with
religion, twisting and stretching it, posing it in another light. Sometimes
it feels like a humorous remake of Shakespeare's "A Midsummer Night's
Dream", where heavens open up and the divine creatures come down from Heaven
and Hell to play with us. There is no pompous dialogue and Charlton Heston
is not descending a mountain with a set of tablets in hand, however "Dogma"
manages to exhibit a deep knowledge of not only the bible, and also the
tenets of Christianity throughout the ages. And although that's what Vatican
is stating, the audience will not be discouraged by this film, loosing their
beliefs. There is a lot of symbolism in this movie, that is helping us
realize that there is a supreme power that watches over us. The purpose of
this film is not to provoke hatred and misbelief, but instead to gain faith
and maybe look at the question of religion from a broader perspective.
When it comes to the visual aspect of this film, it is flawless. A solid
cinematography and fast paced editing are framing the actors' impressive
preformances. The two friends, Damon and Affleck, repeat the success of
"Good Will Hunting" and are both a joy to watch. Alan Rickman and Chris Rock
are fabulous, and Linda Fiorentino convincing. So, basically this should be
a hit at the box office. But it's not just its provocative style and risky
premise that stops "Dogma" from a being a serious Oscar-contender. There are
some silly moments, when Smith goes a bit too far and the originality
transforms into stupidity. But, forgetting these minor flops (luckily there
are not many of them), this is a revalation. Some serious questions are
raised about Catholic dogma and organized religion in general. By virtue of
their definition and the fact that they're in regards to religion, these
questions would understandably upset religious groups. But what those
objectors fail to see that the questions raised, such as the dangerous
differences between "beliefs" and "ideas," are intelligent ones that would
only spring from the mind of someone who takes his or her faith seriously.
It is a hilarious, intriguing, intelligent, bizarre and daring experience
that is a spectacular analysis of human behavior, our needs, beliefs and
problems since the beginning of time. The angry reactions that have met
Smith, prove that he has managed to create an epic and should be taken as a
compliment. And remember my words: "Dogma" will gain the status of a cult
film in five years tops.

Title
Review for Scary Movie (2000)
DIRECTED BY: Keenen Ivory Wayans
WRITTEN BY: Marlon and Shawn Wayans
CAST: Anna Faris, Shannon Elizabeth, Cheri Oteri, Dave Sheridan 
MPAA: Rated R for strong crude sexual humor, language, drug use and violence.
Runtime: USA:112 (unrated version)
Most good comedies can be recognized by a solid script with twists,
turns and funny surprises. "Scary Movie" is comedy in Leslie
Nielsen-style, which consists of canned satirical whacks and rough
jokes tied together by slapsticks. It makes fun of practically every
scary movie that has been released during the last decade: Borrowing
the overall plot on an almost scene-by-scene basis, director Keenen
Ivory Wayans sharpens his knives and starts cutting away at characters
and situations. He then throws in sliced-and-diced pieces from I Know
What You Did Last Summer, Scream 2, Election, The Blair Witch Project,
Titanic/Amistad, The Sixth Sense, The Matrix, The Usual Suspects, The
Exorcist and probably a few others into a colorful and sometimes crude
mix.
''Scary Movie'' peaks pretty early when a bodacious high school
student Drew Becker (Carmen Electra, who cheerfully toys with her
image) making popcorn when the phone rings. A voice on the other end
inquires what her favorite scary movie. Frightened she looks around
and then at the table. On it she sees: a gun, a grenade, a condom and
a banana. Naturally she chooses the banana. Soon, she's running
through sprinklers in her underwear with a masked man in pursuit. She
then sees two traffic signs. One says ''Safety,'' the other says
''Death.'' She obviously knows the rules of a slasher movie and
chooses "Death". The next day, her murder is big news at the local
high school, and pushy reporter Gale Hailstorm (Cheri Oteri) is
shoving her mike into the faces of the glazed teens and shrieking at
her cameraman while trying to harvest material for a sequel to her
bestseller ''You're Dead, I'm Rich.'' Meanwhile, cute and innocent
Cindy (Anna Faris) begins to worry that the murder might have
something to do with a man she and her friends accidentally killed
last Halloween. Her closest pals, Buffy (Shannon Elizabeth) Brenda
(Regina Hall), and her boyfriend Bobby (Jon Abrahams), try to convince
her otherwise. But the killer is soon stalking her, and not even the
efforts of Deputy Dufy (Dave Sheridan) can save the day. The whole
thing ends with a "Wild Things" epilogue.
Ever since ''Friday the 13th,'' ''Halloween,'' and ''The Evil Dead,''
the genre has rested on a solid, if inexplicable, base of teens
rushing to dark, lonely places where they know violent murders
occur. And director Wayans portrays their uncovered stupidity,
primitive dialogue through ironysing every rule of scary movies --
every cliche of the horny teen horror genre, the teenage students
played by actors in their 20s and early 30s, the sex kittens, and
fringe characters like the student pothead and the doofus cop.
"Scary Movie" proves to be the kind of film that will offend the
cultivated elderly audience and leave just about everyone else
laughing until tears run down their cheeks. However, the films is far
from perfect. The most obvious element is that "Scary Movie" requires
that the viewer is familiar with the movies it so hard tries to
parodieses. But even then you are not guarantee. Only about 40% of the
jokes in Scary Movie work. The movie is a strange combination of
bright satirical remarks and unbearably stupid jokes. It moves from
clever parallels to farts and body fluids and back again in a
second. There are a lot of crude moments, and some that are simply too
dumb to generate a response. However, considering the sheer quantity
of material that is thrown at us, even a gigantic failure rate
represents a lot of laughs. The film has a significantly higher laugh
quotient at the beginning than near the end, the satire is sharper,
the jokes funnier. During the final half-hour there are several
noticeable dead spots, when there is no laughing in the theatre, just
an awkward silence. In addition it is absolutely necessary to remember
that "Scream" was also a slight parody on the slasher films as
well. And so "Scary Movie" becomes at times a pushy parody on a parody
on a parody, which is kind of unnecessary.
The question facing the target audience for ''Scary Movie'' is whether
the funny bits will be enough of a payoff for sitting through the
tedious stuff between them. Many have written angry remarks about the
risky content of this film -- the discriminating "gay humor", the
disturbing remarks on culture and art. This is very unfortunate. I
believe that "Scary Movie" doesn't take anything too seriously,
including itself. Being somehow provoked by this movie is completely
unnecessary. I admit that it does push too hard at times and often
crosses the line of decency and good taste, but the laughs are coming
in a row - non stop and that's a sign of a successful comedy. And
speaking for myself -- this is certainly my favorite scary movie in a
very long time.

Title
Review for Phantoms (1998)
What starts as a frightening and stimulating psychological horror film, soon
turns into a primitive and brainless monster flick. And although it presents
some interesting ideas and some chills, it remains a waste of money and
talent.
Dr. Jennifer Pailey (Going) arrives home with her teenage sister Lisa
(McGowan) only to find the 400 residents of Snowfield Colorado missing or
dead. Most seem to have died or disappeared in the middle of their daily
activities with no sign that they knew what fate was about to strike.
Unnerved already, the pair are dismayed to find that the phone lines have
been cut and that their jeep which had been working a few minutes earlier
now refuses to start. Setting out on foot, they soon find three cops who
have just returned to the town and are now also trapped. Sheriff Bryce
Hammond (Affleck) with the help of two deputies including the slightly
unhinged Ben Wargle (Schreiber) has decided to investigate the cause of the
disappearances before calling in help. What they find defies explanation and
they quickly decide to make that call. But even with the help of two armored
transports filled with scientists, soldiers and an expert scientist who has
studied ancient mass disappearances (O'Toole ), they can not stop the
unstoppable and unknown force that has been unleashed. It is at this point
that the film takes an unfortunate veer away from psychological horror into
the less threatening monster movie genre.
I loved the way the first part of the film was structured. It began with a
surprising and shocking prologue and a chill that refused to leave me for
almost an hour. I loved the way the story was built, hinting on
extraterrestrial activities, forcing the viewer to look at the sky, while
the actual danger comes from the unknown depths of our planet. There are
some interesting ideas here. Like what it means to be a god. I got scared
and shocked and intrigued, but then...came the finale..I must admit that
after such an engaging and terrifying prologue you are all wired up and you
wait in anticipation for the resolution and explanation of these strange and
bizarre events. And when it finally comes, it's so disappointing and
primitive, that all you want to do is to turn off your VCR. An animal that
gets intelligence, memories and knowledge through eating flesh and can take
any form and shape of its devoured pray. That's an interesting explanation!
In comparison to this scientific discovery, "Godzilla" is a worthy Nobel
price winner.
The fact that you get to see Peter O'Toole and Ben Affleck play undeveloped
and immature characters in small, pale parts only makes things worse. The
"Scream"-veterans Going and McGowan seem more at home and, as you probably
can guess, their performances are not going to make it to the Oscar night.
The film manages to gradually build up suspense and horror, but falls right
on its face, when it is at its best. It is a strange combination of a
successful horror film and a stupid cliche-ridden monster story. In the end
it's nothing more than a mediocre horror flick, not worthy of your special
attention.

Title
Review for Ninth Gate, The (1999)
DIRECTED BY: Roman Polanski
WRITTEN BY: Roman Polanski and John Brownjohn
MPAA: Rated R for some violence and sexuality.
Runtime: USA:127 / UK:133 / Argentina:133 / Finland:134 / France:132 /
Spain:143
Country: France / Spain / USA
Language: English / French / Latin
Color: Color
Certification: USA:R / UK:15 / Belgium:KT / Finland:K-16 / France:U /
Germany:16
After 'Chinatown' he disappeared, and to this day everyone were anxiously
waiting for his comeback. Now Artisan Pictures presents Roman Polanski's
fresh thriller "The Ninth Gate". Polanski was fascinated by the concept of
good and evil, their effect and place in our lives. "The Ninth Gate" is no
exception. It is a more intelligent and elegant version of 'End of Days'
The Ninth Gate begins ominously  a comfortable-looking study takes on a
distinctly uncomfortable atmosphere as middle-aged man hangs himself with a
rope that dangles from the chandelier. Then we see Dean Corso (Johnny Depp,
'Sleepy Hollow') at work. He's a rare books expert, of `the lean, hungry,
restless type, who would stab friends in the back.' As the wealthy book
collector Boris Balkan (Frank Langella, 'Dracula' ) observes, `It is easy to
trust a man whose loyalty can be measured in money'. Corso is highly skilled
at his work, a position which requires dexterity, cultural expertise, nerves
of steel...and few scruples. Known for locating rare books for wealthy
collectors, Corso is hired by eminent book-lover and scholar of demonology,
Boris Balkan. Corso's mission: to find the last two volumes of the legendary
manual of satanic invocation "The Nine Gates of the Shadow Kingdom" - a book
surpassingly written by Lucifer himself. Corso has to compare them with
Balkan's first volume, supposedly the only one of its kind, and ascertain
the authenticity of the series. Corso accepts the challenge. From New York
to Toledo, Paris to Cintra, he immerses himself in a labyrinth full of
pitfalls and temptations, disturbing encounters, violence and mysterious
deaths. Protected by an angelic creature and guided by a force more powerful
than himself, the hunter solves one by one the mysteries of the dreaded Book
and discovers the real purpose of his mission...
Polanski carefully constructs his script and creates very interesting
characters. Among the other sinful types racing with Corso toward their
devilish goals are nymphomaniac rich widow Liana Telfer (Lena Olin), and her
menacing albino bodyguard (Tony Amoni), the angry-at-God wheelchair-bound
Satan aficionado Baroness Kessler (Barbara Jefford) and a mysterious blond
backpacker who appears everywhere and may possess supernatural powers
(played by Polanski's wife, Emmanuelle Seigner).
The film becomes a crazed journey into darkness. What starts as a quest for
money, goes deeper as he dives into his soul. Corso is a professional in his
area, nonetheless it looks like he is following his own shadow. The film is
greatly woven as Polanski plays with the definitions of good and evil. The
pure, real evil is not 'the end of days'. It's not an apocalypse, fire or
fury, but the dark side of the human soul and psyche. Satan need not show
himself with external signs, but can work entirely within ourselves -- our
minds and souls. Evil resorts in us and is as natural as goodness, only
easier to live by.
This film is at times funny, at times frightening, shocking and operating on
a slighter higher intellectual level than most of its genre. Like in 'The
Devil's Advocate' nothing is obvious and nothing is primitive. The Devil
doesn't puke blood or blow up buildings. And yet, he shows himself. He is
everywhere around us. And by taking the dark path, we're letting Him into
our souls. Sometimes he can be seen in a little girl, sometimes in a dog.
And little by little, Corso becomes the monster he seeks. As the Devil
brilliantly says in the slightly better 'The Devil's Advocate': "..Follow
the money..straight to the top..", Dean Corso persuaded the only thing
sacred for him. His path went through greed, lust, anger and finally led to
the key to the darkest place of his soul. He finally understood his place
and meaning..
The movie is one intense visual nightmare, based on the European hit "El
Club Dumas" by Spanish writer Arturo Perez Reverte. It is an ironic, tense,
literate story in which Lucifer and his minions and worshippers increasingly
erupt into everyday reality. 'The Ninth Gate' is a typical European movie,
made in the classic style. This means -- no expensive models, no action
sequences, no digital special effects. It is full of terrific locations, and
Polanski's eye has not faltered. He has a fine photo/design team, a good
score by Wojciech Kilar, and his knowledge of Europe puts him way ahead of
most American directors who could have been hired. Johnny Depp is a perfect
choice for the cynical and intelligent 'book detective' -- the master of
every situation. With a develish black beard and dark eyes, he coolly walks
the streets, smoking a dozen cigars a day. Depp is spectacular in a role
that is difficult and demanding. Perfect is Frank Langella as the mysterious
and deadly aristocrat. Interesting is Lena Olin as the deadly beauty and
Barbara Jefford as the sinister invalid, hungry for revenge. Worse is
Emmanuelle Seigner, who is perfect when the camera zooms into her diabolical
green eyes, but she is not much of an actress. She remains the Sofia Copolla
of this film.
"The Ninth Gate" is the latest horror movie by a master of the genre. It's
not a perfect film. It's not as provoking and energetic as 'The Devil's
Advocate' and it's not as genially frightening as 'Rose Mary's Baby'. It is
unfortunately a bit dull and boring at times, when Corso is desperately
running through the empty streets of European cities. And I wonder if
audiences will accept it that way. With "Scream 3" and "Battlefield Earth"
around the corner, will today's audiences accept intelligence or embrace the
usual blood, gore and technological marvels? I think that the answer is
obvious: this will not be a major hit at the box office. But for you all
serious movie goers -- this is quality. 'The Ninth Gate' is drained in
Polanski's specialties: rich dark humor, mysterious premise and overwhelming
atmospheres of doom and dread.
This review is written by Alex Ioshpe (C) 1999

Title
Review for Bone Collector, The (1999)
DIRECTED BY: Phillip Noyce
WRITTEN BY: Jeremy Iacone, based on the book by Jeffery Deaver
CAST: Denzel Washington, Angelina Joilie, Queen Latifah, Ed O'Neill
MPAA: Rated R for strong violent content including grisly images, and for language.
Runtime: USA:118
After David Fincher's "Se7en" (1997), there have been several attempts
to create a film similar in story and impact, but without any
success. "Fallen" (1998), "Resurrection" (1998) and "Kiss the Girls"
(1998) are some.  The latest is 'The Bone Collector' (1999!), which is
like most of its predecessors a failure. The directors of these films
have all tried to copy every aspect of Fincher's work: a dark
detective story, lots of violence, a gritty atmosphere and impressive
cast. But though they all shot during night, had the most inventive
murderers and murders (that successfully got them the necessary
R-rating) they were unable to produce the most important, that what
you can not copy -- talent.
The plot is a collection of stereotypes beginning with the brilliant
policeman, philosopher and writer Lincoln Rhyme (Denzel Washington)
who, under the investigation broke his spine and lies now at home,
where he is taken care of the good nurse (Queen Latifah) and friend
(Gary Swanson ). He and the rest of the inhabitants of New York city
are oblivious of the psycho-killer that realms the streets, picking up
his victims in a cab and murdering them using the most ancient
methods. One of these innocent victim's body is found by Amelia
Donaghy (Angelina Joilie), who has handled the episode with such
professionalism that it catches Rhyme's attention. The police, led by
'Bundy''s Ed O'Neill (I) is helpless and it is up to Rhyme and his
young apprentice to catch the killer..
The story is filled with mysterious leads, bizarre puzzles and
devastating events, but who cares? It just isn't interesting. It
doesn't have any drive to it. There is nothing that this movie can
boast of. It approaches familiar themes and enters explored
territories, but it doesn't have neither the intensity and dark
philosophy of "Se7en" or the sophistication of "Silence of the
Lambs". I think it's time for the directors to realize that there has
to be a point, at least some intelligence in the story, besides the
murders, chases and darkness. Apparently that element was
forgotten. None of the performances are worthy of notice, the
cinematography is a poor copy of Darius Khondji (Seven), the editing
is average, the music a cliche. In fact the whole film feels like a
clone, an unsuccessful mutation of all the psycho-thrillers that we've
seen before. Joilie and Washington are unable to look as a potential
couple, unable to generate tension, yet alone drive the story
forward. The other actors act as they are just waiting for their
paychecks. The sets are dark, but unreal. And the whole film looks
staged, pointless and even phony at times. Even the awaited ending is
a disappointment. This is the classic example of an artistic failure,
but it certainly doesn't mean that it's completely unwatchable. It is
a film for a rainy day and two free hours when you do not know what to
do. And then you just may insert this cassette into your VCR, press
PLAY and let Washington and Joilie guide you on a pointless, but
occasionally enjoyable ride through the dark streets of New York.

Title
Review for Showgirls (1995)
"Nothing more than a high budget masturbation fantasy" 
SHOWGIRLS (NC-17) - Contains graphic nudity, profanity, sexual situations and violence. Some people, however, keep their clothes on. 
You do not watch porn films for their intellectual values, nor do you
write reviews on them. That's why this review will be short. It seems
that this film will end up in the porn section when it hits the video
stores. There is no story, script, point or acting. Only naked bodies,
which is exactly the point.
Here is the so called plot: Nomi, the 23-year-old with a dark past as
a hooker, has hitchhiked from somewhere back east to perform in a show
where a dancer doesn't wear much more than a light coating of powder
and a big, fake smile. No one is twisting Nomi's arm. No one is
holding her grandmother hostage. She wants to do this. And that is
what she is doing till the end credits. So what's the problem then?
What's the point? What's the film about? Is there anyone whose
aspirations could inspire less sympathy? This film can be described in
one sentence: Obscene level of incompetence, excessive stupidity in
the story line, gross negligence of the viewer's intelligence, a
prurient interest in the quick buck. Believe me, after an hour with
these characters, acting and script, you'll start hoping for someone
to kill somebody.
Elizabeth Berkley makes a laughable try as the heroine of this film,
that is bad even for Eszterhas' script. Her character is the only one
that is at least half written and she could really have done
better. Her character denies the fact that she is a whore for the
industry, selling her body to the hungry eyes of the horny public. "I
am not a whore! I am a dancer", she screams, but does it in such an
over dramatized way that you'll start laughing. In fact the acting in
"Showgirls" brings terrible to a new and previously unknown level. Not
one single achievement, besides the conventional cinematography, is
worth mentioning. It is a total waste of time and money. There is not
a single moment of what you might call intelligence. The dialogue is
structured of ancient stereotypes and cliches lined up one after
another. Its attempt to even imagine to have half a brain results in a
catastrophe. "In my films," writes director Paul Verhoeven ('Basic
Instinct', 'Total Recall'), "I hold the mirror up to life." Well,
excuse me? His attempt to go behind the scenes of Las Vegas, and as he
put it "show the naked truth", is simplified and unreal. Occasionally,
between his collection of mistakes and logical irrationalities,
screenwriter Joe Eszterhas (the creator of some of the worst
screenplays in Hollywood history) inserts some lines of deep morality,
that sound something like this: "Hey, I see you. I see that you're
hiding" - "From what?" - "From you". Yes, and even the only decent
line in this film: "Nomi is what Las Vegas is all about" can't save
'Showgirls' from going under. It's a strange phenomena. It's not
erotic, because it lacks sensuality. Not dramatic, because it lacks
the acting. And not intelligent because it lacks a story. It is simply
Verhoven's bad excuse for making pornography. You want to see naked
women? Bare breasts? Full frontals? It's nothing wrong with that. But
in that case I suggest that you rent a porn film in your local video
store, and not waste time surviving through Eszterhas' pathetic
dialogue.  B qualities, while it's only a high budget porn-film.

Title
Review for Any Given Sunday (1999)
DIRECTED BY: Oliver Stone
WRITTEN BY: Oliver Stone, John Logan and Daniel Pyn
CAST: Al Pacino, Cameron Diaz, Dennis Quide, James Woods, Jamie Coxx, Charlton Heston
Life is a fierce competition. You are always racing forward, but no
matter how good you are, there are always men that are younger than
you, tougher than you, stronger than you, racing along side with
you. Everyone of them is ready to push you aside, to kill, in order to
come first. This time the subject is the brutal world of fictitious
American football team the Miami Sharks. Possibly the most
"Oliver-Stoney" Oliver Stone movie to date, Pacino essentially plays a
hard-drinking football coach who must reverse the Sharks' losing
streak, while the predictably underwritten ice maiden comes in the
form of Diaz' ball-breaking club owner. But he starts questioning his
own priorities. Is winning really the most important, or is it
something else?
Comparing American Football to American life is an interesting idea
and Oliver Stone is the natural choice. Here everything is in the
open. The players stand against each other, ready to release all their
energy into one single move. Ready to sacrifice themselves for a
single moment of victory. It just takes a couple of seconds, and in
that time, you either survive or go down. If you make your way
forward, and come out alive, crawling on the bodies of your teammates,
there is no end to your glory, until a better player comes along, and
then you will be pushed to the ground, and be forgotten. They are the
gladiators of our time. This is their arena and America is
watching. But on any given Sunday, no matter how good you are, you'll
either win or loose...
This is certainly Oliver Stone's (Platoon, Born the Fourth of July,
Natural Born Killers) strangest film in some time. He has always been
known as a bold director, unafraid to make his statement, no matter
how risky or controversial it is. Nothing is subtle. Everything is in
the open. He has proven to be a "man of the truth". And "Any Given
Sunday" is drained in his most famous trademarks: the twisted
cinematography, flashy editing, multidimensional sound. Yet, there is
something about this film that somehow makes it worse than Stone's
previous. It's not that I didn't enjoy it. I certainly did, but I do
not quite know why. Maybe because I share Stone's fascination with
American Football or maybe because of the film's incredible visual
panache and solid acting. But if you ask me "what is this film about",
I couldn't tell you. In all his past films , Stone was very careful to
pose the questions in the right way and then energetically move
towards a goal, making his way through unfamiliar territories. But
here it seems as if he couldn't make up his mind. At first it seems as
it is about the American society and the clever parallels to American
Football. Then Stone starts criticizing the NFL, but in the end his
love for the game takes complete control over the story, transforming
it into a fancy filmed football game. It is a confused, but powerfully
executed film that has its golden moments. Though the script isn't
particularly well written, its holes are compensated by an amazing
cast, that is capable of transforming any cliche into originality. Al
Pacino, who looks incredible in any role, is magnificent here. It is
much more Pacino's character than the scripts, since he goes further,
deeper into the mind and heart of a coach that looses touch, faith in
himself and life. Dennis Quide is very impressive as an on-field
leader privately haunted by insecurity and Jamie Coxx is very nice,
proving to be a serious and capable actor. Otherwise the film can
boast of names such as Cameron Diaz, James Woods, LL Cool J, Charlt o
Some of it is incredible. And, in a way, Stone does the same with
American Football as Spielberg did with WW2 in "Saving Private
Ryan". The sense of "being there", not observe from above with the
popcorn in one hand and a coke in another, but actually being on the
field, look at it from the player's eyes, feel the adrenaline rushing
through your body. Unfortunately these amazing sequences, no matter
how great they are, are deluding us from the movie's actual
objective. Stone gets lost amidst mirrors and smoke, and all the
energy that is released during these two hours, is chanalized into
nothing. In the end, no matter how noble the intentions, the film
wrestles with its own shadow.

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
This is one of the most funny and entertaining comedies of the year and it
just happens to be animated. There are some great voice over commentaries
from Hollywood's most famous celebrities, some fabulous animation and a
compelling story. This is the best we've seen from Disney since "Beauty and
the Beast" (1996).
This film begins an unspecified time following the happily-ever-after
conclusion to Toy Story. In the aftermath of their earlier adventures, Buzz
(voice of Tim Allen) and Woody (voice of Tom Hanks) are now fast friends and
all the toys live in perfect harmony, content with their "lives". One day,
Andy broke Woody's arm off, while playing with him. Woody is now officially
discarged and worthless, left with his
nightmares, where he lies in a trash can with the other discards.
Later Andy's mother decides to have a yard sale, and she collects a few old
toys
from her son's room. Since one of these discards is a member of the moving
toy gang, Woody goes to the rescue, leaving the safety of the house for the
uncertainty of the front lawn in order to bring the toy back. Although his
mission is successful, he is placed in a serious predicament when a toy
collector
named Al (voice of Wayne Knight) spies Woody while hunting through the wares
available at the sale. The cowboy toy represents the final collectible
needed to complete his collection of merchandise from the old TV series,
"Woody's Roundup." If he can acquire Woody, Al can ship everything to a toy
museum in Japan for a huge profit. So, after Andy's mother refuses to sell
the wooden cowboy, Al steals him, and it's up to the other toys, led by
Buzz, to go into the city to save their friend. And so,  Buzz, Rex (voice of
Wallace Shawn), Hamm (voice of John Ratzenberger), Mr. Potatohead (voice of
Don Rickles), and Slinky (voice of Jim Varney), go out on a dangerous
journey to rescue their friend, they find themselves confronting things like
busy streets and other Buzz Lightyear toys. There are car chases, gun fights
and finally the confrontation between Buzz and his Nemesis (who, by the way,
resembles Darth Vader). Meanwhile, Woody learns that he was once a TV
celebrity and has a family - a cowgirl named Jessie (voice of Joan Cusack),
a horse named Bullseye, and a father figure called the Prospector (voice of
Kelsey Grammar). They offer him another life, as a celebrity -- a toy in a
museum in Japan. He is now forced to choose between being loved intensively
by Andy for a little while (before he grows up) and be forgotten, or be
admired by children for generations. The problem is, if Woody escapes from
Al's clutches and returns home, they will end up back in the lonely darkness
of storage.
A real effort is made in the technical department. The animation is rich and
colorful, with lots of wonderful details. The "cinematography" is also
extremely improved since Toy Story; there are a lot of complicated swings,
turns and close-ups that really make an impression. Lighting and filters are
used to create a mood (as in a surprisingly emotional moment - Jessie's
remembrance of her days when she was a beloved toy) The film contains a lot
of in-side jokes (such as the one about videogames), and entertaining
parodies on "Jurassic Park" and "Star Wars". The film ends with the "failed
takes", the kind of scenes that we are used to see after comedy shows on TV.
These outtakes are some of the funniest scenes in the film. But what in the
end makes "Toy Story 2" a memorable experience is not the jokes, its
multiple parodies or marvelous animation. It is its heart and emotions --
the story about the meaning of friendship, love and even life itself. It is
not difficult to predict that "Toy Story 2" would be a huge economical
success, but its artistic achievement was unexpected. Unexpected because the
first film wasn't much more than a demonstration of special effects. But
mostly it was unexpected because Disney hasn't produced anything spectacular
in years and is constantly surpassed by companies such as DreamWorks and
Warner Brs. But here the director has changed the atmosphere of the film,
making it more accessible and interesting for persons older that 9 years.
This is a big step-away from the ancient laws of Disney-animation. Off
course, this is not "Antz" , it is not as intelligent; this is not a
landmark and no masterpiece, but I promise that you'll find it as funny and
enjoyable as I have. Whether this is the best animated film of the year, I
dare not say. My choice would probably be "The Iron Giant", but (along side
with "American Pie" ) this is the comedy of the year.
I almost lost my hopes for Disney, but "Toy Story 2" proves that Disney
hasn't lost their ability to entertain.

Title
Review for Antz (1998)
RATING: 10/10 - ALTERNATIVE RATING: A
There was a time when Disney was completely out of reach. It was insane to
even think about competing with this colossal giant of entertainment. That
time has passed. Disney is now struggling to keep up with the new talents,
that are frequently emerging.
Dream Works SKG moved away from the traditional and familiar, and created
they recent feature: "Antz" . The result is beyond every expectation. "Antz"
is not only visually stimulating, but plays at a higher intellectual level
and has some spectacular vocal performances, that when combined create a
vision that is greater than Disney in every aspect.
"Antz" is not the kind of film that you would expect from Disney and other
companies that try to copy their way of work. It is an animated satire for
grown-ups. While children will only see the obvious aspects: love,
adventure, courage, loneliness, betrayal; a more mature audience will enjoy
how it plays with totalitarism, hippies and the social classes (the ant
society is divided in three classes, reminding about the Indian casts:
workers, soldiers and the royal family; it's interesting to see how all
classes envy eachother's way of life).
In an anthill with millions of inhabitants, Z 4195 (Woody Allen) is a worker
ant. As the film opens he is lying on a therepist's leaf complaining about
the social order and his difficult childhood. Feeling insignificant in a
conformity system, he accidentally meets beautiful Princess Bala (Sharon
Stone), who has a similar problem on the other end of the social scale.
Engaged with her mother's "loyal subject" General Mandible, whom she doesn't
love, and with a dull life awaiting her in the future. In order to meet Bala
again, Z switches sides with his soldier friend Weaver (Sylvester Stalone).
By this he proves that it is possible to confront the system. That it builds
on fear, but beyond that - nothing more. That the ants do have a choice to
live their own life how they want and that it is possible to not follow
orders all the time. And when Z returns home as a war hero, he becomes a
living legend to the "whole insect race". By this he unwillingly crosses the
sinister plans of ambitious General Mandible , who wants to divide the ant
society into a superior, strong race (soldiers) and "the week elements" (the
workers, that ironically are the strength of the ant colony). But Z and
Bala, both unaware of the dangerous situation, try to leave the oppressive
system by heading for Insectopia, a place where you can be your own ant and
where food paves the streets.
Most of all, it's a story about individualism and the courage to be
different. It's a search for a better world, where the most important part
is freedom. But it has also several dark themes, such as racism and
communism. The totalitarian society displayed in "Antz" is cold and
unfriendly. Here individualism is a sin and a step away from this ideology
leads to punishment.
It is important to realize that "Antz" is not just a cartoon about a
neurotic ant, but also a hint on our way of life.The first thing you see is
skyscrapers and then by glare of the sunlight they are suddenly transformed
into high grass. It's a brilliant satire, that is about ourselves - our
believes and thoughts about our way of life and the surrounding environment.
Two fly-hippies sit around an open fire in the woods, discussing the meaning
of life:- "..Have you ever thought about this huge universe, that is so big,
we don't even know it excists.." - "..Wow..man..that is so deep!" This
brilliantly directed scene questions our own place in this "huge universe".
Maybewe are crawling under someone's shoe, and we don't even know it.
Both visually and intellectually "Antz" is a feast. PGI's beautiful computer
generated animation and Harry Gregson-Williams's energetic musical score
create a spectacular atmosphere. And some of Hollywood's greatest actors are
responsible for incredible vocal preformances: Woody Allen, Sharon Stone,
Sylvester Stalone, Danny Glover, Jennifer Lopez, Gene Hackman, Christopher
Walken and Dan Aykroyd.
"Antz" is a beautiful "Titanic"-kind of story, about the impossible love
between a simple worker and a princess. However because of its serious plot
and paralells, "Antz" may seem more appealing to adults than children. When
you watch Disney-films, everything is black and white - he is bad and he is
good. Here, the story is much deeper and sophisticated, where you have to
draw some difficult parallels to get the essence. The language is also
ruffer, than in most kiddy cartoons.
Dream Works has created a milestone in animation.
Summary inspired by Julian Reischl {julian.reischl@stud.uni-muenchen.de}
Copyright  (C) 1998 by Alex Ioshpe

Title
Review for Hannibal (2001)
"Tense, dark, gothic and poetic in its visual wizardry"
This film is certainly pleasant news for every horror
enthusiast. "Hannibal" is probably the most awaited film of this
decade, standing proudly in the same line with "Star Wars: Episode 1"
and "Lord of the Rings". Its financial success is therefore
assured. When it comes to its artistic values, it is very
speculative. You never know how the audiences are going to react, and
this film has already suffered from a discouraging abscesses of Jodie
Foster and basically all crew from its predecessor - the legendary
"Silence of the Lambs". I say legendary, because it has been elevated
to a cult-status, proclaimed a masterpiece by every critic (even by
those who did not approve it when it first aired in 1991). I always
believed that "Lambs" was slightly overrated. It was a great film, a
virtually perfect detective story, but absolutely no masterpiece. It
was simply a good film, nothing more and without Hopkins' legendary
performance, it would have been much less. With this hype blinding
your vision, it is hard to concentrate. Thomas Harris took his time
and when his book was finished, it was received not too well.
Jonathan Demme (the director), Ted Tally (screenwriter), Jodie Foster,
and Scott Glenn - all rejected the book, labeling it too violent and
grotesque.  Finally a new cast and crew were assembled, with Anthony
Hopkins in the lead.
10 years have passed and Clarice Starling is not what she used to be.
Crawford, her guiding mentor is gone and so is her purpose. After a
rather unsuccessful operation, she is humiliated and unfairly blamed
by the media and her colleagues. Meanwhile, Hannibal Lecter peacefully
lives his cultivated life as a respected art scholar in his beloved
Florence, very much aware of the awkward situation that Starling is
in. However his peaceful life is broken when Inspector Rinaldo Pazzi
(Giancarlo Giannini) discovers him and the reward, provided by one of
his old patients and his nemesis, the paralyzed Mason Verger (an
uncredited and unrecognizable Gary Oldman). Mason is an insanely rich
pedophile sadist, who lost his lips and one eye, when Dr. Lecter made
him peal off his own face and feed it to his dogs ("It seemed like a
good idea at the time", he chuckles). While Clarice inverstigates,
Mason is preparing his ultimate revenge, a feast where Lecter will be
eaten by giant man-eating hogs. Now everyone race against time and
each other, in order to capture the famous doctor first. But when
Hannibal finally appears in America, Clarice is split by her duty and
her strange affections for her evil opponent, who is likewise drawn
towards her..
Marquee screenwriters David Mamet (State and Main) and Steven Zailian
(Schindler's List) are faithful to the source, but avoiding the very
problems that made the book unsatisfying. Hannibal (as the most
interesting character) is moved into the center, while a harder, more
bitter Starling stands in the shadows. In fact, every positive element
of "Lambs" is elevated here. The "supporting villain" is far more
interesting and colorful than Buffolo-Bill, all the memorable
characters (including Barney) reappear and the political intrigues in
the FBI intensify.
Hopkins seems more at ease now, moving with a grace of a panther. He
doesn't speak - he purrs in a seductive, devilish voice. His Hannibal
is more interesting and edgy than ever before, a more complicated and
less sympathetic character than in "Lambs", revealing himself in all
his demonic monstrousity. Part of the films corrosive effect is the
incredible sympathy that we develop for him in the beginning, and that
so quickly turns agianst us, when we witness him enduldging to his
darker side.  Julianne Moore makes us forget about Jodie Foster
completely, playing in a tougher vein with her interpretation as solid
and honest as one could expect from an actress of her
caliber. Giannini's inspector has the right aura of tarnished dignity
and Gary Oldman is likewise spectacular and incredibly entertaining as
Mason. Ray Liolita is sleazy as always and the rest of the cast do a
decent job. Basically the acting is flawless.
"Hannibal"'s biggest problem is dealing with expectations, with people
who have already created a picture in their heads about how the film
should be - people who expect to see "Silence of the Lambs 2". These
people will be very disappointed, because "Hannibal" is luckily not
that. A new director is steering, with a new crew behind him. Since
Lector has now moved into the center of events, the atmosphere had to
be adjusted - in other words it had not to offend Lector's taste. That
is why Ridley Scott (Alien, Blade Runner, Gladiator) could not be a
better choice, and with director of photography John Mathison (Blade
Runner, Gladiator), the talented editor Pietro Scalia (Gladiator) and
sensational composer Hans Zimmer (The Thin Red Line, Gladiator) you
simply can not loose. The result is something completely
different. From the opening credits, when the word "Hannibal" is
written elegantly in blood across the black screen, you sense a change
of atmosphere. It's fresh, beautiful, dreamy -- all the things that
"Lambs" wasn't. And while its predecessor was very gritty, shot in a
naturalistic, almost photographic way, "Hannibal" sparkles with visual
splendor, looking like a beautifully decorated christmas tree. The
claustrophobic atmosphere of "Lambs" is replaced with a free,
unconstrained sense of freshness, like a morning breeze. The sense of
uneasiness is captured alternately by deep, sustained notes and the
rapid attack of a full-throttle orchestra, whose intent to horrify
never waivers. Scott has always been a wizard of visual imagery and he
employs his talents here, creating a world of Lecter's morbid
mind. Every frame is a painting, composed from rich contrasts of
shadows and light. He intoxicates us with this visual poetry and dark
symbolism, creating a creepy, gothic feeling around the whole
picture. And it is this style that is the very element that makes
"Hannibal" terrifying. We see Lecter lecturing the arts in the
library, swapped into the beauty of the night, we see him in perfume
shops, we watch him enjoying the opera. And then we see him killing
his pray, spilling out the intestates and cooking them at home, using
Dumas' recipes. Here lies the incredible horror of "Hannibal" - the
taste, culture, intellect and the morbid violence shown in the same
beautiful style, in the very same person. Scott succeeds where most
have failed -- in creating this extreme polarity of the human soul,
which is shown incredibly elegantly and without any sense of
effort. The violence is shown in a different key than we are usually
used to. It is as if we are looking with Lecter's eyes on the world
around us, and everthing is therefore wrapped into a magical veil of
taste and style, even the bodies.  This violence is more grotesque
than in "Lambs", but it is also more motivated, because it underlines
the movie's theme.
Several critics have pointed out that the first installment was more
clever and sophisticated. I slightly disagree with that statement. The
story development in "Lambs" was its clever part, with the many
bizarre events and characters, following one after another, but here
its cleverness stopped.  "Hannibal" is more clever in its theme,
rather than in the twists and turns of the story (which by the way are
quite remarkable as well). It is therefore darker, deeper and creepier
than "Lambs", going under the skin of the two main characters,
portraying their previously unknown sides.  "Hannibal" should
therefore not be viewed as a sequel, but instead accepted as a unique
and completely different movie, acting on its own terms. Clarise is
not the same honest, hard working idealist that she was in "Lambs". In
the very beginning we see her being betrayed by her fellow agents,
stabbed in the back, so to speak. These disappointments in her work,
and her life in general, lead her onto a different path. In the end it
is her fall from grace that is one of the central stories of the
movie. Lecter is likewise different - more relaxed, calmer and in his
natural environment. He no longer pushes for the extravagant, like in
"Lambs". His evil is hidden behind the mask of charm and taste, making
him more dangerous, unpredictable and calculating than ever
before. And this also underlines one major difference between the two
(now competing films) - while "Lambs" was completely straight,
"Hannibal" is more dreamy, elegant and symbolic in its every element,
in every scene. While Demme constructed a great story about nothing,
Scott is actually painting a picture about the duality of human
nature. This duality exists everywhere in his world, it can be found
in the beauty of Florence, in the darkness of the woods, in Lecter and
Starling.  The connection between them is magical and creepy, as well
as poetic. It is like beauty and the beast - the attraction of the
poles, the fascination of the opposite. Scott has thus successfully
created one of the most interesting psychological thrillers to
date. In a way, it is a beautiful walz about the ways of evil, with
its illusions, seductions and the incredible horror that lies
beneath. To me this is far more interesting than a carefully woven
detective story. This does not mean that "Hannibal" is entirely
flawless. It is episodic in the end, as if the director was rushing
towards the finish line. Forgetting that, it is a perfect
psychological thriller. However I do not intend to make the same
mistake as many did with "Lambs". I am not saying that this is a
masterpiece, but in my opinion, this is certainly a more interesting
and refreshing picture than its predecessor.  It is richer, creepier
and far more tasteful.

Title
Review for Frankenstein (1994)
"..it's certainly more than just a monster story.."
Kenneth Branagh's new motion picture had to compete with all the previous
Frankenstein-films made throughout the years in almost every part of the
world, including the most controversial version of them all - directed by
James Whale.
The dark and stormy nights, the lightning bolts, the charnel houses of spare
body parts, the laboratory where Victor Frankenstein stirs his steaming
cauldron of life are effectful.  But the center of the film, quieter and
more thoughtful, contains the real story.
Horror-fans will probably be disappointed by the total lack of horror.
Branagh has instead concentrated on serious issues: morality, philosophy and
human elements of the story, and not on old fashioned horror cliches. His
version is much closer to the book than all the previous adaptions of the
classic novel.
The film begins and ends somewhere in the Arctic Ocean. The year is 1794. A
bold captain is steering his ship through the unknown waters. His gole is to
reach the North Pole at all costs. As the ice closes around his ship, a
figure appears on the horizon. It's a man. Exhausted and on the brink of
death he approaches the frightening crew. His name is Victor Frankenstein
(Kenneth Branagh) and his story is so terrifying that it will scare everyone
from venturing into the unknown.
The myserious stranger begins his tale, or more precisely his confession, in
Geneva, 1773. He is remembering his childhood and youth. Laughter, banquets
and parties - a happy life, without troubles or concerns. Here Victor lived
with his father (Ian Holm) , mother (Cherie Lunghi ), his surrogate sister
(Helena Boham Carter) and his servants in happiness and harmony. This
idyllic lifestyle is suddenly changed. Like thunder from a quite sky, his
mother dies, giving birth to his youngest brother. Shocked, baffled and then
gradually changed by grief and despair, Victor (already interested in
science) becomes obsessed with death. Standing on his mother's grave he
says: "Oh mother..you did not have to die...no one should ever die...I will
stop this..I promiss.."
After proposing marridge to his surrogate sister and promising to return as
soon as his studies are finished, Victor travels to Ingolstadt, in presuite
of a medical career. After a while his obsession totally overtakes him as he
is working day and night, creating life from death. Composing dead bodies,
Frankenstein wanted to create the perfect man - both physically and
mentally. With strong electrical impulses, he managed to breeth life into
his creation. The result was ugliness. Realizing what he has done,
Frankenstein tried to undo his work, but it was to late. The creature has
escaped.
Because of the epidemic, Frankenstein hoped that his creation has died and
returned to his home,making plans for the wedding. For a while everything is
as it was before his mother's death. But then one by one his loved once are
dying mysteriously...
Whale's picture, although powerful, never managed to capture the total depth
of the novel. Brannagh has more or less done that. Another thing is
characters and actors. Branagh has developed every character and assembled a
magnificent cast. The greatest performances comes from De Niro - the
monster, that has been played by (among others) Charles Ogle, Karloff, Lon
Chaney, Bela Lugosi, Glenn Strange, Christopher Lee, Fred Gwynne (as Herman
Munster), and now, Robert De Niro. Alone, hated and feared, he is completely
aware of his ugliness. At first he is like a helpless, abandoned child,
desperately reaching out for love. Later when he reads Frankenstein's
journal, and learns that he is composed of dead bodies, his love turns into
rage as he is seeking revenge. He is capable of killing without regret. "I
took him by the throughout and lifted him off the ground....and then I
slowly crushed his neck...And as I killed him, I saw your face.." That is
how he reveals his savage nature to his creator. And yet, he is never quite
evil in our eyes and his vaulerbility and his loneliness are palpable: "For
the sympathy of one living being I would make peace with all."
Rarely has a cinematic interpretation of "the daemon" approached the level
of three-dimensionality and humanity with which it is portrayed in the
novel. Another vital thing is the character of Victor Frankenstein. In most
of the previous adaptions he was simply a mad scientist that trolls the
graveyards for corpses and then creates a monster (God knows why!) with the
power of an electrical storm. Almost no time was granted on his charecter,
who is the most important and vital charecter in the novel. Here, Branagh
introduces the character of Victor Frankenstein, establishes his obsession
with the very nature of life and death, sets up the intellectual and
ideological conflict between Victor and the academic establishment, and
somehow manages to build up to a rousing and horrifying creation scene.
Branagh plays Frankenstein with a remarkable understanding of his character.
On the outside he is strong, ambitious and talented scientist, but deep down
he is unsecure, fragile and vaulerble, constantly haunted by the ghosts from
his past. Helen Boham Carter is equally wonderful as Frankenstein's
surrogate sister, who at the end becomes his wife for a little while, before
death drives them apart. The rest of the cast, playing secondary characters,
is solid and nothing less than convincing.
Visually the film is stunning (especially the makeup). The spinning camera,
the constantly building-up musical acore,  the art direction, the production
design, the costumes are all magnificent: From the Arctic Ocean to the Swiss
Alps and dark forests, to the plague-riddled streets of Ingolstadt, Mary
Shelley's Frankenstein is a wonder to behold.
Kenneth Branagh directs his film as if the script was written by
Shakespeare: "..All I once loved lies in a shallow grave....by my hand..".
And the film ends exacly as Hamlet , when the creature sets both his and his
creator's body on fire. The film ends with Frankenstein and his creation
burning in the almost hellish fire in the darkness. And a terrifying last
close-up on the creature's smiling face.
Can a man create life, then abandon his creation because its appearance
horrifies him? To whom are its actions then attributable: the creature or
the being who brought about its existence? Shelley did not answer these
questions, but she certainly posed them. Following her example, Branagh does
the same.
His film is a tragic saga about playing God. Victor Frankenstein is not an
evil man. He wanted to change the world to the better. In this he represents
everything science stands for: Acting without doubts, never considering the
consequences of his actions.
Produced by Francis Ford Coppola, Frankenstein resembles in some respects
Coppolas previous film "Dracula". In comparison, I can say that "Dracula"
has visuals that even "Frankenstein" can not live up to. But when it comes
to story, characters and casting, "Frankenstein" is stronger. But stronger
than both of them, on every aspect,  is Neil Jordan's  "Interview with the
Vampire".
Although the film is not perfect (the camera that simply refuses to stay
still and the occasionally pushy score are at times more tiering than
effective), these minor faults are easily forgivable, as the picture is
otherwise captivating and stimulating. Branagh has probably created one of
the best (if not the best) adaptions of Shelly's classic novel.

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)

DIRECTED BY: Jan de Bont
WRITTEN BY: David Shelf, based upon a novel by Shirley Jackson
CAST: Liam Neeson, Cathrine Zeta Jones, Lili Taylor, Lili Taylor, Marian Seldes
The tagline for this film is: "Some houses are just born bad". So I didn't expect too much from this. But I had preserved a little spark of ope as I entered the theatre. I thought: Liam Neeson, Cathrine Zeta Jones and Jan De Bont. I thought, mabe it will be fun? And in fact the beginning was rather intriguing. But by the end of it I thought: why Liam Neeson and Cathrine Zeta Jones, Jan De Bont?. These great actors are basically helpless with this muddled mess that defies any rationality. Here is the story: In the monstrously over-decorated mansion known as Hill House, visitors are tricked by an unknown doctor (Liam Neeson) into being guinea pigs in a fright experiment under the guise of an insomnia investigation. Among them is a sophisticated bisexual (Cathrine Zeta Jones), a cynical dope (Owen Wilson) and a gentle and emotional lady (Lily Taylor). Actually, the doctor is researching the "primordial fear reaction" and intends to plant disturbing ideas in his subjects and watch!
 what happens. But he gets unexpected help from the house itself. 
It rumbles, hums and belches forth remarkable sights. Portals become veiny stained-glass eyeballs. A fireplace guarded by stone lions gapes like a sinister mouth. Filmy cherubic spirits take shape under sheets and billowy curtains. But the computerized spooketeria rarely feels real, placing an emotional wall between audience and screen. The second half of the film is basically about the main heroine running back and forth from the sinister lamps and evil furniture. Is that exciting or what? The worst thing about it is that it didn't have to be bad. It's based on a great book, ``The Haunting of Hill House,'' by Shirley Jackson. A 1963 adaptation of the book was scary and intelligent. It played with the greatest fears of our sub conscience. "The Blair Witch Project", that cost less than an old car, managed to shock and terrify the audiences from their senses. And with a $70 mill. budget, De Bont and screenwriter David Self make hash out of a perfectly lovely piece of terror. De !
Bont has a style of filmmaking so out of line with the material that it is, in itself, frightening. He is the master of the extravagant special effect and the big visual adrenaline rush. But why give him a more serious material? In the end "Haunting" will only haunt its fledgling studio (Dream Works SKG) and De Bont's career as a director.
Yet it wouldn't be fair to say that everything is bad. The effects are truly impressive and the house is wonderfully decorated -- beautiful, mysterious, magical and spooky. But this is where the good things end. The music is blaring, the floors moving, the ceiling morphing and the pictures on the walls screaming -- and all of this, every second, every moment of screen time, is absolutely without life. It's nothing more than a special effects-extravaganza; visually impressive, but intellectually hollow thriller that simply doesn't engage. At first you do not know what's going on. Is this part of the experiment? Are these hallucinations? Projections of the subconscience? Paranoia? But in the end it shows out that this is actually happening. The house is actually possessed. It is at that point when all your hopes for a good entertainment disappears out of the window. For ever, I sat in anticipation for a decent climax and that's what I got? I believe Hichock once said that "it's !
better to wait for a climax, than to see one". This may be true, and it might actually work, but there is only one problem -- Jan De Bont is not Hichock and the things that he shows are not scary, only stupid. They are impossible to take seriously. Any paralells that you might have heard before, linking this picture to Kubrick's "The Shining", are absolutely baseless. "Shining" had class, style, story, acting, but most of all talent and originality. "Haunting" has only special effects and art direction to boast of. And those elements alone are not enough to make it a good film. Casting good actors for small, pale parts only makes things worse. But I guess that no matter what I or other critics say or write, most of you will see this film anyway, even if the tagline would say: "Some films are just born stupid". 

Title
Review for Romeo Must Die (2000)
DIRECTED BY: Andrzej Bartkowiak
WRITTEN BY: Eric Bernt (I) and Mitchell Kapner
CAST: Jet Li, Aalyah, Delroy Lindo, DMX
MPAA: Rated R for violence, some language and brief nudity.
Runtime: USA:115
In our time. In our modern world, where the cool rule, it's hard to
imagine that Shakespeare is becoming 'the man'. And yet - film after
film, after film, is based on his everlasting magic. In Warner
Brothers' latest production, Shakespeare is kicking ass to a rap beat,
while his magic and intelligence slowly fades away.
Though the producers of The Matrix have vaguely based their picture on
William Shakespeare's 'Romeo And Juliet' , its title sequence with a
frightening rap song and a black limo making its way through the dark
streets of New York, is very hard to associate with Shakespeare's
poetry. The film takes place during a silent war between the two major
mafia families in the city - the Afro Americans against the
Chinese. The youngest son of a Chinese mafia chieftain is found
murdered. The Afro-Americans are immediately suspected, but a peace
treaty is signed between the two godfathers. It is at this point that
Han (the Romeo of the story) finds out about his brother's
death. Escaping from a prison in China, he returns to United States to
avenge his brother's fate. But before he can restore justice with his
Kung Fu kicks, he falls in love with a mysterious beauty. The only
problem is that she is the daughter of his enemy..
There's only a weak echo of Shakespeare's talent in this disappointing
production. And there are more problems besides its title. Of course
we don't call it a deformation of a great masterpiece. We call it
'modernization'. It seems that the producers fear that the audience
will not respond to lyrics, without any car chases and gun
fights. This lack of respect for the audience I find very
disturbing. Kenneth Brannagh has already proven that Shakespeare
doesn't need to be updated, because his tales are grounded in the
basics of life and human nature. And as long as love, hate, honesty
and corruption do exist, everyone will understand and embrace
Shakespeare. I must admit that I found 'Rome Must Die' very
confusing. I can forgive Andrzej Bartkowiak, since it is his first
attempt at directing. He manages to create an incredible atmosphere
and directs with a firm precision. Unfortunately he completely forgot
about character- and story developments. His latest picture is
therefore visually impressive, but intellectually hollow. The love
story between Han (Jet Li) and Trish (Aalyah), and the mafia intrigues
are undeveloped and simplified. Jet Li is one of the most amazing
fighters to ever hit the silver screen and Aalyah has a magical
voice. Their achievement save this film from being completely
braindead, but they are not actors, and therefore can not act. They
are nothing more than two celebrities put together. The other actors,
including Isaiah Washington, Russell Wong, Henry O and DMX all give
the standard mediocre performances. Delroy Lindo is the only one that
projects a coherent image of reality. But there's more than acting to
worry about. Even with Li's incredible skills in martial arts, the
action scenes (though technically excellent) are too long and story
updates simply embarrassing. To make a long story short: 'Romeo Must
Die' is not intelligent enough to be a thriller, not sensual enough to
be a love story and too serious to be a fun action film. It is certain
that Bartkowiak would be much better off with o this embarrassing and
completely unnecessary parallel to 'Romeo and Juliet', so the film is
completely stuck - not sure of what to be. And in the end it's
nothing. There are no performances worthy of notice, no interesting
character- or story surprises. So again, the only good thing about it
is its technical achievement. This film can boast of great sound, fast
paced editing, solid cinematography and some very well coordinated
action sequences. The music is another factor that prevents you from
leaving the theatre. It is mostly provided by Aalyah's enchanting
voice and several carefully inserted rap songs by various artists,
that create a kind of 'ghetto feel' to it. But when I think back, it's
not much I remember from this 'production'. As in almost every summer
movie, there are some interesting scenes, but most of the moments that
I remember are associated with massive special effects. It is not a
film that will get any attention for its artistic qualities, simply
because it doesn't have any. For someone who has never read
Shakespeare, it's another popcorn film. For those of us who has, it's
a waste of money, time and brain cells.

Title
Review for Meet Joe Black (1998)
DIRECTED BY: Martin Brest
WRITTEN BY: Ron Osborn, Jeff Reno, Kevin Wade and Bo Goldman 
(based on the play "Death Takes a Holiday" by Alberto Casella
CAST: Anthony Hopkins, Brad Pitt, Claire Forlani, Jeffrey Tambor
MPAA: Rated PG-13 for an accident scene, some sexuality and brief strong language.
Runtime: USA:178 
REVIEWED BY: Alex Ioshpe (C) 1998
I have never been so confused after watching a movie. "Meet Joe Black"
is probably one of the most visually satisfying films of this year,
with a cinematography, music and cast that will dazzle most of us. At
the same time it is probably the most boring and ridiculous experience
hat you will have this season.
At first you marvel at the elegant direction, graceful cinematography
and sensual musical score. Then you'll wait for something to happen
for half an hour, but when you finally understand what's going on,
you'll wonder what are actors such as Anthony Hopkins, Brad Pitt and
Claire Forlani are doing in a film like this? The script is simply a
silly and unresolved story, which is artificially stretched into a
three hour long motion picture. It feels like an eternity. Most of the
time it is a pompous soap opera, filled with empty dialogue that the
actors deliver in a high pitched voice and " meaningful" winks.
The film is based on Alberto Caesella's play "Death Takes A
Holiday". The story concentrates around Bill (Anthony Hopkins) who
lives a fulfilled life as a successful business man, but sometimes he
wakes up in the middle of the night and hears a voice that is saying
"yes". Soon he meets a young elegant gentlemen (Brad Pitt) who
introduces himself as "Death". It is Bill's time. But Death has other
plans. It has come down to us simple mortals to find out what it means
to be alive. Our Bill is chosen to be Death's guide and in exchange he
gets time. Bill introduces Death as Joe Black, who immediately becomes
the center of everyone's attention. Bill's business partners speculate
about why Joe is constantly at Bill's side, lives in his house and
resides at his office. That is not all, however. Bill's youngest
daughter Susan (Claire Forlani) falls in love with the mysterious
stranger and Joe falls in love with her. This relationship is bound to
have some serious consequences.
It wouldn't be fair to say that this film didn't have some interesting
moments, such as the scene where Joe is invited to join Bill's family
for dinner. When Joe starts enjoying peanut butter and later falls in
love, the experience is somewhat different. It is obvious that a story
like this story is very difficult to structure. It's one thing to say:
"Wouldn't it be fun to have Death take human form and come down to
earth.." To create a motion picture out of this is another. Four
screenwriters have worked on a script that lacks drive and logic. It
is overlong and too primitive to pass as a serious film. On the other
hand it demonstrates incredible performances and a very decent
direction by Martin Brest ("Scent of a Woman"). Hopkins looks great in
any role, and no matter how shallow or hollow it is, he will complete
it. His talent and charisma are needed here more than any where else,
since it actually saves the film from a complete embarrassment. But
Pitt is the one that got one of the most difficult roles of recent
time. How can you play Death in human form? To me it seems that death
and life are not something that can be associated with earthly
matters. They are not creatures, but phenomenas. Saying that death
takes human form would be the same as to suggest that eternity would
take human form. Handling such a ridiculous task is incredibly
difficult and Pitt deserves some credit for his work. Speaking in a
calm, soft voice, portraying Death as a lonely, distant and powerful
guy that is unfamiliar with practical earthly matters. He looks and
acts more like an Angel of Death, rather than a demon or a red-eyed
executioner. Claire Forlani and others are also fine, stretching their
stereotypical characters to their limits. Unfortunately their
performances are not enough to rescue this film from its self
inflicted misery.
In other words this is not what I expected from the director of "Scent
of a Woman". It could (and should) be better with such cast and
crew. In the end it seems as if they have all been intensively working
on a ravishingly looking soap opera.

Title
Review for Shaft (2000)
DIRECTED BY: John Singleton
WRITTEN BY: John Singleton
CAST: Samuel L. Jackson, Christian Bale, Jeffrey Wright, Toni Collette
In the shadow of "The X-Men", this film promises the good old
fashioned action with a more believable action hero.When it comes to a
character who can hold the audience's attention by the sheer power of
his presence, Shaft's your man. What's most important is that "Shaft"
doesn't resort to imaginative special effects in order to create a
super hero, but the true human elements that are necessary for such a
task. For those of you who hasn't seen the original (and in my opinion
a rather overrated) version that aired in 1971, here is the story:
Shaft is the NYPD detective in charge of the investigation of a race
killing. One night outside of an upscale nightclub, a pampered yuppie
named Walter Wade (Christian Bale) bludgeons a black man to
death. There is one witness, a waitress named Diane (Toni Collette),
and Wade warns her to keep her mouth shut... or else. Shaft makes the
arrest, but the well-connected Wade is back on the streets in short
order. It doesn't take long for him to jump bail and leave the
country. Two years later, when he tries to sneak back in, Shaft is
waiting. Meanwhile, the detective has been harassing a local drug
dealer, Peoples Hernandez (Jeffrey Wright). Wade and Peoples meet in
prison and thus begins an uneasy alliance to bring down Shaft.
What is true is that the theme from the original movie, which
concerned racism and injustice in America, is virtually lost here,
remaining nothing more than a good excuse to make a fun action
film. Of course director John Singleton has included the obligatory
elements of black exploitation (big cars, drugs, cigars, guns, sleazy
nightclubs, gold chains, racism, babes, black leather coats, expensive
booze, crooked white cops), but the problem is that all that is
nothing more than props -- elements of the set decoration. Most
importantly, however, "Shaft" delivers on it's promise of action, and
plenty of it, and with the added benefit of having story enough to
support it. Though the action sequences are not even nearly as great
as in Mission: Impossible 2, they do provide a certain tension and
suspense, though often descending to the kind of brainless, tiring
action such as in "Gone in 60 Seconds". What is truly amazing is
surprisingly the performances, especially by the three leads: Samuel
Jackson, Christian Bale and Tony Colette. Unlike Wesley Snipes'
ultra-cool vampire slayer in "Blade", Jackson has the physical as well
as mental capabilities of being an action hero. Basically carrying the
film on his shoulders, he presents enough of power, wit and strength
to knock out both James Bond and Ethan Hunt out of their
pedestals. However, the supporting cast is not far behind. Christian
Bale puts on a spectacular performance, though his screen time is
scarcely limited. Still not quite finished with Patrick Bateman from
"American Psycho", he breathes life into a rather stereotypical and
one-dimentional role. The third and probably one of the most amusing
performances of the season, comes from Wright, who speaks with a
Dominican accent so lushly indulgent it makes Al Pacino's Cuban
cottonmouth in ''Scarface'' sound like a George Plimpton
impersonation. What happens is that Wright takes a cliché -- the
hotheaded Latin street prince -- and pushes it into operatic satire.
Shaft pushes our buttons at least as well as some of the Dirty Harry
movies, which means it's something that has been next to unheard-of
this year: reasonably rousing screen entertainment, but doesn't always
succeed. Whatever the reason, the film is badly-focused and comes to a
rather dissatisfying conclusion. Succeeding basically everywhere else,
Singleton fails where others have not, by violating one of the key
tenets of this sort of motion picture - that the hero should always
confront (and subsequently defeat) the villain. This results in that
"Shaft" fails to provide the violent catharsis that everyone in the
audience is awaiting.
Though Entertainment Weekly called ''Shaft'' a "spicy fast food", I
think that it is simply a series of slickly filmed action sequences
dangling off a thin plot and held together by the force of Jackson's
charisma.

Title
Review for Chicken Run (2000)
DIRECTED BY: Nick Park and Peter Lord
WRITTEN BY: Nick Park and Peter Lord
CAST: Mel Gibson, Julia Sawalha, Lynn Ferguson, Miranda Richardson, Tony Haygarth
Dream Works is back! This time with a brilliant animated feature that
might very well be the comedy of the year. From the its first shot,
when a "chicken-ghetto" is shown, lit up by the pale moon, you'll
start chuckling. And when Mel Gibson's (Braveheart) Rocky flies over
it, screaming "FREEDOM", you'll be laughing so hard that you'll get a
nosebleed. The reason for that 'Chicken Run' is so successful is that
the talented Park and Lord found a perfect balance between drama,
satire and comedy. It is much more demanding and intelligent than most
of the stereotype cartoons produced by Disney evey year, and a lot
funnier than Disney's mega-hit "Toy Story 2".
The setting is the Tweedy's, a dank little chicken farm in Yorkshire,
England, populated mostly by hens and a few old roosters who are
living on borrowed time, slowly awaiting their doom. They are under
the mercy of Mrs. Tweedy, a Nazilike woman (voiced by Miranda
Richardson), who demands nothing less than productivity from her
prisoners in the form of eggs and more eggs. But even when her hens
lay eggs at a high rate, it isn't enough for her. The chickens are
helpless, slowly awaiting their doom. Some know, some suspect and
others do not believe it. Only Ginger, a determined feisty hen with a
temper, is trying to escape. She dreams of wild open spaces, freedom
and release from fear. There doesn't go a day by, without her trying
and failing in her escape. But soon she realizes that there is no way
of getting of this farm alive. But everything changes when an upstart
Yank literally falls into the hens' midst. Rocky the Flying Rooster,
the self-described "lone free-ranger," has made his living being shot
from a cannon at a circus. On the lam from his owner, Rocky takes
convenient refuge on the farm and does nothing to discourage the idea
that he can fly, which allows Ginger to pin all her hopes for a mass
escape on Rocky's teaching the girls how to get airborne. At the same
time, however, Mrs. Tweedy, fed up with the "minuscule profits" from
eggs, decides to build a terrible pie-making machine, which works very
simple -- "chickens come in, pies come out". Soon a dark smoke is
forcing itself from old pipes....
 The confining, prison-like setting, which is rarely left during the
film, seems to have placed a sort of dramatic straitjacket on the
filmmakers' impulse for nifty side trips and surprising
digressions. It is a rather risky attempt to paradise the World War II
prison camp thrillers. "Chicken Run" is a holocaust movie about, well,
chickens. It's a very smart film, very alert, but it's also incredibly
dark film - an allegory disguised as a cartoon that comments on, among
other things, our dog-eat-dog society, greed, ruthlessness and
cruelty. The characters, all chickens, are jailed, exploited and
tortured by humans if they don't cooperate - and are sent to the ovens
if they don't reach the daily quota of eggs.
Everything second of what you see on screen is many days of hard
work. Every element is made of Plasticine, which means that the
directors had to move the figures manually for every little
movement. And since there are 24 movements per second, you can imagine
why this film took such a long time to complete. This technique is
very demanding, but it gives the directors complete control. Because
of that there are no accidents, mistakes or surprises during the
production. The good thing is that the enormous efforts have paid
off. Everything is perfect. The figures look like as they have been
made by children - sweet, cartoonish and innocent. The small details
in "set decoration" are incredible. Like 'Antz', 'Chicken Run' is a
film that plays on several levels, and the more you know about
history, films and politics, the more will you enjoy the film. But as
it showed out 'Antz' was more appreciated by adults, rather than
children. 'Chicken Run' on the other hand, despite of its darker
tones, isn't that heavy and thus offers an equal amount of quality
entertainment for children as well as adults. The dialogue is wisely
structured, with incredibly amusing characters and brilliant parodies
on famous Hollywood productions, that are elegantly floating into each
other, creating a bright, comic cocktail.
To be sure, "Chicken Run" is always engaging, full of bright humor,
marvelous stop-motion work with Plasticine figures, dramatic conflict
and wonderfully nuanced characterizations. Indeed, the leading
characters are given unusually fine shadings for animated creations,
which is partly a tribute to the Aardman team's finesse and partly due
to the outstanding casting and performances. Mel Gibson delivers an
energetic at times self ironic performance, and of course "Braveheart"
is not excluded. The rest of the cast consists of marvelous actors,
such as Julia Sawalha and ______ as the proud, elderly chicken
general. With their clipped British voices, the hens are like women in
a World War II POW flick (Glenn Close's recent "Paradise Road" comes
to mind). The Tweedy farm looking like something out of Steven
Spielberg's "Schindler's List" (1993), with chicken coops resembling
bunkers and fencing topped with barbed wire. Before our disbelieving
eyes, a pageant of jeopardy, romance and rescue unfolds. Chickens
yelling, "She's gonna blow," chickens jitter-bugging to the classic
"Flip Flop and Fly," chickens creating the kind of rousing action
finale John Woo would relish. The film is funny, without trying too
hard and emotional, without over dramatizing. It's the example of a
perfect film, that should be followed by the producers and directors
of Walt Disney Pictures. I simply can't imagine someone not enjoying
this film. It offers more than enough for any audience member. And let
me put it even more strait -- it's enough to become a vegetarian...for
life!

Title
Review for Messenger: The Story of Joan of Arc, The (1999)
MPAA: Rated R for strong graphic battles, a rape and some language.
Runtime: France:160
An energetic, visually stunning, but intellectually hollow recreation
of the mysterious life of Jeanne D'Arc.
In history Jeanne D'Arc is lost in an ocean of mystery and
controversy, which creates the perfect launching pad for talented and
creative directors, who can basically alter the story as they
wish. She came in a time where people desperately needed a saint. A
hero that could rescue them for misery and deliver peace and
happiness. Director/writer Luc Besson ('Nikita', 'Leon') portrays his
version of the peasant girl who commanded the armies of France and was
burned at the stake for witchcraft. Besson tries to recreate the
person behind the legend. He tries not to show her as a saint or a
villain. He shows her as a human being. In a time where blood was
almost pouring from the sky, and the air smelled of rotten flesh, it
is hard to keep your sanity. The only support and hope is in God. At
the age of 13, Jeanne (Milla Jovovich ) watches her own sister
murdered and raped by the English soldiers. This terrible event makes
a lasting impact on Jeanne's mind. God is no longer her support. He
has become her obsession. She starts seeing visions and signs that
command her to raise an army and free France from the siege of the
English tyranny. With the help of the wise Yolande D'Aragon (Faye
Dunaway ) and Charles VII (John Malcovich), whose grand royal
ambitions and life are at stake, Jeanne raises an army and marches
towards the English walls. After this the film stays mostly on the
battlefield, where Besson demonstrates his ability to direct amazing
action sequences, only occasionally resorting to a calmer tempo. The
movie is filled with dreamy, symbolic images of pure artistic
craftsmanship, that create a surreal and occasionally paranoiac
atmosphere. The film is lost in time and space, hysterically jumping
back and forth in Jeanne's thoughts, imagination and
conscience. Besson's visual style permits the audience to enter the
medieval age, feel the smell of fresh blood and the adrenaline pumping
in your body in the heat of battle.
But the film is far from being flawless. The script needs a lot of
polishing. Except for Jeanne, there are no real characters. And
although a grand star cast is assembled, their characters are nothing
more than props, not more alive than the costumes that they are
wearing. As for the Maiden of Lorraine herself, she is portrayed as a
simple girl, too small for her divine task. In the latter part of the
film, we see her as hysterical, confused and on the brink of madness,
with her past purity and innocence for ever lost. Jovovich handles the
part with more panache than one might expect. But though her screen
time is incredible excessive, both Malcovich ('Being John Malcovich')
and Dunaway ('Titus') surpass her rather overacted and simply
unprofessional performance. And even Hoffman manages to breathe some
life into his dreadfully small part. Besides casting Jovovich,
Besson's only mistake is his extreme sense of patriotism that in the
end ruins his so gloriously crafted painting. There are some viscously
evil Englishmen that murder, pillage and betray with a smile on their
faces. And some incredibly brave and noble Frenchmen, represented by
the "three musketeers" of this story -- the brave Gilles de Rais
(Vincent Cassel), the wise Aulon (Desmond Harrington) and the strong
La Hire (Richard Ridings). Though all those actor perform well, their
characters are nothing more than symbols -- banners that proclaim the
glory of France. And thus, there is no sense of realism in this
film. 'The Messenger' has muscles instead of brains. There is some
relief in the end, where Besson lays down his armor and starts
thinking. Dustin Hoffman's appearance helps and the film ends
elegantly and surprisingly effective with a climax worthy of
praise. Jeanne's character is unlocked, but whether God was in the
picture or not, is never quite explained. Was she a confused peasant
girl driven by her own hunger for revenge? Or was she truly a
messenger of God? The film poses as many questions as answers and
nothing is completely obvious. Bess o Messenger' is nothing more than
a fairly good film. It is not much that you remember of it after you
leave the theater. Maybe the sound, the dreamy sequences, but
certainly not the dialogue. It is an elegant and adrenaline pumping
history lesson for the MTV-generation, that although presents some
interesting material, works better when it's on the battlefield.

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
MPAA: Rated R for strong language, drug use, sexuality and some violence.
Runtime: USA:188 / UK:188 / Argentina:188 / Finland:188 / France:184 /
Japan:187
Language: English
Color: Black and White / Color (DeLuxe)
Sound Mix: Dolby / SDDS
Certification: USA:R / UK:18 / Germany:12 / Hong Kong:IIB / Mexico:B /
Netherlands:16 / Singapore:PG / Norway:11 /Sweden:11
"..We may be finished with the past, but the past is not finished with us.."
- MAGNOLIA
Paul T. Anderson's 'Magnolia' is truly an exotic flower, dazzling with its
freshness and beauty. And the closer you look, the more you see of its
splendor. Other critics have already written many reviews depicting its
length and dullness. There are many stories. Some even fall asleep in the
theatre. So if you were discouraged by such remarks, think again! Because
this picture is one of the most interesting and original films of the year.
To sum up 'Magnolia' is impossible and unnecessary, since I trust you'll see
this film anyway, but I'll try. On one random day in the San Fernando
Valley, a dying father (Jason Robards), a young wife (Julianne Moore), a
male caretaker (Philip Seymour Hoffman), a famous lost son (Tom Cruise), a
police officer in love (John C. Reilly), a boy genius (Jeremy Blackman), an
ex-boy genius (William H. Macy), a wealthy game show host (Philip Baker
Hall) and an estranged daughter (Melora Walters ) will each become part of a
dazzling multiplicity of plots, but one story. Through a collusion of
coincidence, chance, human action, shared media, past history and divine
intervention they will weave and warp through each other's lives on a day
that builds to an unforgettable climax. Some will seek forgiveness, others
escape. Some will mend frayed bonds, others will be exposed. Magnolia is a
mosaic of American life woven through a series of comic and poignant
vignettes. It is a portrait of a lonely city sometimes called up short on
love. It is a personal exploration of the hidden elements of crisis. It is a
story about putting things right again.
P.T. Anderson had his debut with "Boogey Nights" in 1997 -- a strong and
shocking peek into the porn industry. As many other original films, it was
underrated and unfairly treated, robbing Anderson for a deserved Oscar
nomination. "Magnolia" is his second venture into the world of filmmaking.
Anderson is an "actors' director". His cast consists of many great stars and
some not so great ones, but everyone gives an award worthy performance.
That includes Julianne Moore as the hysterical young beauty, Jason Robards
as the alienated and forgotten father. And then you have Tom Cruise , that
gives a mesmerizing and completely unexpected performance that is probably
the best I've seen this year. He plays Frank Mackey, a sex-guru that has
gained enormous popularity in the "underground". He is the leader of
confused men that are scared, hurt or dumped by women. His only problem,
underneath the sparkling facade, is dealing with his past. This is Tom as
you've never seen him - with a pony tail, leather clothes and an energy that
would make Muhamed Ali look like a slow turtle in comparison, Cruise
magnetizes the audience with his best performance in years. The reason that
the acting is at such high level has a lot to do with Anderson's fabulous
script. He creates characters that are so colorful and real, that they
almost jump out of the screen. There is a cop - an idealist that lives to
help people out of trouble. He dreams of a perfect world. Despite of his
goodness and genuine kindness, he is unappreciated and unlucky.
Coincidentally (?) he meets a girl and falls in love, but is too clumsy and
shy to tell her how he feels. There is a wiz-kid that can answer any
question, besides how to win his father's love. There is a young wife that
married her husband for money and only realizes that she really loves him
when he is dying. You really want these guys to be well, so that they can
finally find happiness.
'Magnolia' has resemblance to 'Eyes Wide Shut', in its story and character
development and surrealistic components. The film starts fast, almost
hysterically, with cameras moving quickly back and forth, and events
overlapping. After a while Anderson slows down and we can dive into these
people, although we only get to see one day of their lives. Each person and
event is like one unique beautiful leaf, each sprung out of one common
source, that somehow binds and connects them. It is simply a different
expression. You can't just observe it from a distance. You have to let
yourself go, and when Anderson has you, he doesn't let go. And then you'll
cry and laugh and walk out of the theatre enlightened.
"Magnolia" is a day in our lives. A fragment. It is a story about love,
regret and forgiveness. It is about coincidences and how they affect our
lives. It questions whether things "just happen" or whether everything is a
part of a big and complex plan. Is the universe laughing with us or at us?
Chance or Fate? Coincidence or Destiny? Yes, strange things do happen.

Title
Review for Midsummer Night's Dream, A (1999)
After the incredible and unexpected success of "Shakespeare in Love", the
audience has again opened their eyes for Shakespeare. Michael Hoffman is one
of many that dived into the ocean of Shakespeare's poetry during the last
decade.
"A Midsummer Night's Dream" has been adapted to the big screen several
times, with no particular luck. It can be a dark nightmare, a slapstick
comedy, or a semi-serious melodrama, depending on the script adaptation.
Hoffman has chosen the most common and easiest way - light comedy. The
director creates an enchanting atmosphere, as he brings to the foreground of
the story beauty and elegance - a magical recipe for the recreation of a
timeless story that is as relevant today as it was when Shakespeare wrote
it.
Hoffman didn't move too far away from Shakespeare's original play: Egeus,
father to Hermia, has betrothed his daughter to Demetrius, a man who in turn
loves her with all his heart, and is determined not to let Hermia's true
love, Lysander, from inheriting his bride. Then Hermia and Lysander plot to
run away together to avoid this marriage, and even possible death. They
share their plot with Helena, a close friend, who unfolds on-stage her own
attraction to Demetrius. She then storms out to inform him of what Hermia
and Lysander are doing, which will benefit Helena later, as she suspects
that her decision to reveal this plan to Demetrius will show him how much
she loves him. The parallel story unfolds in the forest nearby, where magic
transforms the grounds into an enchanted parallel world. Here we meet the
fairies. Oberon (Rupert Everett) and Titania (Michele Pfeiffer ) are king
and queen of this charming race, but that does not prevent them from feuding
over an Indian boy Titania cares for. Returning home and falling asleep,
Oberon discusses a plot with his servant, Puck, to apply a nectar from a
forest flower to his queen's eyes so that, when she awakes, she shall fall
in love with the first ugly creature that catches her eye. Continuing with
this plan, the king hears the accounts of the four lovers as they become
separated from each other in the forest. He furthers his orders to Puck, who
is instructed to apply this nectar to Demetrius, so that he can fall in love
with Helena, and all will be solved. But the plan is distracted when Puck
gets the men confused, and applies the nectar to Lysander's eyes. He then
exits the scene, and Lysander, as you probably know, falls in love with
Helena at first sight. Before the dawn all of Puck's mistakes have been
corrected, the magic is gone, the madness ends and the right lovers fall in
love with the people they are supposed to.
With his 1996 production of "Hamlet", Kenneth Branagh showed that it is
possible to conceive a brilliant adaptation of the full text, but the result
will have a long running time, which would be unfortunate for a film like "A
Midsummer Night's Dream". Hoffman has chosen a more traditional approach of
snipping speeches by removing "extraneous" material. He is less successful.
Because of the minor problems in the script and unusually rare and difficult
language the acting feels at times cold and removed, as if the actors
themselves didn't quite understand the lines they are pronouncing. Christian
Bale is pale, Calista Flockheart and Anna Friel are acceptable and Dominic
West is at times interesting. But it is only Kevin Cline, Stanley Tucci and
Michelle Pfieffer that feel confortable in their roles and really give
extraordinary performances.
Hoffman's magical picture relies more on performances and atmosphere than on
special effects and depth of story. There are no computerized creatures and
characters, which is a nice break from Lucas and Besson. The technically
simple, but incredibly effective art/set direction dazzle the viewer with
golden sparks and fairies, shining in the air like gems, and silver
moonlight shining upon our lovers. Makeup and costume design are spectacular
in creating a variety of odd denizens, including a rather frightening- looki
ng medusa and a few alien-looking creatures. The movie captures the delicate
beauty of this Shakespearean comedy. In a magical fantasy setting like this,
lines as "The course of true love never did run smooth" and  "Lord, what
fools these mortals be" work exceptionally well.
The director changed setting from 16th century Greece to Tuscany in the late
1800s. The bicycle  a relatively new invention at the time  becomes a key
prop, allowing characters to pedal after each other instead of chasing
around on foot. It also provides one of the movie's most amusing sight gags.
But he is careful, this is not "Romeo + Julia". The modernizations aren't
too modern, and his changes to the original story are minor and almost
unnoticeable.
We have had many spectacular adaptations of Shakespeare's undying
masterpieces. And it is a tuff task to compare with them. Michael Hoffman's
new feature doesn't capture the depth and grandness of Kenneth Brannagh's
"Hamlet", nor does it possess the power and originality of Richard
Loncrane's "Richard III" . But its magical beauty and appealing plot make it
good enough to stand in such exceptional company.

Title
Review for Wild Things (1998)
"..People are not what they seem to be.."
                          John McNaughton has created a streamy, hip, sexy,
at times funny and constantly surprising detective investigation. Its trashy
style, with plentiful sex, nudity and murder will thrill the neo-noir fans
and the MTV generation. It's a well made thriller that completely catches
and engages the viewer in its complicated web of grizzly events following
one after another.
"Wild Things" can be compared to Wes Craven's "Scream". That being,
reinventing the genre by using it's conventions to laugh with us at the
absurdity of it. It is more serious and complicated, than Craven's
reinvention, but at least as entertaining and interesting to watch.
"Wild Things" starts off with a tense, playfulness. Sam Lombardo (Matt
Dillon) is a guidance counselor at a local college in Florida. He is a
heartthrob for the female student body. He leads an assembly introducing
some students to the local detectives, Ray Duquette (Kevin Bacon) and Gloria
Perez (Daphne Rubin-Vega) for a discussion on Sex Crimes. Tension mounts
immediately when Suzie Toller leaves the auditorium cursing on behalf of
Duquette, (for what reason, we won't learn until much later in the plot).
The plot starts in earnest when Kelly Van Ryan (Denice Richards) and her
friend Nicole show up at Sam's home to wash his car (part of a school credit
program). Kelly has an obvious crush on Sam, and conspires with her friend
to be left alone with him. Events start to take a drastic turn when Sam is
accused of rape. He is suspended from his job, loses his home and is outcast
from the port town he lives.
This is all I intend to reveal of the plot to not spoil the impression.
Actually, even if I wanted to, I could never have done it, since the complex
story would unfold on multiple pages.
Visually the film is a perfect example on what we call "Hollywood-style":
impressive cinematography, fast paced editing and wisely chosen locations.
This creates the right atmosphere of an appearing innocence covering up the
horrifying reality. There are some brilliant scenes, miscellaneously edited,
where monstrous alligators appear slowly from the pure and clear waters.
This, at first glance unnoticeable parallel, is clearly the film's real
strength - showing the unsettling difference between a world we want to see
and what this world really is. "..People are not what they seem to be.." The
characters should appear as beautiful, attractive and charming, which is in
direct opposition to who they really are. Generally the acting is above
average, but not above the level of what we are used to expect from intense
thrillers. McNaughton knowingly lets the plot overshadow the characters.
This action naturally sets new demands for the script. " I don't like most
thrillers I see. I read the first five pages of the script, and I can
already predict what will happen on the last two pages. Most are very
clichéd," says the director. His plot really presents a twisting story,
providing surprising (maybe even too clever) turns and twists. It presents
mysteries that compound themselves into sub-mysteries to trick and deceive
audiences with the resolution embedded at the end (the screenwriter has
included so many elements that they had to be explained between the closing
credits). And there are offcourse some logical mistakes, flops and failures
along the way. Towards the end it gets so weird that you'll have to wonder
what the director was thinking. They tried hard to make it as unpredictable
as possible, but they tried too hard. As the events are progressing, you
might just think of the most unexpected and unrealistic thing to happen, and
it probably will.
By going a bit too far, McNaughton excludes his chances to be the creator of
one of the most interesting thrillers released during this decade.
Review written by Alex Ioshpe (C) 1998

Title
Review for Prince of Egypt, The (1998)
WINNER OF 4 GOLDEN APOLLO AWARD
INCLUDING BEST PICTURE - ANIMATED/MIXED AND BEST SCORE
MPAA: Rated PG for intense depiction of thematic elements.
Runtime: USA:97 / Germany:99 / Japan:99 / Netherlands:90
Country: USA
Language: English
Color: Color
Sound Mix: DTS / Dolby Digital / SDDS
Certification: USA:PG / UK:PG / France:U /
Germany:6 / Italy:T / Netherlands:AL (Meekijken Gewenst) / New Zealand:G /
Norway:7 / Portugal:M/6 / Singapore:PG / Sweden:7 /
Switzerland:7 (canton of Geneva) / Switzerland:7 (canton of Vaud) /
Brazil:Livre / Finland:K-8/5
DreamWorks has struck gold with their first animated feature, "The Prince of
Egypt". It's a completely unexpected triumph that will undoubtedly open new
doors and new possibilities in animation. A daring, breathtaking, dramatic
and powerful musical masterpiece and an artful, mature alternative to
Disney. An emotional and visually stunning tour de force that lifts the art
of animation to new hights. This could be the greatest animated feature ever
created. Although it is still magical and entertaining (without being
ashamed of it), it has a premise that is more interesting and serious that
we're used to. It's an artful alternative to Disney's various mermaids,
lions, beauties and beasts. It is simply a more sophisticated subject.
The film opens with a pray, a cry for freedom. The giant Sphinx standing
amidst the vast, dreamy landscape and the sea of Hebrew slaves working under
the burning sun. Egyptian soldiers with swords, bloodied with children's
blood are roaming the Jewish settlement. Amidst this blood, cry and madness,
a Hebrew mother, places her infant son in a basket and sets him adrift on
the Nile River. The burning houses and screams of terror slowly fade away as
the basket disappears in the river. After a perilous journey, the basket
floats near the royal palace, where it is spotted by the Queen. As she
approaches the basket with her young son nearby, she marvels at the
beautiful infant boy inside. She names the baby Moses and adopts him as her
own...
This is an emotional adaptation of the Exodus, resembling a stimulating
drama, rather than a kiddy cartoon. Every effort is made to stress that
Moses is a major figure in the Old and New Testaments and the Koran. It
tells the story of the Hebrew slave Moses, that became one of the greatest
profets of our time. Raised with a rambunctious adopted brother Rameses
(Ralph Fiennes), Moses (Val Kilmer) lives and content life, among the
Egyptian royalty. As teens the young princes are full of vinegar, charging
at breakneck speeds in their chariots, while all around them the Hebrew
slaves do endless toil under the ruthless Pharaoh Seti (Patric Stewart).
Raised to believe they're brothers, they continue to have a strong
connection even after God's will sets them on a collision course. With time
Moses starts to discover the dark side to this paradise. Rameses is
appointed regent and honors Moses with a Jewish slave as a concubine -- a
wild beauty named Tzipporah (Michelle Pfeiffer ). That night as Moses
returns to his room, he discovers that Tzipporah has escaped. Intrigued by
the rebellious girl, he follows her through the Hebrew settlement of Goshen
where he comes upon his true siblings, Miriam (Sandra Bullock) and Aaron
(Jeff Coldblum ). Believing that Moses has returned to help them, Miriam
reveals to Moses the truth about his identity, that he is the son of a
Hebrew slave. Shocked and dismayed, Moses refuses to believe her and flees
back to the palace. That night he has a nightmare about the slaughter of the
newborn Hebrews many years ago. Confused, shocked and angry, he realizes
that his entire life has been a lie. Fleeing to the desert to sort out his
feelings about his true identity, Moses ends up in Midiante, a peaceful
village surrounded by majestic mountains. Here, away from the glamour and
his past existence, he finds another life. A life of peace and harmony. Here
he encounters Tzipporah and her family. Jethro, Tzipporah's father (Danny
Glover) and the High Priest of Midian, welcomes him into their tribe. As the
years pass, Moses and Tzipporah fall in love and build a contented life as
humble shepherds. One day as Moses goes in search of a wayward sheep, he
comes across an unearthly sight -- a burning bush that is not consumed by
the flames. To Moses' amazement, he hears the voice of God (also Val
Kilmer ), revealing his destiny and calling upon him to return to Egypt and
free the Hebrew people. Filled with doubt and fear, but ready to obey his
God, Moses returns to his past home, where he discovers that with the
passing of years the Pharaoh Seti has died and Rameses has become Pharaoh.
This means that he'll have to fight against his former sibling in his quest
to free his people..
This is hugely impressive. If DreamWorks can maintain such high standards,
Disney can say goodbye to its virtual monopoly on high-quality cartoon
features. It is no longer just kiddy animation films, where unwilling
parents has to be dragged along. It is simply another expression. This is no
longer a cartoon, but a work of art. The filmmakers have departed from the
animation formula that's practically been carved on stone tablets by Disney,
removing the kiddy elements, but keeping the same grandiose theatrical
musical style as those Disney epics that have made their way to Broadway.
Disney would never have undertaken such tricky and risky ride. This is not a
fairy tale. It is a story that has its roots in Jewish, Christian and
Islamic religion and believes. The result is nothing less than astounding.
It overshadows De Mille's classic "The Ten Commandments" with its emotions,
unusual depth and power and some of the spectacular action scenes and
chariot races, with its flurry of wheels, horses and rickety wood, almost
leaves "Ben Hur" in its dust. "The Prince of Egypt" has several scenes of
violence, including the scenes of Egyptian cruelty, that although are not
gory or extreme, might seem a bit too realistic for small children. The
directors have concentrated on the character of Moses and recreated him as a
person, not a hero. The thing I liked mostly about the premise of "Prince of
Egypt" is its three dimensionality. Nothing is black and white. There are no
good guys, bad guys or amusing clowns. It is a personal, penetrating drama,
portraying the struggle of Moses with his adopted Egyptian royal family.
Starting with a playful chariot race between Moses and Rameses and ending
with their conflict at the Red Sea, the film depicts once-loving brothers at
odds.
When it comes to animation, there are not enough words to describe the
splendor and complexion of these artists' work. "The Prince of Egypt" is
probably the most beautiful animated film ever made. It stuns the viewer
with its grandness, beauty and power. Drama is written over the entire film.
The grandness and majesty of the ancient Egypt is brought to life like never
before: giant statuary, pyramids and temples adorned with intricate,
colorful hieroglyphics. This kind of visuals are completely impossible to
create on set, in live-action films. The filmmakers seamlessly combine
painting and computer graphics, filling the screen with dense, richly
layered animation. In one particularly inventive dream sequence, even the
hieroglyphics come to life. God was heavily into special effects - when
Moses returns to free his people, he brings along a rod that turns into a
snake, that turns the Nile into blood, brings on all manner of plagues and
pestilence, and, for the big finish, parts the Red Sea. The lustrous colors
and loving care given to the faces are especially noteworthy. The
traditional animation ratio of forehead to eyes, nose and mouth has been
altered slightly to give the characters more room for subtle physical
communication. The change allows Moses to deliver a number of smoldering
glances that are pretty expressive for a 2D man. The music is also
incredible. Hans Zimmer's grand, emotional musical score echoing in the
background, and several wonderful songs (including the philosophical croon
"Through Heaven's Eyes" and the magnificent "When You Believe", preformed by
Whitney Houston and Mariah Carey), create an atmosphere that is
indescribable and is to see nowhere else.
"The Prince of Egypt" breaks away from the ancient traditions of animation,
by exploring new territories. It is a fabulous and magical refreshment from
Disney's cliché-ridden cartoons. This film raises several philosophical
questions, that De Mille never touched. It tells the story of a man that was
the only one that could speak directly to God and become his messenger -- an
honor he didn't ask for and didn't want. To be the chosen one doesn't have
to be a blessing. "The Prince of Egypt" is a celebration of the human
spirit, retelling the undying story of a man that caused a miraculous
victory that would lay a foundation for the birth of a new nation. And yet
it is a personal tragedy -- a life broken by destiny. Moses' life is forever
changed. He had to see hundreds of innocent children die and his own brother
parish. It is a beautiful and dramatic tale about finding yourself, about
life, fate and destiny.

Title
Review for Astronaut's Wife, The (1999)
The film is as good as or better than the average Hollywood release. It's scary. It's well-acted. It's filmed with a degree of flash and elegance -- chilly, muted, symbolic and refreshingly free from cheap shocks. It is a stylish and feverishly beautiful psychological thriller with several interesting science fiction elements. 
Commander Spencer Armacost and his wife Jillian (Depp and Theron) are an extraordinarily close and happy couple, until something goes wrong during what should have been a routine shuttle mission. NASA mysteriously loses contact with Armacost and his co-pilot, Captain Alex Streck (Nick Cassavettes) for a full two minutes, and when the shuttle is brought down both men are unconscious. Armacaost appears unhurt, but Streck has suffered a heart attack and later dies under disturbing circumstances. The whole business leaves Jillian, who has a troubling history of mental unbalance, in an emotionally fragile state, as does Armacost's uncharacteristic decision to retire from flying and take an executive position at a New York City-based aerospace company. Already feeling isolated and lonely, Jillian then learns that she's pregnant. Is her increasing conviction that her husband isn't the man he used to be a matter of hormonal swings and stress-induced paranoia, or did something unimagin!
ably awful happen to Armacost out in the cold void of space? 
This is an analogy to Roman Polanski's horror classic "Rosemary's Baby", and director Rand Ravich directs pretty much in the same fashion, where the most important element is the surrealism -- you'll be walking along side the main characters on the blurry line between dream and reality. The symbolism is thick and heavy, with multiple references to dual identities and insensitive husbands. The film is also incredibly beautiful. Its graceful cinematography, its flashy editing and haunting musical score are all part of a wonderfully rich atmosphere. 
The two leads are both extraordinary and both at their right place. Johnny Depp is convincing both as the "true American hero" at the beginning and as the mysterious entity after the "accident". He is capable of hiding the beast within. Charlize Theron is likewise incredible. The enormous emotional core of the script is challenging and requires a very serious, talented actress. Theron is obviously up to it. The character reminds us about Mia Farrow's ("Rosemary's Baby")character with the same haircut and problems -- she gets pregnant with twins and begins to wonder what exactly she is carrying. Unfortunately Ravich didn't take her far enough from her previous film and it looks like she's still playing the role of Keanu Reeve's wife in "The Devil's Advocate." 
It's very artistic, very stylish, but regrettably also rather stereotypical. For most of the time the film is feverishly interesting because nothing is kept too obvious. Everything is raptured in mystery, which makes it completely unpredictable. By the end of the film, when it's time for dazzling the audience with a worthy ending, the director changes his rhythm and selects the most primitive and disappointing resolution of all -- the typical Hollywood brain-killer, reminding about the infinite "X-Files"-episodes -- deluding, mysterious and very primitive underneath. Absolutely nothing is explained. What did the alien intelligence actually want? What is their objective? What actually happened? You almost expect "TO BE CONTINUED.." to appear on the ending credits. This is truly a fatal error that creates a rather anticlimactic atmosphere. But even though it happens at the very end, and everything else is almost flawless, it's hard to enjoy the film after watching it through. An!
d it doesn't hold anything of special interest to watch it twice. It's certainly better than the average science fiction cliché released every year, but hardly anything else. 

Title
Review for Perfect Storm, The (2000)
DIRECTED BY: Wolfgang Petersen
WRITTEN BY: William D. Wittliff (based on the book by Sebastian Junger)
CAST: George Clooney, Marc Wahlberg, Karen Allen, John C. Reilly
Disaster-movies form a genre that is probably the least respected of
all genres. It is simply the dumbest and most primitive of what
Hollywood has to offer, besides 'Godzilla' and 'Lost in Space' (who
are disasters in their own peculiar way). Lately there have been many
additions to this lowest layer of entertainment. The normal procedure
is to leave your brain at the counter and then take your place in
front of the screen. But we don't care. We love watching
disaster-movies: 'Twister', 'Volcano' ext.. We love to not
think. We've seen all kind of natural disasters: volcanoes,
earthquakes, twisters and even giant lizards in New York. But there is
one element missing: storm. This time director Wolfgang Petersen ('Das
Boot'), wants to pay with natural phenomenas, and luckily manages to
breathe some life into this godforsaken genre. The media kit for "The
Perfect Storm" begins with a special request that reads, "Warner
Brothers Pictures would appreciate the press' cooperation in not
revealing the ending of this film to their readers, viewers or
listeners." And so, following this request I will not reveal anything
specific about the premise, which is pretty simple: "In the fall of
1991 six fishermen left Gloucester, Massachusetts. And encountered a
natural disaster that has never before occurred in recorded
history. Nature has created a monster.."
It is not much of a story. And the film is mostly driven by characters
and special effects, who compete for screen time. Petersen manages to
create the right feeling, the mood, the atmosphere. And when that is
accomplished, you don't even need a story. The first we experience is
the fear and anticipation that we share with the wives, children and
parents that anxiously await the return of the fishermen, and the joy
of actually seeing them alive. Already the audience is given a peek
into the lives of these simple men, their trade and their
paradox. While their loved once are happy when they return, they feel
emptiness and longing. As much as they love their family and friends,
the deep blue sea is constantly calling for them in their
dreams. Their passion for the ocean is also their tragedy. It
alienates them from their earthly existence and the only place they
feel alive and at home is at sea. Petersen stimulates this romantic
notion of 'man versus nature' and paints the poetic contrast between
the gray, dark village and the magical blue sea. Sometimes it is
sapphire-blue, sometimes it is full of golden sparkles from bright
sundowns and pink sunrises. Sometimes it shines like liquid silver in
the reflection of the moonlight. The fresh ocean breeze, the sound of
seagulls in the morning and singing whales in the evening. It is like
a different and magical world of true peace and freedom. Captain Billy
Tyne (George Clooney) is heading towards the sunset with the fresh
breeze in his face, and his trusted vessel glides through the pure,
blue water. Now he is at home. And on his face, which has always been
sad and shy, is a smile. Tyne is probably the best developed character
in this story. He has fallen into a slump and takes his vessel out on
a desperate late-season voyage; there's a hint of Hemingway's "Old Man
and the Sea" in his character, with the wounded dignity and human
complexity. Clooney portrays him well, without making him a one
dimensional hero, but rather as a hurt and misunderstood human
being. His mos t quite, good hearted youngster, who is ripped apart
between his devotion to his loving girlfriend and the deep blue
sea. Mark Wahlberg continues to grow in confidence and ability, giving
surprising depth and shading to Bobby. The rest of his fearless crew
consists of Murph (John C. Reilly), a silent veteran who has estranged
himself from his wife and child and hides at sea, with his love and
emotions sealed inside him, Bugsy (John Hawkes) -- a sweet-natured,
but socially inept guy who has nothing to do on earth. He has nobody
that cares for him, nobody that will be glad when he returns. Sully
(William Fichtner), is the sullen adventurer and apparently Murph's
lifelong adversary. And of finally the Jamaican fishermen Alfred
Pierre (Allen Payne), who is almost never shown. He is like a shadow
on the ship, helping silently and fearlessly when the problem comes.
When the storm finally hits, the atmosphere changes. And the magical
blue waves turn into a midst of a monstrous, black fury. There is
something devilish, something unearthly about these gigantic
creations. The scale is enormous and frightening. And from this point
the film transforms from a melancholic drama to a magnificent thrill
ride. Peterson inserts some incredibly inventive shots and scenes. The
camera circles the ship, swims under water and flies through the
stormy clouds. The feeling is indescribable, an amazing adrenaline
rush, but regrettably hardly anything else. Peterson may have created
the perfect storm, but hardly a perfect film. Unfortunately the waves
have as much (if not more) screen time as the actors, who at times
seem like a background, with their character development almost
forgotten. Whether it was intentional, or whether the director was too
preoccupied with the special effects to think about his script, we
will never know. Another important element that was completely out of
place was ironically the music. Ironically because the composer is
James Horner, who created the Oscar-winning score for Titanic and
'Apollo 13'. However in 'The Perfect Storm' the good composer
completely misunderstood the director's intentions. Instead of
portraying the menace and silent horror that slowly crops up, Horner
adds a proud, patriotic fanfare, which seems completely out of place
and beyond any logic. In fact it quite often ruins the poetic
atmosphere that Peterson tries to create. The script may likewise need
some polishing and complexity. What Petersen does best is reflecting
the atmosphere, the terror and despair that these fishermen are
feeling. In this effort he achieves an incredible level of tension,
anxiety, drama and suspense. The fact that we know something about
them, make us care. We know about their families that anxiously await
them to return, about their dreams and hopes for the future. It is a
peek into a fisherman's life. Petersen tries to simultaneously tell
several parallel stories.  A raging waters and shows the situation at
home, where their families and friends sit in fear, terror and
isolation on an island surrounded by a furious blackness. And it is
here that he should stop. Instead of concentrating more on the six
fishermen and their emotional development and evolution, Petersen is
shifting his sets and characters in a terrible speed. He shows the
meteorologists, the other unfortunate sailors, fishermen and tourists
lost at sea and even the heroic rescue personnel that before saving
themselves had to save the others. This disturbing lack of
concentration is really what in the end ruins the film's otherwise
well directed drama. And yet, 'The Perfect Storm' never seems as a bad
effort. It will capture your attention like few movies have in recent
time. And unlike most disaster movies, this film feels like an amazing
adrenaline rush, a feeling that feels like a roller coaster ride. And
for that achievement alone, Petersen deserves praise.

Title
Review for Godfather: Part III, The (1990)
After sixteen years Francis Ford Copolla has again returned to his favorite
project, making the third installment in the Godfather-trilogy. This new
film has been underrated for no reason. It is as intellectual and
majestically made as Copolla's pervious films. It is also more
psychological, pessimistic and more tragic than the first two. The only
regret is the unconvincing performance by the newcomer Sofia Copolla and
some "unfinished" developments of some characters.
The film elegantly begins with Nino Rota's recognizable musical score, the
beautiful skyscrapers of New York and Michael's voice as he is writing a
letter to his children: "The only wealth in this world is children. More
than all money and power on earth, you are my treasure" . The year is 1979
and Michael Corleone has used the time since the ending of "Part II" to make
his father's dream come true - making the Corleone family legitimate.
Michael sold all his casinos and invests only in gambling. Constantly
haunted by the past, his only reason to live is his children.
The family has amassed unimaginable wealth, and as the film opens Michael
Corleone (Al Pacino) is being invested with a great honor by the church.
Later that day, at a reception, his daughter announces a Corleone family
gift to the church and the charities of Sicily, "a check in the amount of
$100 million." But the Corleones are about to find, as others have
throughout history, that you cannot buy forgiveness. Sure, you can do
business with evil men inside the church, for all men are fallible and
capable of sin. But God does not take payoffs.
The plot of the movie, concocted by Coppola and Mario Puzo in a screenplay
inspired by headlines, brings the Corleone family into the inner circles of
corruption in the Vatican. There is a moment in "Godfather III" where
Michael says: "All my life I have been trying to go up in society, where
everything was legal. But the higher I go, the crookier it becomes.." .
Visually this film is as spectacular as the first two. Gordon Willis' rich
cinematography, Carmine Copolla's beautiful composition and Alex Tavoularis'
wonderful art direction could not be better. But Copolla's first two
Godfather-films were more famous for their deep, intellectual plots, tree
dimensional characters and incredible acting, than for their visual
perfection. The third installment has only the plot and visuals. Some
characters could be much more developed and the acting, although good, never
accomplishes to reach the same height of the first two films. The biggest
miscasting is Sofia Copolla , who is so unconvincing and unemotional that
she manages to ruin several scenes throughout the movie, that could have
been grander and more emotional. The best performance comes unsurprisingly
from Al Pacino, who should have got a nomination for best actor at the
Oscars. Andy Garcia  is powerful as Sonny's son, strong, focused and loyal.
Violence is natural to him. He suffers no pangs of conscience when he takes
revenge on his family's behalf, and in this he is supposed to be strong in
the uncomplicated way Don Vito Corleone was. However both Kay (Diane Keaton)
and Connie (Talia Shire) are useless. And characters like Vito Corleone and
Tom Hagen are really missed. The good part is that Michael is again reunited
with old friends, that you remember from the first and second films.
In the third film Michael has become almost like his father, Vito in the
first film and Vincenzo resembles Michael when he was much younger. This
parallel could be more interesting if Vincenzo's character was more
developed.
Many have pointed out that making the third film, was unnecessary. I
disagree. It is a beautiful film of great importance, completing the tragic
saga of the Corleone family.
The first film showed some horrible results of Corleone's life. It showed
Michael making a choice; the second showed a man damning himself for his
choices and feeling the impact of changing times. A man desperately trying
to keep his balance, focus, family and sanity, while everything is crashing
all around him. The third film is a terrifying conclusion - a result of
Michael's life. The life he chose for himself is like quicksand - one wrong
step and you are doomed. There is no turning back. And no matter how hard
you try to get out of it, to free yourself, no matter how powerful and
wealthy you are, you are helpless - sinking deeper and deeper till it
swallows you completely. The beautifully directed last sequence is also the
powerful climax of the film, when Michael is sitting alone in his chair,
left by everyone, surrounded by emptiness and memories of his friends and
family members long dead. Here he dies - alone, miserable and unforgiven

Title
Review for Game, The (1997)
NOMINATED FOR 4 GOLDEN APOLLO AWARD
INCLUDING BEST DIRECTOR AND GOLDEN JURY AWARD
This film has the shortest trailer I've ever seen. For a brief moment a
short message passed the screen: "..From the director of "Se7en" -- 'The
Game'..". That's it. Indeed after creating "Se7en" in 1997, David Fincher
doesn't need any introduction. He is universally known as the creator of one
of the most horrifying and provocative thrillers since the dawn of
moviemaking. If he decided to remake 'The Exorcist' as his next film, nobody
would be surprised. The critics proclaimed that this "bright new star" would
not create anything "as provoking" in many years. His next film came
therefore as a big surprise, since it is actually better! This is a
gripping, dizzying and thoroughly entertaining thriller which bears no
resemblance whatsoever to 'Se7en', except in the obvious talent of the
director. Come inside..Players needed..
His name here is Nicholas Van Orton (Michael Douglas), scion of the
super-rich Van Ortons of San Francisco. Dark rooms, cold floors, and bland
gray suits abound as Nicholas tends to his daily business of being filthy
rich and alone. Wide screen views of his grand mansion or office focus on
the glorious facade of his life, but soon we learn that there is more
underneath this mask of perfection. Looking at him moving slowly within the
many rooms in his mansion, makes us realize his loneliness and misery.
Fincher skillfully crafts the image that Nicholas is a small cog in the
grand scheme, passively observing as his life slowly drifts away without
him, while his fortune builds effortlessly. Van Orton at first seems a
victim of his own making, but from the opening home-movie sequence and
occasional flashbacks, we get to know that his detachment from people is a
defense developed as a young boy after he'd witnessed his father's suicide.
Four decades later, he's a disturbed middle-age man himself, perhaps
predisposed to suicide now that his age matches his father's last year. He
is celebrating his 48 birthday as the last one -- completely alone, in his
gigantic and equally lonely estate. A spark in his everyday existence is the
appearance of his long lost brother, Conrad (Sean Penn). Knowing about Nic's
problems, Conrad offers him a special present -- a contract with Consumer
Recreation Services. "They'll make your life..fun". Suspicious about the
unknown company, Nic starts to ask around. He suddenly discovers that all
his friends and associates are members of what appears to be a powerful
underground company, with offices around the world, financed by men of
wealth and power. In order to play, Nicholas endures extensive physical and
mental tests, while also completing endless personality questionnaires. As
an answer to Nic's question "What are you selling?", the manager replies "We
provide..what's missing.." The 'game' is tailored to his particular needs,
determined by a grueling battery of psychological tests. The "profound life
experience" begins quietly but soon erupts in a confusing maze of
devastating events. Terrorized by unknown forces and shadowy figures who
seem intent on dismantling everything he has built, Van Orton has to win
this deadly game or lose control of everything in his life. A paranoid
nightmare, with enough violent coincidences and near-death experiences to
make Kafka give up writing and move to Sunnybrook Farm.
Fincher tightens the screws psychologically as well as viscerally. As tautly
as he can fashion a chase or an action sequence, he's even better at
creating a pervasive atmosphere of impending doom, or the unsettling
possibility that literally anything could happen next. The game overlaps and
overtakes his life when his house is vandalized and his company's funds are
tapped and drained. Even his friends seem connected to his downfall, and the
waitress, who turns up again, has more than just drinks to spill on him.
Technically, Fincher has captured the essence of the thriller through a
great use of his camera. The initial expansive views of Nicholas in his
home, seemingly possessing control of his life, begin to close in on him. As
the pressure on Nicholas rises, we find him trapped in elevators, running
down alleys and dank hallways, and locked in cars. Sweat and strain replace
the calm and command that Nicholas once possessed. The paranoia runs deep
and even Conrad does not appear trustworthy.
Fincher has wisely concentrated on Van Orton, making the audience share his
paranoia, suspecting everyone - while fighting an invisible enemy. The
supporting characters, including his own brother, appear as mysterious and
faceless enemies within a destructive machinery. Douglas is the perfect
choice for the cynic and cold business man. Nicholas is the product of the
American system, a product of society. He is the face behind the American
dream, living in its reality. Douglas is fabulous, both as the sophisticated
'king of the world' and as the confused and haunted victim. Sean Penn is
likewise incredible, trying to be Nic's opposite, never becoming like his
older brother. The other actors fill their small parts well, including the
secretive waitress. What do you give the man that have everything? What's
missing? And what's missing in the lives of business men and aristocrats is
suspense, thrill, fear and excitement, but mostly love and feelings.
- Fincher's camera work, brilliant editing and dark score create an
atmosphere, that would make Hichock look like a schoolboy. After making
"Se7en" he left us all shocked, with this one he dazzled and amazed us, as
he invited the audience into his intelligent maze of refreshing events,
ideas and thoughts. He left me in the theatre -- shocked, amazed,
enlightened, wondering: what's next?

Title
Review for Bicentennial Man (1999)
DIRECTED BY: Chris Columbus  
WRITTEN BY: Nicholas Kazan
CAST: Robin Williams, Sam Neill, Embeth Davidtz, Oliver Platt
MPAA: Rated PG for language and some sexual content.
Runtime: USA:130 
REVIEWED BY: Alex Ioshpe (C) 1999
'Bicentennial Man' is a family film without any external motive with
the exception of providing the minimum dose of entertainment. Chris
Columbus, the director who gave you "Mrs. Doubtfire", plays on
sentimental strings and mushy dialogue to make his point. Based on the
short story by Isaac Asimov, it is supposed to be a science fiction
story about a robot who wants to be human, which as you can imagine is
very difficult. Starting in a not too distant future the film
concentrates on a wealthy family that buys an android to help them
with the house and children. Soon this robot, called Andrew (Robin
Williams) shows abilities that makes his owner Mr.Martin (Sam Neill)
very curious. Andrew is interested in art and music, he "enjoys"
making clocks, which clearly shows that he has genuine emotions. It
shows out that because of a small failure in the "electrical circuits"
and "positronic brain" Andrew has accidentally gained a soul. This
makes him unique and his evil creators worried. Then Mr.Martin decides
to teach Andrew all the things he wasn't programmed to do. Soon Andrew
wants to leave the house in pursuit of freedom, destiny and love.
This film can be described as a Disney version of Blade Runner, a film
that still shines as the biggest gem in the crown of science
fiction. Ever since that film, the subject of humanity still stands as
one big controversy. What makes us human? The thoughts? The emotions?
Is it possible to become human? At what point can we say to a robot
"Now you are one of us"? These are very tough questions that require a
serious and thurral approach. It is obvious that Columbus didn't take
them very seriously. When you think about it, this film is not really
meditating on the question "When is a robot no longer a machine, but a
human being?", but tells a story about racial discrimination and lack
of understanding. Andrew is so complex and emotional from the very
beginning that the audience immediately accepts him as a human being,
and only the society has troubles with it. In other words, it is as
far from reality as from the Academy Awards. Further more, there are
other annoying problems. To this day no serious filmmaker has dared to
speculate about the future in more than 50 years from now. This has
not been done for obvious reasons, because the filmmakers are well
aware of the fact that they lack the knowledge and imagination to
perform such a difficult task. Columbus is the first to have crossed
that line. The result is, as you might imagine, primitive, unrealistic
and incredibly disappointing effort. The world is simply frozen in
time. Neither the society, fashion, culture or values have changed
over 200 years. Mom is still working at the kitchen, doing the
dishes. When you think back to the late 17th century and then compare
it to the world we live in today, you'll see a slightly bigger
difference. I am not saying that everything should change. It is
unlikely that the human rights will change, but it's even more
unlikely that there will not be any progress in science, technology
and fashion. I suppose it's possible to watch this as a some sort of
bizarre fairytale, but it's really hard. Robin Williams is hidden
behind c and speaking in a robotic way. As always he does a decent
job, as does Sam Neill. But it doesn't really matter. It is the
sentimentality and length that turns this picture into a tiresome
experience. Pretty much like last year's "Meet Joe Black", this is a
primitive and unresolved story which is presented with a splendor and
professionalism that it doesn't deserve. Great actors and a talented
crew have worked hard to achieve something that will be instantly
forgotten. When Isaac Asimov wrote this story, the future seemed far
away and magical. Everything seemed possible. Now is the future of
Asimov's time, and we know that it is not as magical and perfect as it
seemed a long time ago. For the same reasons that the young generation
of today can not be amazed by Julius Verne's "20 000 leagues under the
sea", so can't we accept this story as a potential reality. Let us
hope that next year's "A.I." will be more rewarding.

Title
Review for Blade Runner (1982)
In our time a good science fiction film is a rare artifact and a true
treasure. The essence, the heart of the genre, the endless possibilities of
imagination are now replaced with primitive action sequences and impressive
special effects. The result is that the genre (especially in the 90s) has
become a synonimum for dumb and predictable "popcorn films". That is why we
have to look back at the time passed to find good science fiction films.
Every genre has its masterpieces. And "Blade Runner" is one of them. As a
falling star it has lit up the sky, opening new ways of science fiction by
defining its own genre.
Not since Kubrick's "2001: A Space Odyssey" has it been such a complex,
thought provoking  and sophisticated science fiction film. It is a strangely
compelling and humanistic detective story, set in L.A., year 2019. Humanity
has expanded far beyond the Earth, engaged in the eternal quest for new
frontiers. Those left behind are too old, infirm, poor or stubborn to escape
for the off-world colonies; they're stuck with the dregs of civilization, as
represented by a gloomy, rain-sodden Los Angeles. The only flies in the
ointment are artificial humans, colloquially known as replicants, deployed
in the most hazardous of environments. These artificial humans are designed
to serve man, by doing all the "dirty" and dangerous work, such as warfare
and collonisation of other planets. In their latest incarnation, Nexus 6,
these replicants have surpassed their makers, a moment of transition. On
Earth rogue replicants are outlawed, a hazard that demands execution. So
when a replicant unit is discovered in LA, the police assign their blade
runner division to the clean-up operation. It seems that the replicants are
trying to infiltrate the Tyrell Corporation, the monolithic entity that
built them, presided over by genius Eldon Tyrell (Joseph Turrkel). Rick
Decard (Harrison Ford) is one of the unfortunate blade runners, that are
stuck on earth, forced into taking up the chase.
"Blade Runner" is a brilliant analyses of the earth, human kind, its
development and evolution. An interesting fact is that Chinese has become
the new main language, since the world is mostly populated by the oriental
population. The world of the future is cold, dark and unfriendly. It is a
time of decay, fear, trash,neon and promises of clean air, blue waters and
green grass. The film also presents a great deal of dazzling special effects
and some of the most original art direction I have ever seen. From the very
beginning of the film we see the grand skyscrapers and buildings that arise
from the dark, almost dead soil. The art director has been inspired by the
Mayan and Egyptian architecture, combining it with Ultra modern art design.
The result is mesmerizing and wonderfully imaginative, and yet never
completely alien.
Director Ridley Scott has transformed Philip K. Dick's novel 'Do Androids
Dream of Electric Sheep?' beyond recognition. Along side with screenwriters
Hampton Fancher and David Peoples, he uses his ideas as a philosophical
launching pad. The film takes place in the middle of a silent war between
humans and artificial humans. Through the film both sides pose the very same
global questions: who am I? where am I going? This leads the audience to
concider the very essence of humanity itself. What makes us human? Memories?
Sentience? Thoughts? Ideas? Feelings? Does it really matter if they ar
artificial? And if they are, does it make them less human? This is all
thought provoking and original material that has been copied throughout the
years. Surprisingly enough, the film loose as fresh and original as at its
premiere in 1982.
The cast, consisting of 10 cast members, is nothing less than fabulous.
Harrison Ford is believable as the sad and quite Deckard - angry, hurt and
vulnerable. Forced to stay on earth, with no choice but to hunt for the
replicants. Falling in a certain apathy, he feels that he has absolutely
nothing to live for. His love interest, played by Sean Young, portrays
innocence and vulnerability, warmth and consideration, projecting an image
of what we concider humanity. When she turns out to be a replicant, we are
forced to pose the basic question: what makes us human? Rutger Huer, as the
leader of the rebel replicants, is the most captivating. He is charismatic
via lyricism, some memorable lines ("All those memories will be lost in
time..like tears in the rain.."), but mostly by his pationate nature and
desperate love of life. Off course  there are some characters in this film
that are created to give a more vivid and live image of future society. The
ingenious creator of the replicants, Dr.Eldon Tyrel (Joseph Turel) is a
cold, sinister character that became corrupted by the opportunity of playing
God. Another interesting character is J.F.Sebastion, a previously attractive
and respected genetic designer, he is now suffering of a terrible illness
that stops him from moving to the Off-world colonies. Living in almost
complete isolation, he makes his own friends, creatures that resemble
characters from fairytales and sagas, so that he won't feel alone. There are
many bizarre characters and events in the film that make it more interesting
and captivating. The fabulous cinematography by Jordan Cronenweth, combined
with Richard Hart's lightning frames the characters and the story in beauty
and imagination. All are the part of the warmly , symbolic whole, a mood
enchanted by Vangelis' magical and dreamy score. A music that is intimate
and distant at the same time. This may be the best soundtrack Vangelis ever
created.
The film ends in a monstrous, violent and emotionally engaging finale, that
makes a lasting impression. 'Blade Runner' is a unique film, incredible on
every level. This is a prophetic and emotional tale that stands out as one
of the most original and intellectual science fiction films ever made.


Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
PRODUCED AND DIRECTED BY: Stanley Kubrick, WRITTEN BY: Stanley Kubrick and
Fredrick Rafael, ACTORS: Tom Cruise, Nicole Kidman, Sydney Pollack, Todd
Field, RUNTIME: 159 , MPAA: Rated R for strong sexual content, nudity,
language and some drug-related material.
RATING: 10/10 - ALTERNATIVE RATING: A
After 12 years, Stanley Kubrick finally directed his last feature, dieing
right after the production was completed. He never got the chance to witness
the audience react to one of his greatest achievements.
Only "The Phantom Menace" shared the controversy and the anticipation of
Kubrick's return to the big screen. But when some Star Wars-fans can (and
probably will ) be a bit disappointed by Lucas' new fantasy,
Kubrick-supporters will recieve everything  they have been waiting and
hoping for.
So far the greatest achievement of the year, his latest, and final, triumph
is a Kubrick picture in every sense of the word. It is beautiful, sensual,
at times creepy, gothic and mystifying.  It leaves the viewer with a lasting
impression. Intellectual and fascinating. The unforgettable characters make
you dive into the world of "Eyes Wide Shut" from the first scene. It is more
tender, sensual and human, than in any of Kubrick's previous films.
Set during the week before Christmas in New York City, Dr. Bill Harford (Tom
Cruise) and his wife, Alice (Nicole Kidman), live in a large Central Park
West apartment with their 7-year-old daughter, Helena (Madison Eginton).
Happily married, when Bill and Alice make their way to a ritzy holiday party
given by their friend, Victor Ziegler (Sydney Pollack), they find themselves
both having to turn down members of the opposite sex that make sexual
advances toward them. The next night, Alice finds herself confessing to Bill
that in the previous summer, she briefly met a devastatingly handsome naval
officer. "..That afternoon you and I made love and talked about our future,
and our child...Just the sight of him [naval officer] stirred me deeply and
I thought if he wanted me, I could not have resisted.  I thought I was ready
to give up you,  the child, my whole future..."
This sudden and unexpected revelation shatters the stability in Bill's
everyday life, moving him farther and farther away from his everyday
existence into a completely different world. He leaves home to visit a
patient, but instead of coming back, he wanders the streets of New York. A
series of mysterious chance encounters leads him on an unexpected path of
discovery into a bizarre sexual underworld, where the rich and famous have
their sex games. What happens next depend on the path he chooses.
Kubrick doesn't hurry. At the same time, the characters discover more about
each other during these 24 hours--their dreams, feelings, and fears--than
they ever thought they would in a lifetime. And when the film ends, and a
new day is slowly emerging, you still don't know whether it was real or only
a dream. Kubrick slowly guides us through Hell, and brings us back at the
end, exacly where we started, giving us a chance for a fresh start.
"Eyes Wide Shut" is in many ways a perfect film. It is beautifully directed.
Every shot, every move, every camera angle and every cut has been wisely
selected with great care and professionalism. Both the cinematography and
editing as well as the beautiful art direction are award worthy. The acting
is flawless and every charecter has its place. Nicole Kidman has been
granted surprisingly little time, at the same time her charecter is the
heart of the movie. Kidman is nothing less than wonderful. Cruise really
caries the film on his shoulders, the evolution of his charecter is
incredibly essencial for the picture. This is probably his most mature and
serious part and he is incredible - greater and more powerful than ever. The
music does not bare the mark of a genius, but is incredibly effective,
giving the film a feel of terrifying horror, reminding about Hichock and
Carpenter's "Halloween".
 The film created a lot of controversy concerning sex. First I want to point
out that Kubrick's portrayal of sex is graphical, but never pornographic.
The beautiful castle in the woods, the mediaeval costumes, masks and
frightening choir create a creepy, gothic effect. All the couples are
masked. They can not kiss or see eacthother's faces, and for most part they
do not speak. Sex is here pictured as cold and ritualistic - more disturbing
than erotic, partly because of an underlying danger that is always present.
"Eyes Wide Shut" is by no means an easy movie. It's a personal, emotional
and  heavy drama, created to provoke thought and debate. The film generates
many interesting ideas, and the question "what is this film about" must be
answered by every individual. I think that Kubrick's new motion picture is
about several things. It is about the terrible suspicions that creep into
our minds and drive us to the brink of madness, when we find out that the
great love of our life may not be as faithful as we had imagined. It's about
modern society and moralizm, sex and family. But mostly it's about a theme
that has been present in almost every of Kubrick's previous films:
dehumanization of society.
It is strange that right before his death, Kubrick directed the most human,
and sensual film in his legendary and rewarding career.

Title
Review for Vampires (1998)
The last of vampire-films offers plenty of blood and gore, but beyond that -
nothing.
Jack Crow (James Woods) is a professional vampire slayer that is secretly
working for the Vatican. His and his men's mission is to clean the earth
from vampires. They have lost count of how many vampires they have
slaughtered, but one has always escaped them. Valek (Thomas Ian Griffith ) -
the Dark Messias and ruler of the undead that is older than time itself. For
all eternity the vampires have searched for their salvation - the Black
Cross.  With the cross in their possesion, the vampires will be able to walk
in the sunlight. After that it is either the humans or the vampires who will
dominate the earth...
I have never liked John Carpenter and his style. After seeing this film, my
opinions have not changed. John Carpenter remains John Carpenter. However,
because of the film's self-irony, black humour and fascinating
cinematography, I would say that it is his greatest achievement in a long,
long time.
Neither the synopses or Carpenter's direction are original. But there are
some things that are interesting. The director's negative view on the
Catholic Church, for instance. At the end of the film it becomes clear that
Cardinal Alba (Maximilian Schell ) has simply used Crow and his team to find
Valek, so that he would gain eternal life. Otherwise the Catholic priests
are shown cool - drinking, smoking and breaking the rool of celibacy.
Carpenter has created an interesting atmosphere. Set in New Mexican dessert,
he switches between bright golden sunrises and bloody sundowns, symbolically
illustrating the good and the evil through light and darkness. More than
anything in this film, this simple illustration shows the battle between
good and evil. The cinematography by Gary B. Kibbe   is probably the film's
greatest achievement. Music (composed by John Carpenter himself) is at times
effective, the special effects and makeup are likewise worth a notice.
When it comes to the cast (in an intellectual film like this casting is the
last problem; everyone can scream and swing the axe!), but here James Woods
is suprisingly convincing. He is macho and cool as the dedicated hunter, who
lost his family to the "breed of evil". Woods is constantly overacting,
which really saves the film from falling into the trap of serious self
importance. Daniel Baldwin is also entertaining as Crow's loyal partner. The
other cast members are struggling.
Because the film doesn't take itself too seriously, it stays afloat. Still
it is like most vampire-films - a mediocre experience.
Review by Alex Ioshpe 
Copyright 1998 by Alex Ioshpe

Title
Review for Ghost Dog: The Way of the Samurai (1999)
MPAA: Rated R for strong violence and language.
Runtime: Japan:116
'Ghost Dog' is a strange-looking movie with a unique atmosphere. It's
built of offbeat rhythms, outlandish jokes and a strange sensibility
in which cultures and subcultures of Japan, Sicily, Port-au-Prince and
the Wu Tang Clan seem perfectly harmonious. The experience is deeply
hypnotic and almost haunting.
In director Jim Jarmusch latest picture the main character is a
reclusive and mysterious inner-city hit man who lives and breathes by
the code of ancient Japanese warriors, and moves with so much
conviction that he barely needs to speak. Alone on the rooftop he
calls home, silhouetted against a smoky sky and the ragged chimneys
and TV antennas of neighboring buildings, Ghost Dog lives with the
pigeons and his books. His life is simple, harsh and bizarre. When he
is not on a mission, he writes his poetry with his sword. His only
friend is the ice cream-man in the park. Though the ice cream man
doesn't know English and Ghost Dog doesn't understand French, they
seem happy with their relationship. Ghost Dog has the heart of a
warrior, but he moves on little cat feet. As every samurai, Ghost Dog
has a master in the form of a mafia chieftain. They communicate with
the help of a carrier pigeon that lives on Ghost Dog's roof.
The film is divided into multiple chapters, where quotes from
"Hagakure: The Way of the Samurai", which is basically Ghost Dog's
bible, are projecting the events unfolding before our eyes, explaining
at times Ghost Dog's behavior and state of mind. Animated parables of
sex, envy, power and violence comment on the film's action as
well. Jarmusch moves dreamy and unhurried, slowly capturing the
audience in his world. At times it feels like no body is directing at
all, that the movie kind of lives on its own. But there are times when
you feel a powerful force behind the images. The clever parallels
between dream and reality and time and space. The comparisons,
philosophy and human emotions -- everything is implanted in a
strangely complex picture. It's an action movie for maverick
intellectuals, a noir thriller with a prankish streak, a genre film
that knows and mostly obeys the rules but keeps cramming in odd
insights, goofy jokes, offbeat allusions to cinema and literature. An
exploration of the mind and deeds of a man who moves mysteriously and
yet purposefully through a life filled with danger. There is also a
strange connection and complete understanding of the main character,
who is lost in dreams, space and time. He has simply lost all touch
with reality. There is a strange surrealism in Jarmusch's picture,
where parallel worlds virtually float into each other, co-existing
simultaneously. Ghost Dog's alienation from human society, his
loneliness, his attempt to justify inhuman behavior (murder) with a
belief system (the samurai code) has no connection with his life or
his world. The act of vengeance, a dream to return to the ancient
traditions - the purity of mind and soul and the nearest you can get
in our modern world is murder.
Ghost Dog appears in virtually every scene, yet he doesn't speak for
almost an hour and when he does, it is only in short, concrete
sentences. Yet, his presence is felt tremendously throughout the whole
movie. Every minute he's on screen, Whitaker makes "Ghost Dog" worth
watching. He basically carries the film on his shoulders, making the
diffirence between success and failure. There are moments where his
eyes and body language say more than any words ever could. It's
nothing less than an awesomely grave and sensitive performance.
"Ghost Dog" might feel too close to a genre film, but it resembles no
other mob story or action-revenge picture ever made.  It splices
together 18th century Japanese teachings, martial arts, mob
iconography, the military primer, The Art of War, hip-hop, mythology
and pop entertainment. There's the contrasty cinematography of Robby
Muller, for one, the pulsing score by the RZA, for another. And there
are those little Jarmusch touches -- the empty black spaces between
some of the scenes, for instance -- which give the film an utterly
unique sensibility. But there are times when the director's unhurried
style and slow pacing seem tiring, close to dull, which certainly is a
not very good element. In such moments Whitaker's presence helps a lot
and saves Jarmusch from a close flop. In the end you'll sit amazed and
a little confused by what you have seen. It's certainly not an action
film that will rock the box office. It won't make any headlines until
many years later, when many will wake up, remember embrace the
original and misunderstood director Jim Jarmusch.

Title
Review for Mimic (1997)
Also Known As: Judus (1997) (USA: working title)
DIRECTED BY: Guillermo del Toro
WRITTEN BY: Donald A. Wollheim (story) and Matthew Robbins (I)
CAST: Mira Sorvino, Jeremy Northam, Charles Dutton, Alexander Goodwin, Giancarlo Giannini, F. Murray Abraham
"For thousands of years, man has been evolution's greatest creation. Until now.." 
Amidst the brainless production of the summer season, a film with half
a brain will be noticed and praised as an epic. 'Mimic' happens to be
a fairly intelligent science fiction, wisely released along side with
the action and adventure cliches of this season.
In a brilliantly chilling title sequence, where behind the photographs
of the dead children and frightening insects sounds, a child is
counting to the infinite, symbolizing the dead. Slowly the story takes
shape. 'Strickler's Disease, in the face of the common cockroach, came
to New York like a thief in the night, threatening to steal an entire
generation of our children from before our eyes. Since it has proven
to be virtually immune to chemical control, a new avenue of attack had
to be discovered. A team of brilliant scientists recombined ant- and
mantis DNA to create a biological counter agent. They called it the
'Judas Breed'. These creatures are the most successful creations, that
are fit to adapt to any situation. Their breeding rate is
approximately 40 000 a year. They were designed to survive. And they
were released into the streets with one single mission: eliminate the
deadly carrier and die...Three years have passed. Susan and Peter are
now a happy couple, praying for a baby. The epidemic is completely
forgotten. Things are not so swell, however, in the dark caverns
beneath the city. A mysterious killer, called "Long John" terrorizes
the homeless in the subway system of New York. People are
disappearing. The police are unable to find him, and yet, during the
night, he can be seen, standing silently -- observing, waiting to
strike. Susan's happy existence is suddenly interrupted by two
homeless boys that collect insects for money. They offer her a new
kind of "bug" that has never previously been seen. What she discovers
is a gigantic speciment of the Judas breed. The shock comes when she
realizes that it is only an infant. You see, sometimes an insect will
evolve to mimic its predator. A fly can look like a spider. A
caterpillar can look like a snake. The Judas breed evolved to mimic
its predators -- us. These creatures can imitate us. They can
infiltrate us and they migrate. There is no telling how far they will
spread...May the the strongest survive...
This film is the first pleasant surprise of the season. It is
intelligent enough to be called science fiction and frightening enough
to be called a horror film. Faithful to Ridley Scott's classic
'Alien', Guillermo del Toro directs his film in the same fashion. This
is a darker and less 'family appealing' version of 'Jurassic Park'. It
tells the story about science out of control, about the cruel nature
and its ways. At the same time it's very interesting to see how nature
looks at the human species and in what way it tries to imitate it.
Mira Sorvino and Jeremy Northam make a fine, believable pair. And,
though a bizarre choice, Sorvino is surprisingly effective as the
brilliant scientist. The rest of the actors do their job honestly and
professionally, though not quite memorably.
'Mimic's centerpiece is the survival game played out between humans
and giant insects, and for its most part you'll certainly get the
adrenaline in your body flowing. The first hour is nearly
flawless. Del Toro is a true master at creating a chilling,
frightening atmosphere, that works because of the combining efforts of
an incredible team: brilliantly chilling cinematography by Dan
Laustsen, beautifully controlled, fast paced editing by Patrick
Lussier, and a magnificently sensual and yet frighteningly spooky
musical score by Marco Beltrami. Del Toro knows that what is left
unseen is more terrifying than what the camera reveals, no matter what
it is. But even when he unravels his mystery and the shadows disappear
on by one, we still are amazed because it's done so brilliantly. From
the very beginning the brilliant Del Toro captures you in his world of
pure artistic symbolism and dark poetry. The hand reaching into
darkness had me sliding down in my seat. The script features some
incredibly strange, but incredible human characters, that are anything
else but stereotypes from previous horror flicks. I liked the two
little kids who are bug collectors and know their way around the
subway system. And there's a shoeshine man's kid who clicks spoons
together in such a way that he mimics the clicking sounds of the Judas
Breed. Things appear and disappear. Mysterious entities look like one
thing and suddenly reveals itself as something else. Laustsen has done
a great job with lighting and camera placement, creating a dark,
depressive atmosphere, where the characters slowly emerge from the
shadows. Every shot and scene is filled with mystery and a sense of
indescribable danger lurking beneath. There are moments that are
frightening and interesting through the first hour of the film, the
mystery and suspense slowly builds up and is all released in the last
half hour. Although I didn't find the ending very satisfying, I still
think that this film has a lot to offer. Under Del Toro's incredible
atmosphere, there are not ver y ``Event Horizon', "The Relic", and
other films descended from 'Alien', but manages to rise above most of
its predecessors. Believe me, it will provide an intelligent horror
that is well worth your money and time. And since it is a summer
movie, it hardly needs anything else.
"Evolution has a way of keeping things alive" 

Title
Review for Dracula (1992)
Once upon a time, there was a brave prince, who was of the sacred order of
the dragon, known as Dracula (Gary Oldman ). He humbly served the cross,
defeating all the enemies of Christ. His name was Vlad. He lived happily in
his beautiful castle with his beloved wife, Elizabeta (Wiona Ryder ), who he
priced above all things on earth.
At that time, Muslim Turks swept into Europe, threatening all Christianity.
Vlad marched out to meet the warriors in battle and defeat them. He was
victorious. But the evil Turks shot an arrow into his castle, carrying false
news - that the prince has fallen. Elizabeta, believing his death, threw
herself into the river. When Vlad returned home, he found his beloved
princess dead in his chapel. He then addressed God, whom he has served and
worshiped his entire life: "Is this how you repay me?!....I denie You...I
will arise from my grave and revenge her death with all the powers of
darkness...Her blood is now my life! "
That is how the sweet prince became the servant of darkness, cursed to walk
in the shadow of death for all eternity. His beautiful castle turned into
prison, his heavenly land into hell and his life into nightmare...
Four centuries later, somewhere at the end of the 18th century, company
envoy Jonathan Harker (Keanue Reeves) visits Dracula's nightmarish castle to
discuss the old vampire's London landholdings. When Dracula sees a
photograph of Harker's fiancee Mina, (likewise played by Wiona Ryder), he
tearfully realizes the apparent reincarnation of his princess. "Do you
believe in destiny?", he asks Harker, "..that even the powers of time can be
altered for one single purpose?...The happiest man that walks this earth is
the one that finds true love...". From that point Dracula uses all the
powers of darkness to reclaim his long lost bride...He travels to London,
leaving three half-naked female vampires to feed on Harker's blood.
Meanwhile, staid and proper Mina waits for Harker by moving in with her best
friend Lucy (Sadie Frost), a wild, fresh aristocrat with three suitors, an
English gentleman (Cary Elwes), a homily-spouting Texan(Bill Campbell ) and
the aforementioned Dr. Seward (Richard E. Grant ). Before recapturing
Mina/Elisabeta's heart, Dracula entices Lucy, to become one of his fellow
night creatures - a disciple of Darkness..      Despite the best efforts of
her suitors and the metaphysical specialist Professor Abraham Van Helsing
(Anthony Hopkins), Lucy succumbs to her incurable malady. Van Helsing leads
the effort to stop Dracula's draw on Mina. It's a foray that mixes
state-of-the-art ghoulish effects with '50s-style movie fog, high humor and
intense emotions.
Oldman's Dracula appears in a number of forms, some enhanced by creative and
no doubt uncomfortable makeup. But while he's convincing in all of them,
he's most impressive as the young Dracula. Seductive and attentive, he has
everything it takes to create Dracula's overwhelming personality.
Wiona Ryder is the otherwise dependable and sensible Mina, mysteriously
drown to the charming foreigner in Jonathan's absence. She is constantly
searching for her true self, at last realizing that she is the reincarnated
spirit of Dracula's beloved princess, she is caught between two worlds of
which she must choose one. It's an appropriately adult turn for Ryder, who
manages to make you forget her gawky teen roles.
Hopkins provides comic relief and explanations as Dracula's nemesis Van
Helsing. It isn't a large role, but it gets the biggest laughs. Reeves does
all right as the serious young man of the future. His recognizable dry
acting is here at its place, but he easily could have been replaced by any
number of actors.
Francis Ford Cappola's picture is structured as Stoker's novel - with
fragments from the diaries of the main characters. That way we get their
true feelings, thoughts and emotions. Both the film's synopses and visual
appearence are specifically made as a fairytail. The sudden transformation
of Dracula's beautiful castle and heavenly land into the frightening
darkness reminds of the classic fairytail "Beauty and the Beast". From the
dark, gothic forests of Transylvania, "..where Devil and his children walk
the earth with earthly feet..", to the beautifully recreated streets of
victorian London, "Dracula" is undescribably beautiful. The production- and
costume design, art direction, makeup, musical score and interesting visual
effects are wonderful and could not be better.
"Bram Stoker's Dracula" is a visually stunning fairytail for grownups. It's
about prince and his princess, the eternal conflict between good and evil
and how good always prevails. It's about war with God, about love, fate and
destiny...
Review written by Alex Ioshpe ">ioshpe@online.no>

Title
Review for Whole Nine Yards, The (2000)

DIRECTED BY: Jonathan Lynn WRITTEN BY: Mitchell Kapner
CAST: Bruce Willis, Mathew Perry, Amanda Peet, Natasha Henstridge, Kevin Polack
RUNNING LENGTH: 1:40
MPAA CLASSIFICATION: R (profanity, violence, nudity)
----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
"You've killed 17 people and you think that my wife is a bad person!?" 
-Oz, 'Whole Nine Yards' Š Warner Bros. 
It's not very clever, but sweet and charmingly simple. An innocent and harmless film that will certainly cheer you up on a rainy day. Nicholas "Oz" Oseransky (MATTHEW PERRY) is a sweet dentist (if there is such a thing) living in suburban Montreal. Unsuccessful at work and unhappily married to a selfish, greedy vamp (ROSANNA ARQUETTE), he maintains his dull existence with the help of his best friend and assistant Jill (AMANDA PEET). It seems that because of his insurance Oz is worth more dead than alive. And his charming wife has already taken the liberty of hiring several professional hit men to inherit the money. On one fine morning a new neigbour is moving in next door to Oz. The problem is that he is Jimmy "The Tulip" Tudeski (BRUCE WILLIS ) - a hit man hiding out from a dangerous Chicago crime family. Despite their differences, Oz and Jimmy have one thing in common: someone's trying to kill them both. For Jimmy, avoiding a couple of hired killers is child's play. But for !
Oz, it's a whole new ball game. And it is here that the story gets a lot more complicated. The plot consists merely of endless complications, twists and turns. Every character wants another character dead. And it is all about the 10 million dollars. 
There are times where this film is simply delightful. One of this film's achievements is the wisely assembled cast. Matthew Perry puts on a wonderful comic performance as the innocent and good-hearted dentist, which proves him as an actor capable of more than 'Friends'. Bruce Willis is truly at home; playing a character that fits not only his abilities, but also his acting history. As his loyal friend we have Michael Clarke Duncan (Oscar nominated for 'The Green Mile'), who portrays his character so expressively that it is a sheer joy to behold. And even Natasha Henstridge ('Species') performed with all her clothes on. But it's Amanda Peet ('One Fine Day'), who has accidentally become the real star of this film. She looks and acts like a clone of Julia Roberts , with the same big smile and radiance, but a talent that is uniquely her own. She delivers her lines so naturally and with such comic ease that she simply commands attention. 
Director Jonathan Lynn ('My Cousin Vinnie') follows in the steps of several great mob comedies (such as the more successful 'Analyze This'), obviously too afraid to step away from the ancient formula. And though his film is fairly entertaining, it doesn't have one single original idea. Too much time is spent on the murder and defense plans, to let the cleverness develop. Simple slapstick humor and amusing lines (none of which are particularly intelligent) are the film's strength, not the characters. And that's why it sometimes feels like a collection of jokes, rather than a coherent story. At times acting provides more laughs than the script. Most of the laughs are genuine, coming one after another in a fast and rhythmic tempo. Some feel forced, but as an overall achievement Lynn's picture is funny. And much more is not required from a summer comedy. In other words Lynn does fine, but if Billy Crystal's character in 'Analyze This' would analyze him, he would probably say: "You!
 settle too easily for things. I think that it is a fear of rejection or disapproval. But you don't have to worry about that. Be your own man. Stand your grounds!" Because there are times when, amidst Perry's and Peet's periodic comic outbursts, you long for that almost forgotten, refreshing breeze of originality. 

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
What if one of our cities became the target for terror? What can we do? What can America really do about the increasing threat of terrorism? What basic human rights are we willing to sacrifice to prevent another Oklahoma City disaster? So far America has been the leading nation, opposing the fundamentalist terrorists around the world. It is the land of opportunities. It is the land of freedom. But what if it became the new target? This dark fantasy has unfortunately a very strong grounding in reality. 
When a special branch of the United States military, under the command of General William Devereaux (Bruce Willis), takes prisoner suspected terrorist mastermind Sheik Ahmed Bin Talal, Islamic fundamentalists across the world take notice. The only warning the FBI receives is a single, cryptic message: "Release him." Then all hell breaks loose in New York. A bus is destroyed, killing 25 civilians. A Broadway theater is bombed. Hostages are taken at a school. As the wave of terrorist activity crests, the President must consider if the only way to save the city and break the grip of fear is to declare martial law. Devereaux argues against that eventuality, but is nevertheless ready to lead 10,000 men into action on American soil. Another person not in favor of martial law is Anthony Hubbard (Denzel Washington), the FBI agent in charge of investigating the terrorist activities. His staff is comprised of smart, energetic, intelligent men and women very much unlike the usual group o!
f moronic Feds we're used to seeing in movies. Hubbard develops an uneasy alliance with CIA agent Elise Kraft (Annette Bening), whose department knows more about the situation than they're willing to reveal. But the attacks escalate. The FBI are helpless, chasing an invisible enemy. The land is under siege. They have lost control..A terror is coming from within.. 
What's great about this film is that it is made as if holding up a mirror to life. It reflects reality. And that's why it makes such an impact. Edward Zwick has created a clever, well written and terrifying thriller that may very well be one of the best films of the season. The director manages to tell several stories simultaneously. And so his film plays on several levels, never loosing focus on its main objective. He is exploring the abuse of power, the distrustful relationships that exist between various segments of the U.S. government (the army, the FBI, and the CIA). He takes a look at the complexities inherent when so many secrets and lies are involved. The Palestinian community in 1998 New York is treated exactly as Japanese Americans were during World War II. There are concentration camps and unlawful interments, all in the name of the "greater good." In the latter part of the film the land of opportunities looses its heart and soul -- freedom. Was that what the terror!
ists really wanted?
This film has evoked protests and objections from the Arab-American population in the U.S. and N.Y. especially. But to me these protests seem unnecessary. Zwick is careful to not step over the line and make the Palestinians typical Hollywood bad guys. The script is therefore wonderfully balanced. Agent Hubbard's best friend and loyal colleague Frank Haddad (Tony Shalhoub) is Lebanese-American. And it is quite often you hear lines such as "My first boyfriend was Palestinian. They seduce you with their suffering" or "They love this country as much as we do." But no matter how you twist this matter, you won't get away from the fact that when it comes to world wide terrorism it is Arab-speaking population who are in the great majority. More to the point, The Siege demonstrates the injustice of blanket condemnation of any ethnic group by depicting the unfair treatment of all Arab-Americans by the U.S. military. And thus this film does not serve as a source for discrimination in any!
 way.
Denzel Washington is dashing as always. In this role he is much more determined and stronger than usual. Anette Bening is enjoyable and believable as a shadowy CIA operative who prefers espionage, a network of snitches and seduction to gather information.. Bruce Willis is terrifying as the sadist, hungry for power, that never looses his connection with the audience, since his point of view is not too hard to understand.
The film is elegantly shaped. The scenes are easily floating into each other and the film never seems overlong. Zwick knows exactly how to provoke tension, horror and emotions and does it with a rarely observed professionalism. He tightens the intensity as the events progress. And when a plot twist comes, it actually is surprising. It is not a film drained in patriotism, like the work of Roland Emerich. Nor is it a film that portrays explosions purely for entertainment values. It is a daring picture that has courage enough to undertake such a risky story and difficult journey. It has courage enough to get involved in politics. It questions our foreign policies, mentality and defense. I must admit that it ends rather disappointing, as the director turns the patriotism way up and innovation down. But despite of that, it is certainly an intelligent and  thrilling film that provokes emotions and thoughts; a virtue that few summer films can boast of. 
"This is the U.S. army. It's a broadsword, not a scalpel. Believe me, you do not want us in an American city" 
- Gen.William Devereaux, "The Siege" 

Title
Review for Devil's Advocate, The (1997)
"..Here for his envy, will not drive us hence:
Here we may reign secure, and in my choice
To reign is worth ambition through in Hell:
Better to reign in Hell, then serve in Heaven!.."
- John Milton
  Despite of its misleading title, "The Devil's Advocate" is a shocking and
inspiring thriller, visually beautiful as well as thought provoking. The
Devil has been portrayed thousands of times throughout the years. Every year
Hollywood produces countless movies about the Evil One. Yet, there has not
been a single film or book (besides "Rosemary's baby" ) that was good enough
to be called interesting. Most of what we see about the subject is either
regular horror films, that despite of their primitive premiss take
themselves too seriously, or we watch action films of supernatural forces
where the Devil is nothing more than a foul beast. In either case 90% of
these movies are pure cliches - dumb and predictable. When I went out to see
"The Devil's Advocate" I was expecting one of the two "genres" mentioned
above. I got neither. What I saw was a fabulous, intelligent and amazing
film, which engages both heart and mind. The first surprise was the cast,
which can boast of Keanue Reeves, Charlize Therone and Al Pacino. Only the
fact that some of the most famous, and not to mention, talented actors of
our time agreed to star in this film immediately draws your attention.
Throughout the picture, you start realizing the unusual complexity of the
story and script.
Kevin Lomax (Reeves) is a success in the courtroom and out of it. He's a
young Florida defense attorney who has never lost a case. No matter how
repugnant the crime, no matter how guilty the defendant, Kevin Lomax has the
power to mesmerize the jury into accepting his arguments, buying into his
logic, being convinced by his charisma; and freeing his clients. Soon after
he has successfully won the case, where he defended an obviously guilty
child molester, Lomax is invited to New York, where a powerful law firm has
become aware of the Florida hotshot's acquittal record. Here he meets John
Milton (Al Pacino), the founder and head of "Milton, Chadewick, Waters", a
mysterious and powerful law firm with contacts and clients all over the
world. It is this charismatic and charming man that opens the door to a
completely different world; a world of luxury and pleasure, wealth and
power; a world of endless possibilities. This is heaven on earth. But as
Lomax tastes the power of being a wealthy New York attorney, something in
him changes. Winning is no longer just a goal; it becomes an obsession. Soon
he starts to realize that things are not what they seem to be; and all the
things he once had and cared about -a happy marriage with Mary Ann (CHARLIZE
THERON), his relationship with his mother, all his happiness - everything
disappear amidst the sparkling illusion of paradise. He suddenly realizes
that Heaven and Hell can coexist..at the same place and at the same time.
I do not intend to reveal anything else, since all of the interesting
surprises will be presented in the intense and inspiring climax. 'The
Devil's Advocate' is a story about some characteristically American values:
ambition, drive, materialism. Going after success and its trappings is a
classic American male behavior, and Kevin Lomax shows us what can happen
when that behavior gets out of hand. Winning has become such a core value in
our culture that we never stop to consider the consequences of our own
actions. This is a story about a man that has always been a winner and was
rewarded for it with the kind of things that winning brings - wealth and
power. At the end he realizes that winning may not always be the best thing,
but then it is too late. The characters in this film are both complex and
real, partly because of the good writing, partly because of some wonderful
performances by every actor. This is probably Reeves' best performance. He
manages to create a believable character - a kind of example, a role model
for the American way of life. Kevin's wife, Mary Ann is most likely the
hardest character to play, since she goes through a complex and difficult
emotional evolution. From being strong, devoted and ambitious (a female copy
of her husband) to vulnerable, hurt and on the verge of madness. Charlize
Theron gracefully floats into this character. The most interesting of
performances and characters is John Milton - the essence of Kevin Lomax's
temptation. The invitation by a modern-day Satan to enter a world,
represented by the excess of our most worldly pleasures. Al Pacino is
nothing less than astonishing, an award worthy performance that is as good
as anything seen this year. His power and presence is felt everywhere
throughout the film, even where he is not present. This eerie and unsettling
feeling is one of the elements that help creating the movie's intense and
frightening atmosphere. At the same time he provides the most entertaining
moments and colorful quotes. I can't imagine an audience not smiling when he
screams out: "I am a humanist!" . And the fact that Milton's law firm is
involved in all the dirty business, from drugs and money laundering to
murder, doesn't prevent the Devil to call himself John Milton, who is the
author of the most brilliant epic about Christianity. This is entertaining
by itself.
 As I have said previously, the major difference from the other films with
diabolical themes, is the complexity of the story. The Devil is not shown as
a ugly monster with red eyes. And the purpose of his existence is not to
posses innocent children. One of the many interesting things in this film is
the fact that the Devil is never really pulling the strings by himself --
he's giving people their choice, their free will to decide -- a demon whose
world is our own, with all its mundane events. He appears in human form and
presents human choices, and his greatest lure is what we have in common with
him: our greed, ego, jealousy, competitiveness, lust, dishonesty.  Another
thing is that the director is very careful to not let the monster out of the
box, so to speak, by using any images that are obvious. Things appear and
disappear in a moment; sometimes they seem real and sometimes they seem like
a bad dream, so that when the events in the story actually do emerge into
reality, the Lomaxes don't know what's real and what isn't anymore. The
third element is the fabulous production design, grand art direction and
rich cinematography. These elements help creating a strange and surreal
world - heaven and hell almost floating into each other. Hell is here not a
blackness, haunted by ghosts and monsters, but the rarified world of New
York's ultra-wealthy and privileged society.
After a thought provoking finale, I sat amazed by what I have seen. If you
are looking for entertainment, action and ugly monsters, this is not the
right answer for you, but if you are interested in a more serious and
inspiring film experience, this is a spectacular and meaningful movie that
is well worth your money and time.
"..There is no greater calamity than lavish desires.
There is no greater guilt than discontentment.
And there is no greater disaster than greed.."
- Lao-Tzu


Title
Review for Interview with the Vampire: The Vampire Chronicles (1994)
Vampire films, as well as other horror films, are usually dumb and
predictable B-movies, meant to scare us by cliches and simple shocks.  It is
therefore interesting to watch Neil Jordans recent film that is not only
visually stunning, but has also a plot worth making movies about.
Based on Anne Rice's novel, "Interview with a Vampire" is a long, dark trip
to hell.
The film opens with gothic quire and dark streets of present-day San
Francisco. The camera slowly find particular window. A shape of a young man
is visible in the darkness. "So you want me to tell you the story of my
life?". The mysterious man is Louis (Brad Pitt), a two-century old vampire,
telling his story to a fascinated interviewer (Christian Slater). His tale
opens in 1791 Louisiana, just south of New Orleans, where Louis falls victim
to the vampire Lestat (Tom Cruise). Given a choice between death and eternal
life as one of the undead, Louis chooses the latter, a decision he will
forever regret. Everlasting life and eternal youth, promised to him by
Lestat, turn instead into never ending suffering, damned to eternal hunger
for blood and longing for peace.
Louis cannot kill with the impunity of Lestat, but, to sate his hunger, he
must feed, and the blood of animals is not enough. Eventually, he pierces
the neck of a grief-stricken young girl named Claudia (Kirsten Dunst), whom
Lestat then curses with his unholy form of resurrection so that she can be a
surrogate daughter to both himself and Louis. For a while, they are one
"big, happy family." But all things end, and Claudia's growing resentment of
Lestat fuels a bloody confrontation. When Luis and Claudia break loose from
Lestat, they travel to Paris, where the Euro-vamps Santiago (Stephen Rea)
and Armand (Antonio Banderas ), who introduced them to a bigger world of the
damned.
Director Neil Jordan ("The Crying Game") together with the talented director
of cinematography Philippe Rousselot and composer Elliot Goldenthal has
created an incredible atmosphere. As the film begins, there is an incredible
palette of colors, beautiful sunrises, lush golden fields, green forests,
inky-blue clouds and blending sun. When Luis is "born to darkness",
everything suddenly changes to dark velvet, lit only by the silver
moonlight. The beautiful production design by Dante Ferretti , wonderful
costumes and art direction by Malcolm Middleton re-create the multiple
historical periods in the film. From the renaissance New Orleans and the
beautiful rococo Paris of the 18th century, to our present days.
The casting is likewise good, involving some of the most famous and
beautiful stars of Hollywood, Ireland and Spain. The controversial casting
of Tom Cruise as Lestat is incredibly effective. Cruise is energetic,
sinister, charismatic, wild and bloodthirsty. Cruise's Lestat likes to
seduce young women before exacting his dark red sustenance. With alarming
swiftness, the victims switch from sexual excitement to outright horror, as
his murderous purpose becomes clear. "...Kill them mercifully, but do it.
You are what you are..for do not doubt, you are a killer!" That is how
Lestat is teaching Luis. But behind that furious facade is anger and
loneliness that he carries through the centuries and tries to smother with
nightly rampages. Brad Pitt is equally convincing as the "vampire with a
human soul". Antonio Banderas and Stephen Rea are effective, but since they
play more or less secondary characters, their performances are almost
invisible. The greatest performance in the film comes suprisingly from the
young Kristen Dunst, who manages to create an incredibly emotional and
believable character. The world is changing around the little child, but she
does not. She remains unchangeable - a child for all eternity. Only her
wise, dark eyes reveal her age.
Ironically the film's only miss is the script. Anne Rice's novel is a very
interesting read, and her script is rich, colorful and emotional, but it is
also tiering and too melancholic, at times resembling a soap opera:
Claudia: "....Is that what I should do? Let you go..my father, my Luis, who
made me...Who will look after me, my dark angel, when you are gone?"
Luis: "Everything will be alright.."
Claudia: "Do you really believe that?"
And then they hug emotionally. Moments like those displayed above and Luis'
self-pity is a bit tiresome.
However Rice's script is otherwise strong and well structured, bringing up
humor and comic episodes, that were more or less hidden in the book. When
Lestat finds Claudia's dead dressmaker, whom she has killed, he cries out:
"Who will make you that dress now? Be a little practical....Never in the
house !" Moments like that are both entertaining and appealing.
Neil Jordan's direction is beautiful and sensual as he plays with
interesting issues like eternity, homosexuality, love and loneliness. His
gothic saga is not meant to scare, but to display these issues differently.
Wrapped up in mystery, his new, original picture brings vampire-films to a
new height.

Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
I am extremely sorry to disappoint you, but although the latest addition to
the Bond-films is still entertaining, it is "not enough" to impress the
awaiting fans. The series is obviously showing its age. Even James Bond
can't survive 19 returns to the big screen.
James Bond is the world's most famous secret agent. Highly trained, suave
and sophisticated, James Bond has a license to kill, as indicated by the
"00" before the "7". In past missions, Bond has been into space, under the
oceans and even driven around the streets of St. Petersburg in a tank.
Tomorrow Never Dies revealed a Bond that was happiest blazing machine guns,
and grinning at his gadgets which, as many fans have pointed out, is in
complete contrast to the man Fleming originally envisaged. However, The
World Is Not Enough has a surprise in store for us. The scriptwriters have
decided to delve deeper into Bond's character, making him more vulnerable
than before, and have decided to make a more realistic, gritty film.
Bond's assignment for TWINE is to protect Electra King (Sopie Marceau) from
Renard () whilst she oversees the construction of the oil pipeline. He gets
to go skiing, spends a greater amount of screen time with M (Judy Dench)
than usual and above all, utters the immortal "Bond....James Bond" while a
huge explosion rips through a building behind him. Brosnan, 46, who played
the famous agent since "Golden Eye", is quoted as not enjoying working on
the previous Bond film, Tomorrow Never Dies, saying, "The last one was a bit
like pulling teeth. This one's been like an old pair of shoes. "
In the days of Sean Connery Bond-films were always ahead of their time. Q's
inventions that were presented were therefore both innovative and
entertaining. Those inventions, Connery's charm and the humorous, some times
even self-ironic elements made those films both light and easy watchable
films that served as pure entertainment.
Michael Apted promissed a deeper story and specatcular action, but he can't
expect to dazzle the modern audience with the action scenes presented in
"..Not Enough", because they seem pale compared with science fiction- and
action films released by the hundreds every year, where the effects and
action of one were surpassed by the next.
His film is at times entertaining, but it is not James Bond; it's a common
action film that doesn't present any interesting material. The famous James
Bond-formula is not intact: the bad-guy in the story is not evil or sinister
enough. He doesn't have any scary bodyguards or unstoppable agents. He
doesn't seem like a man that is powerful and dangerous enough to change the
world. Apted added a softer side to his character, making him more
vulnerable. That makes the impression even worth. Bond-films can be compared
with fairytales and have a similar formula. It is therefore necessary to
have simple, but not primitive characters. There have to be bad-guys that
are both clever, powerful and evil beyond belief, so that they seem
threatening and at first glance impossible for our hero to conquer.
 By adding a softer side to the evil bad-guy, the director is attempting to
create a more real and three-dimensional character. This is completely
unnecessary and seems out of place in a film like this. An attempt to take
all the enormous exaggerations in this film seriously would be impossible,
and jet Apted's changed and unstable atmosphere doesn't make it possible to
laugh at the action or events presented, nor enjoy the movie as a typical
light and humorous extravaganza.  The total outcome of this is that the
characters and their interrelations seem unfinished, simplified and unreal.
The success of Bond-films throughout the years has been self-irony. An
attempt to take the story more seriously can actually ruin the whole
picture - that has always been the most important ingreediance in the
formula. Our hero survives explosions, rains of bullets, car chases and
comes dry out of water after chasing a submarine. The beautiful and tempting
women, the dangerous missions and Q's "practical" inventions are all
present. But although the locations are frequently changing, moving from
London to Kazakhstan, from the height of the snowy Alps to the depth of the
ocean, the suspense element is somehow gone and there is no particular story
between the action sequences.
And then there is the acting. Pierce Brosnan is worth a notice, but he
remains nothing more than an acceptable Bond, especially when compared with
Sean Connery. The major problems in the script make Bond's character seem
underwritten. What was intended as an improvement of his character, by
adding more emotions and vulnerability, results in confusion, unsure acting,
unfinished relationships and unsteady direction. Sophie Marceau on the other
hand is very impressive, partly because of her talent and appearance, partly
because her character is the best written and meaningful in the film,
responsible for the one and only surprising twist in the story. Judy Dench
is playing the first female leader in the history of British Intelligence -
a woman that is both strong and powerful. Dench makes most of her
underwritten character, but it's a pity that one of the most interesting
characters in the story is undeveloped. A dose of really bad acting comes
from Dennise Richards. There has to be more than a well shaped body and a
lab coat  to convince me that she is a scientist.
The previous Bond-films were known for their humor and amusing appearance.
The secret is exaggeration in plot and action sequences. By crossing the
line, and go beyond what most people find believable, the directors obtain
that element of self-parody that these movies are known for. "..Not Enough"
begins swell with the kind of stunts that made Bond famous; the impressive
musical score and staggering credits, but as the events are progressing, it
becomes less interesting and duller for every minute. Apted's exaggerations
are too extreme and neither funny nor innovative. Because of the confusing
atmosphere in the film, we are not sure whether to take this seriously or
just laugh, it is impossible to do neither. The humor is instead turned into
several jokes, provided by  Robbie Coltrane, a character that  is very
similar to the characters created by the Disney company in their animated
films, invented for one purpose - comic relief.
Those jokes, the well tuned musical score, impressive locations and a dose
of amusing acting from Sophie Marceau and Robbie Coltrane elevate the film
to the average level of what we are used to watch. To make a long story
short,"The World Is Not Enough" seems more like an extinction of the Bond
series than a recycling of it.


Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
"Do you know anyone who is looking for a fun science fiction, but can't find
it?"
"What if we could end their suffering with a single film? I used genetic
technology to mutate some of the greatest box busters."
- "Just what the hell did you do to those films?"
"We combined 'Jurassic Park', 'Jaws' and 'Die Hard' into one motion picture.
As a side effect the level of intelligence dropped to zero, but the film got
funnier."
I think that this conversation pretty much sums this film up. Renny Harlin,
the director of 'Cliffhanger' and 'Die Hard 2' , has created one of the
friskiest movies of the summer.
In the most advanced research facility in the world, a team of specialists
is working against the clock on an experiment that will benefit mankind. But
before they can save millions of lives, they will have to find a way to save
their own...This is 'Jurassic Park' all over again, only with deadly, mean
sharks instead of dinosaurs. Off course it's not the same. The wonder and
excitement is gone and only the explosions and screams remain. Nearly all of
the action takes place on the Aquatica, an advanced deep sea research
laboratory that looks like a "floating Alcatraz." It's there that a small
group of marine biologists and other scientists are experimenting on three
genetically altered Mako sharks that are bigger, smarter, faster, and
deadlier than is typical for members of their species. The humans, led by
Doctors Susan McAlester (Saffron Burrows) and Jim Whitlock (Stellan
Skarsgĺrd), believe that a protein found in the sharks' brains can cure
Alzheimer's Disease. On the day that the project's founder, Russell Franklin
(Samuel L. Jackson), is on the Aquatica, all hell breaks loose. The sharks
turn violent, a tropical storm hits, and a helicopter crashes into the
station. A group of six - McAlester, Franklin, shark handler Carter Blake
(Thomas Jane), engineer Tom Scoggins (Michael Rapaport), preacher/cook
Dudley (LL Cool J), and scientist Janet Winters (Jacqueline McKenzie) - are
trapped below the surface, struggling against rising water levels while
avoiding three pairs of dangerous jaws. The characters, though not original
or well written, are nice. The kind of people you almost care about. Susan
is the John Hammond of this story is a scientist, resembling Frankenstein,
believing in sacrifices for the greater good, saying: "they will thank me
later". There is a sea hunter, who is a survivor of every situation. There
are several scientists and an adventurous billionaire that offers money for
a god cause, but is actually looking for adventure and excitement. And then
there is a colored cook, energetically played by LL Cool J. He is the simple
soul, with simple needs and simple goals in life. Walking around with a
parrot on his shoulder, he provides most of the comic relief.
For a movie of its genre, it's rather interesting. And although you probably
figure out that the sharks will eat everybody up, except the heroes who will
destroy them, this film has so many surprising moments that it will keep you
watching till the end. When the good guys start dying at the beginning, you
know that this is going to be cool.
Gossip, its premise and successful test screenings suggest that Harlin has
created 'Jaws' for the year 2000. What he has created is a fun action
thriller that is worth the ticket, but hardly anything more. It will make
you scream and laugh and jump, but it can't be compared to 'Jaws'. And
although Spielberg's classic only featured one ordinary great white, and not
three giant mutated ones, it still made a much greater impression. And the
key is talent. In 'Jaws' the shark was never shown. Which means that it was
all left to our imagination. It was us who created the most terrifying
monster, not digital special effects. The pure psychological effect, raw
horror and exceptionally written characters created the Devil, whose world
was the deep blue sea. 'Deep Blue Sea' is not that deep. It's simply fun to
watch. In films like this, screams are more satisfying than conversation.
That is why Renny Harlin wisely tightens his grip as he moves along -- radio
contact is lost, the levels are flooding one by one, the lights go off and
the sharks are coming..Logical flaws and irrational actions are as frequent
as small fish in the Mediterranean, but as any experienced science fiction
buff knows, that sort of things are a rule, rather than an exception. And
since it's not aiming very high, it finds itself in a very big company. It's
a masterful action film with every necessary element carefully inserted in
the right place at the right time.
The effects are flawless and the sharks look even more real than the real
ones. There are a lot of satisfying explosions and impressive under water
shots. This is Harlin's best work in a long time and although it won't make
any high lines, it succeeds in being exactly what it is supposed to be -- a
fun action film.

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
DIRECTED BY: Jan de Bont
WRITTEN BY: David Shelf, based upon a novel by Shirley Jackson
CAST: Liam Neeson, Cathrine Zeta Jones, Lili Taylor, Lili Taylor, Marian Seldes
The tagline for this film is: "Some houses are just born bad". So I
didn't expect too much from this. But I had preserved a little spark
of ope as I entered the theatre. I thought: Liam Neeson, Cathrine Zeta
Jones and Jan De Bont. I thought, mabe it will be fun? And in fact the
beginning was rather intriguing. But by the end of it I thought: why
Liam Neeson and Cathrine Zeta Jones, Jan De Bont?. These great actors
are basically helpless with this muddled mess that defies any
rationality. Here is the story: In the monstrously over-decorated
mansion known as Hill House, visitors are tricked by an unknown doctor
(Liam Neeson) into being guinea pigs in a fright experiment under the
guise of an insomnia investigation. Among them is a sophisticated
bisexual (Cathrine Zeta Jones), a cynical dope (Owen Wilson) and a
gentle and emotional lady (Lily Taylor). Actually, the doctor is
researching the "primordial fear reaction" and intends to plant
disturbing ideas in his subjects and watch what happens. But he gets
unexpected help from the house itself.
It rumbles, hums and belches forth remarkable sights. Portals become
veiny stained-glass eyeballs. A fireplace guarded by stone lions gapes
like a sinister mouth. Filmy cherubic spirits take shape under sheets
and billowy curtains. But the computerized spooketeria rarely feels
real, placing an emotional wall between audience and screen. The
second half of the film is basically about the main heroine running
back and forth from the sinister lamps and evil furniture. Is that
exciting or what? The worst thing about it is that it didn't have to
be bad. It's based on a great book, ``The Haunting of Hill House,'' by
Shirley Jackson. A 1963 adaptation of the book was scary and
intelligent. It played with the greatest fears of our sub
conscience. "The Blair Witch Project", that cost less than an old car,
managed to shock and terrify the audiences from their senses. And with
a $70 mill. budget, De Bont and screenwriter David Self make hash out
of a perfectly lovely piece of terror. De Bont has a style of
filmmaking so out of line with the material that it is, in itself,
frightening. He is the master of the extravagant special effect and
the big visual adrenaline rush. But why give him a more serious
material? In the end "Haunting" will only haunt its fledgling studio
(Dream Works SKG) and De Bont's career as a director.
Yet it wouldn't be fair to say that everything is bad. The effects are
truly impressive and the house is wonderfully decorated -- beautiful,
mysterious, magical and spooky. But this is where the good things
end. The music is blaring, the floors moving, the ceiling morphing and
the pictures on the walls screaming -- and all of this, every second,
every moment of screen time, is absolutely without life. It's nothing
more than a special effects-extravaganza; visually impressive, but
intellectually hollow thriller that simply doesn't engage. At first
you do not know what's going on. Is this part of the experiment? Are
these hallucinations? Projections of the subconscience? Paranoia? But
in the end it shows out that this is actually happening. The house is
actually possessed. It is at that point when all your hopes for a good
entertainment disappears out of the window. For ever, I sat in
anticipation for a decent climax and that's what I got? I believe
Hichock once said that "it's better to wait for a climax, than to see
one". This may be true, and it might actually work, but there is only
one problem -- Jan De Bont is not Hichock and the things that he shows
are not scary, only stupid. They are impossible to take seriously. Any
paralells that you might have heard before, linking this picture to
Kubrick's "The Shining", are absolutely baseless. "Shining" had class,
style, story, acting, but most of all talent and
originality. "Haunting" has only special effects and art direction to
boast of. And those elements alone are not enough to make it a good
film. Casting good actors for small, pale parts only makes things
worse. But I guess that no matter what I or other critics say or
write, most of you will see this film anyway, even if the tagline
would say: "Some films are just born stupid".

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
CAST: John Cusack, Cameron Diaz, John Malkovich, Cathrine Keener, Charlie Cheen
Have you ever wanted to be someone else? How about..John Malcovich?
Well, maybe you can
Original. If I would choose one word to describe this film, I would
choose this one. I can guarantee you that you have never seen anything
like that before. Forget formulas, physics and scientific
discoveries. The world is not what it seems!
Craig (John Cusack) is a talented puppeteer, whose ingenious art is
uninteresting in the modern world. He lives in a small apartment with
his wife Lotte (Cameron Diaz), whose passion for animals invaded the
house. Unappreciated and ignored, Craig decides to switch professions
to make a living. He is then given the opportunity to work as a file
clerk in a Manhattan building. It should also be explained that the
floor of his office building is 7 1/2 . Squeezed in between the
seventh and eighth floors, it's only about 5 feet high, which means
everybody walks around stooped. This adds to the comic weirdness and
the disorientation that are the film's motor.  What follows is one of
film's trippiest pieces of surrealism. Once there, he discovers a
portal that literally sucks him into the mind of John Malkovich. For
brief, virtual-celebrity bursts, he takes in the universe through the
actor's eyes but only for 15 minutes, and then, for some reason, he
gets spit out onto the New Jersey Turnpike. Experience over. But these
15 minutes of borrowed celebrity are about to change his life,
especially when he finds he can repeat it at will by reentering the
portal. What clinches the arc of change is Craig sharing his discovery
with two women - his wife, and Maxine (Catherine Keener), who works in
an office down the hall and has caught Craig's eye. This unexpected
discovery gives them many interesting opportunities. When Maxine hears
about the portal, she manipulates Craig, using his feelings for her to
earn some money by selling trips into John Malkovich's head. In no
time, there's a never ending line of people who, unsure they'll ever
get their own 15 minutes of fame, are eager to pay to get inside
Malkovich...
And then of course the obvious question: Why Malcovich? Perhaps
because Malcovich is exactly that - a symbol of the American dream. A
common man that has made it to the top and thus stands for everything
that modern society requires - glamour, fame, money and automatically
happiness. But it doesn't really matter why exactly Malcovich. We're
all dying to be someone else.
Charlie Kaufman's screenplay is incredibly funny, a sort of modern
visualization of 'Alice in Wonderland' , cheerfully presenting the
universe as God's own pinball machine. But it is also filled with
global questions and heavy philosophy. Several very serious and
frightening themes are posed. Kaufman takes some satirical whacks at
celebrity worship and New Age self-absorption -- "Don't stand in the
way of my self-actualization as a man," Lotte tells Craig. A strange,
paranoiac reaction which occurred to Craig's wife after entering
Malcovich, pretty much the same experience as looking into multiple
mirrors. The film has layer upon layer of things to say about
identity, image, the cult of celebrity, appearance vs. reality, modes
of communication, mass entertainment, contemporary values,
manipulation and even the quest for eternal life. And love as a form
of insanity. It is a frightening tale about the loss of identity, as a
sacrifice to the American dream. We live in a world where everyone
struggle to become the ones that our society idolizes, downplaying the
individuality, until it completely disappears. A society where who you
are is never good enough, and you simply have to be someone else. The
obvious question is of course whether it make your life any
better. According to society it should. But will it?
John Cusack must certainly be one of the greatest actors of his
generation and Cameron Diaz is a funny choice as the sweet, but
physically unattractive Lotte. Cast against type in a completely
different and strange role, Diaz simply shines. Catherine Keener is
likewise a bold and successful choice, looking incredibly right for
the part. Yet, and I know that it sounds strange; it is John Malcovich
who is the star of this film. Playing with a sense of self-parody,
Malcovich portrays a version of John Malcovich that we all probably
imagine, a certain stereotype of a celebrity's life. There is no real
John Malcovich. He is just a vessel, a suit, a mask that anybody can
put on. For Malcovich as an actor this means that he has to copy the
other actors' interpretation of their characters. It seems so easy and
so believable that you never doubt the strange events unfolding before
your eyes. It is a completely different illustration, that makes an
incredible impact on the mind and soul. First-time director Spike
Jonze presents this absurd material in a muted, naturalistic visual
style - unhurried. And the idea of changing bodies becomes as common
as breathing. Look for several amusing cameo roles, such as Charlie
Sheen and Brad Pitt. The film is a hilarious comedy, a demanding
drama, a terrible tragedy. A philosophic, frighteningly prophetic
tale, a dark parody on society, a meditation on human nature. A film
that seems completely against the classic Hollywood entertainment
style and above the familiar 'copy-and-paste' traditions. In simple
words: this is by far one of the greatest achievements of the year and
one of the most original films of this decade.
JM Inc. has acquired the proprietary rights to a unique portal. By
traversing this portal into a ripe vessel body, you'll find yourself
briefly 'being' another person. As this other person you will
experience and enjoy their corporeal existence; some travelers have
even reported a limited ability to control the vessel body. At the
conclusion of your journey, you ejected from the vessel body. A JM
Inc. will be there to greet you and provide return
transportation. CALL NOW!!

Title
Review for Empire of the Sun (1987)
By making "The Color Purple", Spielberg proved that he was not just giant
sharks and aliens, but a universal director capable of creating serious and
sensual films. With "Empire of the Sun" Spielberg, for the first time in his
life, ventured into the world of war.
The film is based on the novel by J. G. Ballard , describing his own
experiences under World War 2, when he lost his parents and had to survive
under terrible surcomstances in a Japanese camp.
Jim (Christian Bale ) is living a privileged life with his parents in
pre-Pearl Harbor Shanghai. When the war begins, Jim and his parents are
separated, and Jim survives for weeks on his own, living of the food left in
his and his neighbors' abandoned mansions. Most of the film is set in the
Lunghua prison camp, where Jim is forced to grow up under horrible
circumstances. The 10 year-old child is standing on the brink of insanity
and some of the films strongest moments are when Jim tries to explain to
himself the meaningless situation around him, and how the insanity of war
affects him.
The unique thing about "Empire of the Sun" is it's point of view. It shows
us war through eyes of an innocent child, whose life is forever changed and
ruined. This unique perspective allows us to see war differently.
Tom Stoppard's script is deep and emotional, displaying Jim's life through
his own thoughts and feelings. At the same time the historical parts are not
forgotten. There are a lot of philosophical questions and moral dilemmas
that question the essence of war.
"Empire of the Sun" has the largest British cast ever assebled for an
American movie. For Jim, Steven Spielberg deliberately chose an actor that
was totally unfamiliar to the audience - Christian Bale. Bale's performance
in the film brought me to tears. It is not often you see a little boy act
with such power, vulnerability and total understanding of his character.
Bale delivers without a doubt the strongest performance in the film. The
rest of the cast is solid and believable. Involving John Malcowich as Basie,
a survivor, an intelligent crock that pretends to be Jim's friend when he
can gain from it.  John Malcowich manages to create a believable character
that is a bit alike Danny Glover's character in "The Color Purple" - selfish
and unreliable, but never quite evil.
Joe Pentaliano is convincing as Basie's buddy and Nigel Havers is strong and
understanding as Dr.Rowlings, who becomes like a father figure for Jim.
But Spielberg has not forgot the Japaneese. A Japanese boy that becomes
Jim's distant friend on the other side of the fence, is extremely important
to the story. They save each other in several life threatening situations.
This relationship is suddenly ended when the boy is shot by one of Basie's
friends. When Jim cries out: "He was my friend..he gave me a mango", Basie
replays: "He was only a Jap". Spielberg does not show the Japanese as
cold-hearted bastards, but as human beings like Jim and the rest of the
prisoners.
Most of all,  "Empire of the Sun" is an tremendously emotional experience
about childhood lost in the horrors and insanity of war. Some scenes are
directed with such beauty and sadness, that it moved me like few films had
before.
Who will forget the panic in the streets of Shanghai at the beginning of
Japanese invasion. The frightening contrast between Englishmen driving in
their limousines to a party and thousands of Chinese desperately trying to
get out of Shanghai alive. Who will forget Spielberg's artistic and visually
stunning picturisation of the atom bomb. After the bomb goes off, the sky is
filled with blue and white waves, so you can't see where the sea ends and
the heaven begins. And while Jim's face is blinded with the white light, he
whispers: "..like God taking a photograph". In both of these scenes and many
more throughout the movie, Spielberg shows us that he is a master of
contrasts, combining mortal danger with visual beauty.
Combining a serious plot with incredible visuals, including wonderful
cinematography by Allen Daviau , wonderful art direction by Frederick Hole
and incredibly emotional musical score by John Williams, Spielberg has
created one of the most unique and heartbreaking war films.
The only problem with "Empire of the Sun" is that it begins to falter in
the middle, where Jim is in the camp. Where it seems Spielberg lost his
focus for a moment, not knowing what to show first or how to show it.
Although this mistake could have been overseen and forgotten, because of the
overall perfection of the film, "Empire of the Sun" has been underrated,
receiving unfairly criticism for being too pompous.
Finally, the war ends, and Jim is reunited with his parents under the
shadow of nascent Chinese communism. Much of what Jim experiences is
shocking, and Spielberg neither embellishes nor understates Jim's
experiences. Flies, death, and decomposition are everywhere, as are avarice
and (occasionally) kindness. The film has a strong grounding in World War II
and war history. I think that many  people lack such knowledge, and it is my
hope that films like "Empire of the Sun", "Schindler's List" and "Saving
Private Ryan" will make these people understand the meaning of war.

Title
Review for Messenger: The Story of Joan of Arc, The (1999)
MPAA: Rated R for strong graphic battles, a rape and some language.
Runtime: France:160
An energetic, visually stunning, but intellectually hollow recreation
of the mysterious life of Jeanne D'Arc.
In history Jeanne D'Arc is lost in an ocean of mystery and
controversy, which creates the perfect launching pad for talented and
creative directors, who can basically alter the story as they
wish. She came in a time where people desperately needed a saint. A
hero that could rescue them for misery and deliver peace and
happiness. Director/writer Luc Besson ('Nikita', 'Leon') portrays his
version of the peasant girl who commanded the armies of France and was
burned at the stake for witchcraft. Besson tries to recreate the
person behind the legend. He tries not to show her as a saint or a
villain. He shows her as a human being. In a time where blood was
almost pouring from the sky, and the air smelled of rotten flesh, it
is hard to keep your sanity. The only support and hope is in God. At
the age of 13, Jeanne (Milla Jovovich ) watches her own sister
murdered and raped by the English soldiers. This terrible event makes
a lasting impact on Jeanne's mind. God is no longer her support. He
has become her obsession. She starts seeing visions and signs that
command her to raise an army and free France from the siege of the
English tyranny. With the help of the wise Yolande D'Aragon (Faye
Dunaway ) and Charles VII (John Malcovich), whose grand royal
ambitions and life are at stake, Jeanne raises an army and marches
towards the English walls. After this the film stays mostly on the
battlefield, where Besson demonstrates his ability to direct amazing
action sequences, only occasionally resorting to a calmer tempo. The
movie is filled with dreamy, symbolic images of pure artistic
craftsmanship, that create a surreal and occasionally paranoiac
atmosphere. The film is lost in time and space, hysterically jumping
back and forth in Jeanne's thoughts, imagination and
conscience. Besson's visual style permits the audience to enter the
medieval age, feel the smell of fresh blood and the adrenaline pumping
in your body in the heat of battle.
But the film is far from being flawless. The script needs a lot of
polishing. Except for Jeanne, there are no real characters. And
although a grand star cast is assembled, their characters are nothing
more than props, not more alive than the costumes that they are
wearing. As for the Maiden of Lorraine herself, she is portrayed as a
simple girl, too small for her divine task. In the latter part of the
film, we see her as hysterical, confused and on the brink of madness,
with her past purity and innocence for ever lost. Jovovich handles the
part with more panache than one might expect. But though her screen
time is incredible excessive, both Malcovich ('Being John Malcovich')
and Dunaway ('Titus') surpass her rather overacted and simply
unprofessional performance. And even Hoffman manages to breathe some
life into his dreadfully small part. Besides casting Jovovich,
Besson's only mistake is his extreme sense of patriotism that in the
end ruins his so gloriously crafted painting. There are some viscously
evil Englishmen that murder, pillage and betray with a smile on their
faces. And some incredibly brave and noble Frenchmen, represented by
the "three musketeers" of this story -- the brave Gilles de Rais
(Vincent Cassel), the wise Aulon (Desmond Harrington) and the strong
La Hire (Richard Ridings). Though all those actor perform well, their
characters are nothing more than symbols -- banners that proclaim the
glory of France. And thus, there is no sense of realism in this
film. 'The Messenger' has muscles instead of brains. There is some
relief in the end, where Besson lays down his armor and starts
thinking. Dustin Hoffman's appearance helps and the film ends
elegantly and surprisingly effective with a climax worthy of
praise. Jeanne's character is unlocked, but whether God was in the
picture or not, is never quite explained. Was she a confused peasant
girl driven by her own hunger for revenge? Or was she truly a
messenger of God? The film poses as many questions as answers and
nothing is completely obvious. Bess o Messenger' is nothing more than
a fairly good film. It is not much that you remember of it after you
leave the theater. Maybe the sound, the dreamy sequences, but
certainly not the dialogue. It is an elegant and adrenaline pumping
history lesson for the MTV-generation, that although presents some
interesting material, works better when it's on the battlefield.

Title
Review for Astronaut's Wife, The (1999)
DIRECTED BY: Rand Ravich
WRITTEN BY: Rand Ravich
CAST: Charlize Theron, Johnny Depp, Joe Morton, Joe Morton, Joe Morton
The film is as good as or better than the average Hollywood
release. It's scary. It's well-acted. It's filmed with a degree of
flash and elegance -- chilly, muted, symbolic and refreshingly free
from cheap shocks. It is a stylish and feverishly beautiful
psychological thriller with several interesting science fiction
elements.
Commander Spencer Armacost and his wife Jillian (Depp and Theron) are
an extraordinarily close and happy couple, until something goes wrong
during what should have been a routine shuttle mission. NASA
mysteriously loses contact with Armacost and his co-pilot, Captain
Alex Streck (Nick Cassavettes) for a full two minutes, and when the
shuttle is brought down both men are unconscious. Armacaost appears
unhurt, but Streck has suffered a heart attack and later dies under
disturbing circumstances. The whole business leaves Jillian, who has a
troubling history of mental unbalance, in an emotionally fragile
state, as does Armacost's uncharacteristic decision to retire from
flying and take an executive position at a New York City-based
aerospace company. Already feeling isolated and lonely, Jillian then
learns that she's pregnant. Is her increasing conviction that her
husband isn't the man he used to be a matter of hormonal swings and
stress-induced paranoia, or did something unimaginably awful happen to
Armacost out in the cold void of space?
This is an analogy to Roman Polanski's horror classic "Rosemary's
Baby", and director Rand Ravich directs pretty much in the same
fashion, where the most important element is the surrealism -- you'll
be walking along side the main characters on the blurry line between
dream and reality. The symbolism is thick and heavy, with multiple
references to dual identities and insensitive husbands. The film is
also incredibly beautiful. Its graceful cinematography, its flashy
editing and haunting musical score are all part of a wonderfully rich
atmosphere.
The two leads are both extraordinary and both at their right
place. Johnny Depp is convincing both as the "true American hero" at
the beginning and as the mysterious entity after the "accident". He is
capable of hiding the beast within. Charlize Theron is likewise
incredible. The enormous emotional core of the script is challenging
and requires a very serious, talented actress. Theron is obviously up
to it. The character reminds us about Mia Farrow's ("Rosemary's
Baby")character with the same haircut and problems -- she gets
pregnant with twins and begins to wonder what exactly she is
carrying. Unfortunately Ravich didn't take her far enough from her
previous film and it looks like she's still playing the role of Keanu
Reeve's wife in "The Devil's Advocate."
It's very artistic, very stylish, but regrettably also rather
stereotypical. For most of the time the film is feverishly interesting
because nothing is kept too obvious. Everything is raptured in
mystery, which makes it completely unpredictable. By the end of the
film, when it's time for dazzling the audience with a worthy ending,
the director changes his rhythm and selects the most primitive and
disappointing resolution of all -- the typical Hollywood brain-killer,
reminding about the infinite "X-Files"-episodes -- deluding,
mysterious and very primitive underneath. Absolutely nothing is
explained. What did the alien intelligence actually want? What is
their objective? What actually happened? You almost expect "TO BE
CONTINUED.." to appear on the ending credits. This is truly a fatal
error that creates a rather anticlimactic atmosphere. But even though
it happens at the very end, and everything else is almost flawless,
it's hard to enjoy the film after watching it through. And it doesn't
hold anything of special interest to watch it twice. It's certainly
better than the average science fiction cliché released every year,
but hardly anything else.

Title
Review for A.I. Artificial Intelligence (2001)
-------------------------------
Written and Directed by Steven Spielberg
Produced by Stanley Kubrick, Kathleen Kennedy, Bonnie Curtis
Starring: Haley Joel Osmont, Jude Law, Frances O'Connor, William Hurt
Rated PG-13 for some sexual content and violent images
-------------------------------
"Artificial Intelligence" is one of the most anticipated and awaited movies of
the year -- a project that Steven Spileberg and Stanley Kubrick have talked
about for years - polished and developed for a decade, a project they wanted to
make together. When Kubrick died in 1999, Spielberg decided to continue on his
own. And in a way creating a memorial, a loving tribute, a celebration of his
friend, which will remain in the endless ocean of motion pictures for ever. 
Rumors and expectations haunted its production. Spielberg's and Kubrick's
directorial styles were so different and their visions so diverse that a
collaboration between the two seemed preposterous. At the same time the
expectations were tremendous, the skepticism enormous and the result is truly
the most wonderful surprise of the year. Many have already written about this
film, that is  only pretending to be intelligent, while in reality it's
artificial, pointing on the rapidly sinking numbers at the box-office as proof
of that. Wrong! Infact the split in the public opinions and reviews is the first
sign of originality and a unique vision - the very quality that all
Kubrick-films possessed. This a bold film that isn't looking to please the
popcorn-audience, expecting light, brainless entertainment. This is not
"Jurassic Park 3" and this is not "Fast and Furious". This is a work of art, a
clash of Titans, a collaboration between the greatest film directors of our
time, a combination of Kubrick's cold, razor-sharp intelligence and Spielberg's
warmth, hope and innocence, which makes "A.I." a unique and fascinating
tour-de-force that is unlike anything you have seen and will see in the
future.
The story is as complex as it is imaginative and original. It begins with a
haunting prologue that transports us into a new and unknown world of the future.
The poles have melted, leaving many cities under the raging billows of the
ocean. The recourses are low and everything is rationed -- including children,
because of an increasingly threatening overpopulation. It is in this dark world,
where the more "correct" robots are taking over human jobs and where parents are
struggling for children-licensees, that professor Allen Hobby (the Gepetto and
Dr. Frankenstein in the story) proposes to build a robot-child that will love
the many childless couples. Twenty months later Monica (Frances O'Connor) and
Henry (Sam Robarts) (whose only son, Martin (Jake Thomas), lies frozen in a
coma) receive David - the first "mecha" capable to love and dream. At first
Monica is repelled by David (Haley Joel Osmont). Mr. Osment uses his wide blue
eyes and ingratiating smile to suggest the uncanny creepiness of a living doll,
and the film plays cleverly with the monstrous implications of its conceit. The
fantasy that humans' replicas of themselves will come to life is more often than
not - in the medieval legend of the golem, in Mary Shelley's "Frankenstein" - a
source of terror and anxiety. Fear is the underside of enchantment, and the
spell of wonder "A.I." casts is tinged with dread. This is the beginning of the
first act. This spooky mood only deepens when Monica activates David's
imprinting function, that will make him love her unconditionally and eternally.
His absolute and unwavering adoration is both heart-rending and chilling (the
way Osmont utters the word "mommy" is one of the most powerful and controversial
moments in the film). But is it true love or is it the program? Is he real or is
he not? The eternal questions that Monica is constantly asking herself, unable
to solve them. But then, by a strange twist of fate, Martin wakes up and comes
home. David is gradually forgotten as the return of the "real" son excites the
parents, and though Monika tries to offer equal attention, it's obvious where
her true feelings lie. Martin is cruel and provocative, constantly taking
advantage of David, who only wants Monika to love him. Things start happening to
David as he tries to compete for love, tries to fit in, to be real, to be human,
but he can't. Henry becomes worried and even afraid of David, saying that "If
David was programmed to love, why not assume that he knows how to hate". David
reads "Pinocchio" and thinks that somewhere out there there's a "Blue Fairy"
that can transform him into a real boy. Suddenly the mood shifts abruptly - and
the picture becomes dreamier, funnier and intellectually riskier - when David is
abandoned, along with his cybernetic teddy bear (with the voice of Jack Angel),
in a dark forest. The dark, delirious second hour is a neon-lit nightmare
odyssey in which the boy and his new friend, Gigolo Joe (Jude Law) - a sex-slave
mecha, programmed to pleasure women-must fight for survival in a world full of
robot-hating humans. While David represents Spielberg's warmth, love and
passion, Gigolo Joe (the Fox in this story) is clearly a character from
Kubrick's cold, "motherless" world of decay and dehumanization. And like
Spielberg and Kubrick, David and Joe too hold hands and help each other on their
risky and unknown quest. Obsessed with the Pinocchio fable, David is convinced
that he can be magically transformed into a real boy, and that once he is, he'll
regain the love of his lost mother.
The wonderfully complex screenplay, which is Spielberg's first since "Close
Encounters of the Third Kind" (1977) is an ingeniously crafted web of twists,
turns and parallels to children's stories and fairytales with nightmarish,
frightening undercurrents. It becomes an odyssey for humanity, a "Wizard of
Oz"-quest of finally coming home, a "Pinocchio"-fable of becoming a real boy.
The tragedy is of course that we know that David will never find his Blue Fairy,
that he will never become a real boy, but he does not.
Mirroring "Pinocchio" in form, "A.I." (like all Kubrick-films) poses grand
questions and wrestles with problems of eternity: What does it mean to be human?
What makes us human? If a machine thinks like us, looks like us and feels like
us, would we care if it's not "real"? Would we accept it? Is it possible to
become human? Where can we draw the line between programmed emotions and
thoughts and the real ones? Or perhaps in an inhuman world, David is the only
true human? At the same time "A.I." displays the incredible responsibility that
we have for our creations. This film has enough in it to start a never ending
debate, to fill countless volumes. It is also incredibly risky, since Spielberg
expects us to invest our emotions into a machine. And in a way the audience is
part of a very interesting experiment -- expected to answer the very question
that is the core of this picture: If a machine can love, can we love it in
return?
There are not many directors alive that can create a "Kubrick-feeling", which is
absolutely unique. There are some that can copy it, but no one can actually make
it real, make it genuine. Spielberg can. "A.I." bears the mark of true greatness
and portraying sides that we didn't imagine Spielberg possessed. With this film
he enters a completely new and unfamiliar territory that will probably forever
change the way we look at him. Visually and in terms of atmosphere and pace -
it's all Kubrick. The cinematography, the dolly-shots, the careful editing, but
Spielberg's warmth and humanity shines clearly through this icy surface. In a
way "A.I." is an incredible film that combines the very best elements of the two
greatest directors of all time. The cool intelligence, darkness of human nature
and the hope about a better world. Earth is a dark, unfriendly place, reflecting
Kubrick's cynical disbelief in the future. And like all Kubrick-films it's
completely unpredictable, filled with reverting story-turns and character
surprises. The atmosphere echoes Kubrick - mysterious and spooky, an obsessive
tuning that hypnotizes you and though it's difficult to watch at times, you
can't move. "A.I." is immensely complex and presents an entire web of moral
dilemmas, and there are moments where story doesn't entirely compute at times,
but even those moments shine with greatness. At times it's creepy, even
frightening, as if come from "The Shining". There are moments of wonder of the
unknown that can be found in "2001", a murky, dehumanized world from "A
Clockwork Orange" and the warmth and heart that rings of "E.T." and "Close
Encounters of the Third Kind". Nightmares and dreams, shadows and light,
intelligence and heartfelt emotions - "A.I." has it all! It is haunting and
surreal, moving and beautiful. 
The technical side of it is beyond any praise. It seems that Spielberg's well
known crew has pushed the limits in creating a loving memory of Stanley Kubrick
- a legacy, if you will, of love. "A.I." features some of the greatest special
effects since "Jurassic Park" and a visual perfection that only Kubrick could
boast of. Rick Carter's beautiful art direction, somehow reminiscent of "A
Clockwork Orange" and "2001", Janusz Kaminski's incredible cinematography, which
cleverly adapts Kubrick's visual style with backlighting, bright whites and the
curiously evocative visible beams of flashlights, Michael Kahn's dreamy editing,
and of course John Williams' beautiful and strangely distant and modernistic
score that is more subtle and eerie than anything he has ever done before.
Spielberg (following Kubrick) forms the dialogues and the acting to fit and
underscore the atmosphere, rather than to propel the story forward, which is
something that lets you truly sink into this strange and alien world. It's when
all those elements are combined when you get the powerful effect that "A.I."
inflicts.
And of course Haley Joel Osmont - an actor in the true sense of the word and an
artist of his craft that is already above some Hollywood-veterans. At age 12, he
is here expected not only to carry an entire film on his shoulders, but to
explore into the darkest, nastiest depths of human condition. He is sensational.
His evolution from a machine to a "boy", who we truly can love is so graceful,
so elegant and so real, that it would take more than an Oscar-nomination to
honor it. Of course he has an impressive supporting cast. Jude Law is wonderful
- looking and acting like a "ladies' dream", he sprays enough color and zest
into his character to dazzle us, walking on a very thin line between funny and
creepy. William Hurt is truly at his place in one of his best roles since
"Broadcast News" (1987). Frances O'Connor is also interesting as Monica -
David's "mother", who plays in the same vein as most of Kubrick's female
characters, which are hysterical, insecure, but good-hearted and loving (Shelley
Duvall's Wendy in "The Shining" is the perfect example). Spielberg brings also
back his longtime friends like Ben Kingsley, Robin Williams and Meryl Streep as
voices behind the screen.
The third act is dark, terrifying and tragic, with no apparent hope for the
future, which is probably where Kubrick would have cut his production. But in
doing so he would have missed a beautiful and slightly ironic ending that is
Spielberg through and through, which truly adds a new dimension to the movie. He
would have missed that compassion and the love, and humanity - the heart, which
Spielberg always had and which is truly what makes us human. Spielberg is the
golden glow at the end of Kubrick's dark, icy, nightmarish tunnel. It's
beautiful, provoking, frustrating, exhilarating, magical, dark, mesmerizing,
mysterious... I can't wait to see it again!

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
RATING: 10/10 - ALTERNATIVE RATING: A
"On October 21, 1994, Heather Donahue, Joshua Leonard, and Michael Williams
hiked into the Black Hills Forest to shoot a documentary film on a local
legend called 'The Blair Witch,' and were never seen again. One year later,
their footage was found."
This is the beginning of one of the greatest achievements in the horror
genre and a wonderful step away from the well known blood-and-gut-clishes.
'Blair Witch' set a box office record of having the highest profits per
screen than any film has had before (Previous holder was Star Wars Episode
1).  While all good sense suggests that only an experienced and acclaimed
director would venture into something as controversial and original, this is
not the case. This instant classic is created by two totally unknown
directors and three unknown actors, sculptured from a $20.000 budget.
What follows the chilling prologue, is the footage that was ultimately found
in the forest, meticulously edited together from the 16mm and video formats
they used to shoot it on. Set up as a sort of pseudo-documentary about three
high school teens that venture into the woods to visit the sites of certain
grisly events.What starts as a fun outing in the woods, turns into hell.
Before long, they get the sense that someone or something is playing games
with them. And when their map disappears and their compass stops working,
panic sets in...
"The Blair Witch Project" works, not only because of its original and unique
style of production, but because the three central actors create believable,
authentic characters. Acting is on a totally different level, than you get
used to after watching too many "Scream"- features. Their entirely
believable performances which, for the most part, were improvised for the
eight days they spent in the woods, are mind-blowing, to say the least. This
combination of incredible acting and superior production design, create an
incredible realistic effect. While watching the film, not for a single
moment will you doubt in the authenticity of characters and events
displayed.
There is no severed limbs or flowing blood in 'Blair Witch', which plays on
a much higher intellectual level than most of the films in its genre.
Although the film is made as a bad homemade movie, it reveals a lot of
information, without seeming to.  It's beautifully directed as it shifts
from terror and panic to plain old apathy and flat out exhaustion. And again
resuming that high level of panic, as the characters realize that it is the
end, wonderfully displaying a very natural psychological evolution of
characters.
As Heather, as well as Michael and Joshua, slowly break down, becoming
vulnerable and beyond frightened, they have nothing to do but pray that they
will make their way out of the seemingly endless wilderness alive. In a late
scene, filled with and incredible power and truthfulness, Heather, centering
the camera directly on her right eye and nose, pours all of her emotions
out, confessing to the faults of her own life, apologizing to her family,
her comrades' families, her friends, and finally, making peace with herself.
There are times when there is nothing but a black screen, and all we can do
is listen to their scared voices and the unexplained noises going on around
them. The true horror behind this film is the unknown, and those dark places
where you know something is lurking.
The witch is never actually shown. This mystic creature somehow represents
all our fears for the unknown. It may be a frightening story we might have
heard and remembered, a UFO we think we have seen or something else -
personal and intimate. As any little kid knows, it is the noise in the dark
that is scarier than whatever is really out there making the noise.  The
human mind can imagine more in any given point in time than anyone could
ever put on screen.
'The Blair Witch Project' doesn't need any digital monsters or special
effects. This movie taps into the raw nerves of basic emotional
response.(One of the reasons "Deep Blue Sea" never achieved the high
professionalism of "Jaws"). The film is frightening because every audience
member relives his deepest fears once again while watching it.
Whether this film has lived up to its hype, you can judge for yourself, but
one fact remains: Eduardo Sánchez (II) and Daniel Myrick have created an
instant classic and certainly one of the most ambitious and interesting
films of the year.
Written by Alex Ioshpe 

Title
Review for 28 Days (2000)
DIRECTED BY: Betty Thomas
WRITTEN BY: Susannah Grant
CAST: Sandra Bullock, Domenic West, Elizabeth Perkins, Steve Buscemi
MPAA: Rated PG-13 for mature thematic elements involving substance abuse, language and some sensuality.
RUNTIME: USA:103
"Alcohol and drugs = bad. Not alcohol and drugs = good. Got it?" 
Just when you though you've seen enough of brave young women dealing
with their personal problems on screen, be that insanity or
alcoholism, Hollywood releases yet another one of those 'deep,
emotional stories about finding yourself'..
'28 Days' is practically a visualization of the usual 'meaningful'
true stories that people are so proudly retelling at
AA-meetings. Gwennie (Sandra Bullock) is a young woman who drowned her
problems in alcohol. For her life was a big party, with no beginning
and no end. This behavior has of course estranged her from her only
sister and from life itself. Her existence is filled with endless
parties and comic episodes. Such as when she got drunk with boyfriend
Jasper (Dominic West), borrowed her sister's (Elizabeth Perkins )
wedding limo and crashed it into someone's house. This time she had to
pay with a 28 day stay in court-ordered rehab. Here she must realize
that the only thing that can save her is her is redemption, willpower
and commitment. Most important she must realize her place and
direction in life and understand that her life is not just a big
party.
The film itself feels like a rehab program, whining and moaning about
things that have been said and written a million times. It is a
classic cautionary tale. An echo. A big, fat and expensive cliché. A
shadow of last year's 'Girl, Interrupted', which likewise followed in
the footsteps of great masterpieces like 'The Cuckoo's Nest' and
'Trainspotting'. Director Betty Thomas has stuffed her film with so
many failures and errors, that it is impossible to sum them all up in
one review. For some paranoid reason she decided to make her film a
drama/comedy. Jokes and funny characters almost deliberately delude
you from the really important and complex issues: alienation, despair,
terror, confusion, loneliness. And what awesome power and strength of
character it actually takes to overcome all that and become
clean. Isn't that what the filmmakers wanted to show in the first
place? Even the transition process itself seems like a walk in the
park. Betty Thomas' idea of hell is a cozy, homey place where happy
alcoholics and cheerful drug addicts are not allowed to smoke, drink
or watch TV after 11. It is simply too light, simplified and
unnecessary sweet to be taken seriously. But the worst thing about it
is that it actually thinks that it is saying something of
significance. That it actually tries to educate the audience with its
extremely predictable and primitive story. "All you need to do is just
say no", says Dr.Cornell (Steve Buscemi) as if was the revelation of
the century. And that's how simple it is! In fact I would rather watch
'Lost in Space' once again, than return to '28 Days' .
As for acting, it's acceptable, but hardly anything else. For Sandra
Bullock it's an opportunity to demonstrate that she is capable of more
than 'Speed'. She handles her part with a surprising professionalism
and ease that certainly saves the film from being a complete
flop. Dominic West shines as the source of Gwenie's devilish
temptations, but Elizabeth Perkins' and Steve Buscemi's great talents
are wasted on unnoticeable and shallow characters. Although
intellectually 'Girl, Interrupted' was a greater achievement, '28
Days' is superior in its visual aspect. There are some nice flash back
sequences and occasionally impressive pacing, but the overall
technical aspect of this film is on the ground floor. The most
important thing is that we've seen it before and it was a lot
better. 'Clean and Sober', 'Only When I Laugh', 'When A Man Loves A
Woman' , 'Leaving Las Vegas' and many other stronger films were made
about the same issues. So what's the point? In other words '28 Days'
doesn't contribute to the moviemaking business on any level. If you're
caught in a snowstorm or bolts of lightning fall from the sky and
you're standing in front of the movie theatre, you might as well go in
and watch '28 Days' . Under all other circumstances stay away, because
this film equals $8 and 103 minutes lost.

Title
Review for Cube (1997)
MPAA: Rated R for some strong sci-fi violence/gore and language 
Runtime: Canada:90 / UK:87 / France:86 / Japan:91 
Directed by: Vincenzo Natali 
Screenplay: Gerami Manson, Andre Bijelich and Vincenzo Natali 
Cast: Nicole De Boer, Nicky Guadagni, David Hawlet, Andrew Miller, Julian Richings, Raine Robson, Maurice Dean Wint 
Six persons: a police officer, an escape artist, a doctor, a math -
genius, an engineer and a mentally demented boy, wake up inside a
giant, mysterious complex. None of them remember how they got there or
where they are. There is no food or water, no reason, logic or
explanations. Instinctively they try to explore the structure, but
soon find out that it is a Rubik's Cube-like prison. A complex of some
17,000 interconnected, perfectly square equal cells, filled with
traps, deadly ways and dangerous paths. And so the increasingly
paranoid prisoners must co-operate, using their different abilities,
moving from block to block in order to reach the surface. What is the
purpose of this? Is somebody watching them? Meanwhile their strength
is running out and their minds start changing...
The first-time director Vincenzo Natali creates an incredible
atmosphere. Claustrophobic and nerve-wracking. Shocking and
original. The feeling of being trapped, isolated and slowly going
paranoid has rarely been manipulated so well as in this movie. The
film slowly transforms into a terrifying psyho-thriller, where the
humanistic attitude is lost in the harsh competition for
survival. Slowly you see how these normal people change into
--->animals. Their minds become more frightening than the horrible
traps around them. The characters and the situation itself are so
primal, so grounded and basic that it momentary connects with the
audience. There is something indescribably frightening about such
simplicity. It effectively dismisses all unnecessary technical and
scientific details and concentrates on the most important -- the human
elements, an issue almost forgotten by sci-fi directors of today. We
can literally dive into people, exploring their complex
characters. Important philosophical, ethical and moral issues are
raised.
No unnecessary characters or scenes delude you from the purpose. There
are only six people and the only scene is the cube. The characters
undergo an evolution that has rarely been captured on film. The
psychological aspect of this film is unusually complex and incredibly
effective. The audience knows as much as the characters, desperately
trying to figure out the purpose of their situation and a way out of
it. Is it a governmental experiment? Aliens? A sick joke? Virtual
reality? The aspect of time disappears completely and after a while
you won't remember what your past world looks like. For you there is
nothing except the cube. Outside of it -- nothing exists. Maybe there
is no point in escaping? Maybe it is impossible? Maybe there will be
nothing outside the cube?
The ending is as mysterious and original as the rest of the film, and
(unlike in most science fiction films) it doesn't alienate it from the
rest of the picture, making it look primitive (such as in 'Dark City'
and '13th Floor'). Nothing is obvious. Nothing is primitive. Nothing
is conventional. And all you can do is presume and guess. In the
beginning the performances may seem a bit flawed, but they quickly
recover and by the end of this film nobody questions their
authenticity. Diana Magnus' fascinating art direction is an incredible
achievement. The sets are complex, strange and yet completely
convincing. The rest of the team handles the job well, though not
quite award worthy. In the end it is Natali who deserves all the
credit for his dark, unpleasant vision.
'Cube' is a story about ordinary people and products of our safe,
protected society that are suddenly transferred to a place where
everything is unknown, where nothing is safe or obvious, where no one
except themselves can protect them. And here, where only the strongest
survives, the makeup is gone, the mask slips off and the true, pure,
savage human nature is revealed. It is a story about the ways of
science seen from a lab-rat's eyes. And here the cube is a symbol of
science itself -- cruel, and too complex and powerful for our own
meaningless stupidity. The film is a representation of the human being
-- the specter of emotions, an analysis of the human mind and human
nature. Natali has created a brilliant and original psycho - analytic
tale that is probably one of the greatest science fiction films that
hit the silver screen during this decade.

Title
Review for Rules of Engagement (2000)
DIRECTED BY: William Friedkin
WRITTEN BY: James Webb and Stephen Gaghan
CAST: Samuel L. Jackson, Ben Kingsley, Tommy Lee Jones, Guy Pearce
MPAA: Rated R for scenes of war violence, and for language.
Runtime: USA:128
As we see the terrible events that unfold before our eyes in the
Middle East at the moment, Hollywood doesn't loose the oppertunity to
get involved, by telling stories and expressing opinions.
This film centers on a relationship forged throughout the adult
lifetimes of two Marine colonels, Hays Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones) and
Terry Childers (Samuel L. Jackson). They fought side by side in
Vietnam, where Childers saved Hodges' life by shooting an unarmed
POW. That's against the rules of war but understandable, in this story
anyway, under the specific circumstances. Certainly Hodges is not
complaining. Years pass. Hodges, whose wounds make him unfit for
action, gets a law degree and becomes a Marine lawyer. Childers, is
now a respected and much-decorated hero that has served his country
with his life and sould. Because of his excellent record, Childers is
sent to Yemen to rescue the American ambassador (Ben Kingsley),
cowering in the embassy under assault from violent demonstrators and
snipers blasting from rooftops. Childers does what he has to do:
evacuate the family and protect the men under his command. After three
Marines die and the colonel thinks he sees ground fire, he orders his
troops to shoot into the firing crowd. More than 80 Yemeni men, women,
and children are mowed down. Childers is immediately accused of
ordering his men to fire on a crowd and murder of unarmed
civilians. He persuades his old friend Hodges to represent him in the
courtroom drama that occupies the second half of the film. Did
Childers violate authorized U.S. military rules of engagement? Or are
there simply no rules in war?
The answers to these stereotypical questions are obvious, but the
inconsistent plot immediately raises all sorts of other questions. The
murder of 83 "innocent civilians" has to result into something greater
than a simple trial in the U.S. Where is the accusations from the Arab
leaders? Where is the U.N.? The film ends without even telling the
most interesting story: what happens on the international arena?
This film (in a way akin to films such as "A Few Good Men") has
already been accused of breaking the rules of morality and ethics and
even of racism. These accusations are pretty heavy, but also
unfair. What director William Friedklin truly broke was the rules of
decent filmmaking. One of the earliest apparent problems with 'Rules
of Engagement' is its lack of credibility. The entire operation in
Yemen may remind us about what happens in the Middle East right now,
but is overdone, contrived and unrealistic - as if a chain of events
had to happen in a particular manner in order for the plot to
proceed. A lot of it is so cheesy that no one could possibly accept it
as reality. That is precisely why it's not offensive. It is completely
unobjective. Many stories are started and never finished. Many
questions are asked, but never answered. A lot of parallels are
referring to nothing. It seems that neither the director, producers or
the screenwriter can make up their minds about the contents of their
film. Is it about Arab mentality? America's foreign policies?
America's role in the world? Corruption in the higher circles? It goes
on and on. It consists of countless stories, but not a definable
plot. It tries to be everything for everyone and ends up being nothing
for no one.
I think that it is ironic, because director William Friedkin's
probably most acclaimed film was "The Exorcist" which had a silly
story, but became a rather effective film. In this case you have a
strong story with many possibilities and the result is a silly
film. Though several scenes bare the mark of professionalism (such as
the impressive battle scenes), his latest film does simply not
engage. I believe that Friedklin is a director that is absolutely
depended on great scripts and talented producers in order to
succeed. It's obvious that he has neither and the result is therefore
a catastrophe. The characters feel designed, unreal, merely shadows,
with no life outside the conflict. Even the actors can not save this
film from going under. Though both Jackson and Jones act admirably,
with performances that are as good as you get with a script like this,
it is not something that these great actors can boast of. They have
roles that they could play blindfolded with their hand on the
back. Jackson is gray and Jones uninteresting. The rest of the cast,
including Ben Kingsly, Blair Underwood and Guy Pearce are simply
waiting for their paychecks.
The time has come for the verdict. On the charges of complete lack of
objectivity, I find this film guilty. On the charges of breaking the
rules of reasonable filmmaking, I find it guilty. But on the charges
of racism I find this film not guilty, because of it's inconclusive
and often silly plot that lacks objectivity everywhere, not only when
concerning the Arab population. I must admit that the film is
dangerously near the line of being racially offensive and I do think
that screenwriter Stephen Gaghan went a bit too far, portraying the
Yemeni people almost as stereotypical Hollywood bad-guys. This is very
sad, since in a time like this it is crucial to not lose objectivity
and proclaim the truth. However, it is absolutely necessary to
remember that the Muslim terrorists are responsible for most of the
terrorist activity in and outside the United States. And that it's not
a coincidence that U.S. residents in the Middle East, including Yemen
are on constant maximum alert.

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
After 20 years of hope and pleading, George Lucas finely directs a prequel
in the Star Wars-saga. Visually mesmerizing it is also extremely flawed as
it displays the magnificence of modern special effects and the simplicity of
modern storytelling.
As imminent conflict brews between the powerful Trade Federation and the
peaceful planet of Naboo, Jedi Master Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and his
apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) travel to Naboo to warn the Queen
(Natalie Portman) of the galactic fallout which is to follow. Eventually,
Naboo is invaded forcing the Jedis to evacuate the planet with the Queen and
her court. They travel to the desert planet of Tatooine where they meet a
slave boy called Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd (I) ) who is evidently one
with the Force. They enlist his help in fighting the war, while the Jedis
confront one of the Dark Jedis behind the invasion, Darth Maul, while his
master Darth Sidious (who by the way is the corrupted, but respectable
senator of Naboo) continues to lead the invasion as a mysterious "phantom"
behind the scenes.
Because of the high expectations the film may be a disappointment to the
die-hard-Star-Wars-fans.
The major difference between "Episode 1" and "Episode IV" is that the first
film had a fresh plot and was as original as entertaining. This plot was
supported by special effects. In "Episode 1" it is vice versa. Here the
special effects are supported by a story. At times the film looks more like
a demonstration of visual effects (as the unnecessary pod-race).
Besides the thin story there were other things that troubled me. One of
those things is acting. Lucas has assembled a solid cast, including Liam
Neeson (Qui-Gon Jin) , Ewan McGregor (Obi-Wan Kenobi) and Natalie Portman as
Queen Amidala. It is only Neeson  and Portman that give above average
performances. At the same time, acting is something you can't demand of
"Episode 1", because of the computer graphics. Actors are mostly talking to
themselves at the set, and the script is likewise nothing to boast of.
Another thing is that there are almost none comic relieves in "Episode 1".
In the previous Star Wars-episodes you had the energetic Harrison Ford ,
whose witty and humorous commentaries are very missed. You also had Yoda,
R2-D2, C3PO in many episodic scenes. In "Episode 1" you have only Jar Jar; a
charecter that is meant to be funny, but isn't. The rest of the characters
mentioned above, are present, but absolutely not developed as the time is
instead granted on beautiful visual effects.
But there are not only negative things that I have to say about "Episode 1".
Lucas' extraordinary taste and visual imagination transports us from the
Royal Palace of Naboo to the glittering underwater city  and then to
Coruscant, the political heart of the Republic and the headquarters of both
the Galactic Senate and the Jedi Council. Visually the film is above
stunning. It's a feast. The revolutionary visual- and sound effects are
certainly the greatest ever. Equally magnificent are Trisha Biggar's costume
design, Gavin Bocquet's production design and makeup by Paul Engelen and
Mark Coulier .
As far as common adventure and science fiction films go, "Episode 1" is one
of the best. But as the controversial prequel to the classic cult-film, it
is a bit disappointing, because of its simplicity.
Lucas has probably figured out that everyone saw his previous Star Wars
episodes. He has certainly flattered himself. The evolution of Anakin
Skywalker from an innocent boy to the servant of darkness is completely
unknown to the new audience. Yoda, R2-D2 and C3PO are total strangers. If he
has chosen to direct a film mostly to please the old fans of Star Wars, he
has taken the subject very lightly.
After creating a revolutionary film that received a cult status all around
the world, George Lucas has a lot to live up to. And if he has chosen to
continue, he can't just serve emptiness on a beautiful plate and expect the
audiences to throw themselves over it.
Offcourse everything depends on the point of view of every individual. If
you have never seen the previous Star Wars-films, you will probably think
that "Episode 1" is marvelous. If you have, you will probably share my
opinion. The best thing you can do is not expect too much.
See this film simply to experience the unbelievable special effects and try
to relive the magic of the first film as it came out more than 20 years ago.
Review by Alex Ioshpe ">ioshpe@online.no>
Story summary by Matthew McQuillan {mjment@hotmail.com}
